303
Alabama
Alabama  is a state located in the southeastern region of the States. It is bordered by Tennessee to the north, Georgia to the east, Florida and the of Mexico to the south, and Mississippi to the west. Alabama ranks 30th in total land area and ranks second in the size of its inland waterways. The state ranks 23rd in population with 4.7 million residents in 2009.()From the Civil War until War II, Alabama, like many Southern states, suffered economic hardship, in part because of continued dependence on agriculture. Despite the growth of major industries and urban centers, white rural interests dominated the state legislature until the 1960s, while urban interests and Americans were under-represented.() Following World War II, Alabama experienced growth as the economy of the state transitioned from agriculture to diversified interests in heavy manufacturing, mineral extraction, education, and technology.  In addition, the establishment or expansion of multiple military installations, primarily those of the Army and Air Force, added to state jobs.Alabama is unofficially nicknamed the Yellowhammer State, after the state bird. Alabama is also known as the Heart of Dixie. The state tree is the Pine, the state flower is the Camellia. The capital of Alabama is Montgomery.  The largest city by population is Birmingham. The largest city by total land area is Huntsville. The oldest city is Mobile, founded by French colonists.HistoryEtymologyThe (people), a Muskogean-speaking tribe whose members lived just below the confluence of the Coosa and Rivers on the upper reaches of the River,() served as the etymological source of the names of the river and state. In the language, the word for an Alabama person is Albaamo (or variously Albaama or Albamo in different dialects; the plural form Alabama persons is Albaamaha).() The word Alabama is believed to have originated from the language() and was later adopted by the Alabama tribe as their name.()  The spelling of the word varies significantly between sources.(  The first usage appears in three accounts of the de Soto expedition of 1540 with Garcilasso de la Vega using Alibamo, while the Knight of Elvas and Rodrigo Ranjel wrote Alibamu and Limamu, respectively.(  As early as 1702, the tribe was known to the French as Alibamon with French maps identifying the river as Rivire des Alibamons.(  Other spellings of the appellation have included Alibamu, Alabamo, Albama, Alebamon, Alibama, Alibamou, Alabamu, and Allibamou.(()()(The use of state names derived from Native American languages is common; an estimated 27 states have names of Native American origin. )Although the origin of Alabama could be discerned, sources disagree on its meaning. An 1842 article in the Jacksonville Republican originated the idea that the meaning was Here We Rest.( This notion was popularized in the 1850s through the writings of Beaufort Meek.(  Experts in the languages have been unable to find any evidence to support such a translation.((  Scholars believe the word comes from the Choctaw alba (meaning plants or weeds) and amo (meaning to cut, to trim, or to gather).((()  The meaning may have been clearers of the thicket( or herb gatherers(() which may refer to clearing of land for cultivation( or to collecting medicinal plants.(Indigenous peoples, early historyFile:Cheaha Lake in the Fall.jpg|thumb|right|Cheaha, Alabamas highest pointpeoples of varying cultures lived in the area for thousands of years before European colonization. Trade with the Northeast via the River began during the Burial Mound Period (1000 BCAD 700) and continued until European contact.() The agrarian culture covered most of the state from AD 1000 to 1600, with one of its major centers being at the Archaeological Site in Alabama.()() Analysis of artifacts recovered from archaeological excavations at Moundville were the basis of scholars formulating the characteristics of the Ceremonial Complex (SECC).() Contrary to popular belief, the SECC appears to have no direct links to Mesoamerican culture, but developed independently. The Ceremonial Complex represents a major component of the religion of the Mississippian peoples; it is one of the primary means by which their religion is understood.()Among the historical tribes of Native American people living in the area of present-day Alabama at the time of European contact were  Iroquoian-speaking Cherokee, and the Muskogean-speaking Alabama (Alibamu), Chickasaw, Choctaw, Creek, Koasati, and Mobile.()European settlementThe French founded the first European settlement in the region at Old Mobile, in 1702.() The area was French from 1702 to 1763; part of British Florida from 1763 to 1780. Thomas Bassett was the first British settler in the state. He settled near what is now River in Washington County.() Alabama became part of Spanish West Florida from 1780 to 1810; part of the independent of West Florida for a short time (90 days); annexed by the U.S. and added to the of Orleans (1810); and, finally, added to the Territory in 1812. Throughout these later developments, however, the Spanish had kept a nominal (although largely ignored) governmental presence in the region, based out of Mobile. When Jacksons forces occupied Mobile in 1814 while preparing for the of New Orleans he demonstrated the United States facto authority over the region, effectively ending Spanish governance (though not its claim), while gaining an unencumbered passage to the gulf.()The area making up todays northern and central Alabama, known as the lands, had been claimed by the of Georgia after 1763. Following the Revolutionary War, it remained a part of the state of Georgia although heavily disputed. Conflicting claims to the area were held, first by several Native American tribes (most notably the Chickamauga-Cherokee and Yazoo), by other states (e.g. Carolina); and by the US federal government; Britain and Spain. In 1802, the region was joined to the Territory.  Individual statehood was delayed, however, by the territorys lack of a coastline.Statehood, Civil War and ReconstructionAlabama state capital ruins at Capital Park in Tuscaloosa Alabama became the twenty-second state admitted to the Union in 1819.  Part of the frontier in the 1820s and 1830s, its constitution provided for universal suffrage for white men. Settlers rapidly arrived to take advantage of the fertile soil. Southeastern planters and traders from the South brought slaves with them as the cotton plantations expanded. The economy of the central Black Belt (named for its dark, productive soil) was built around large cotton plantations whose owners wealth grew largely from slave labor.( The area also drew many poor, disfranchised people who became farmers. The 1860 census records show that enslaved Africans comprised 45% of the states total population of 964,201. There were only 2,690 free persons of color living in Alabama at the time.From 1826 to 1846, Tuscaloosa served as the capital of Alabama. On January 30, 1846, the Alabama legislature announced that it had voted to remove the capital city from Tuscaloosa to Montgomery. The first legislative session in the new capital met in December 1847. In time, a Capitol building was erected under the direction of a Philadelphia, Pennsylvania architect. The original structure burnt down in 1849 but was rebuilt in 1851 following the original plans.(Montgomery: History - Early Days in Montgomery, Lafayettes Visit a Local Highlight)On January 11, 1861, Alabama declared its secession from the Union and joined the States of America. While few battles were fought in the state, Alabama contributed about 120,000 soldiers to the Civil War. Alabamas slaves were freed by the 13th Amendment in 1865.() During Reconstruction, the new state legislators created a public school system for the first time, as well as establishing some welfare institutions to help its people.  Alabama was officially restored to the Union in 1868.After the Civil War, the state was still chiefly agricultural, with an economy tied to cotton.  Planters resisted working with free labor during Reconstruction and sought to re-establish controls over freedmen. In the early years the Klux Klan had numerous independent chapters in Alabama that attacked freedmen and other Republicans.  After it was suppressed, insurgent whites organized paramilitary groups, such as the Red Shirts and League, that acted more openly to suppress black voting.  Regaining power by the late 1870s, in the last decade of the 19th century, white Democrats passed electoral laws disfranchise most blacks and many poor whites.(J. Morgan Kousser.The Shaping of Southern Politics: Suffrage Restriction and the Establishment of the One-Party South, New Haven: Yale University Press, 1974) Having regained power in the state legislature, Democrats passed Crow laws, including segregation in public facilities, to restore white supremacy in the society.In 1875, the state passed the Amendment, to prohibit public money from being used to finance Catholic schools.()19001960Image:FSA school in Alabama.gif|thumb|School in Alabama (Security Administration, 1935)The new 1901 of Alabama effectively disfranchised African Americans and many poor whites through voting restrictions, including literacy requirements. While the planter class had persuaded poor whites to support these legislative efforts, the new restrictions resulted in disfranchising poor whites as well, due mostly to imposition of a cumulative tax.In 1900, 14 Black Belt counties had more than 79,000 voters on the rolls. By June 1, 1903, the number of  registered voters had dropped to 1,081. In 1900, Alabama had more than 181,000 African Americans eligible to vote. By 1903, only 2,980 had qualified to register, although at least 74,000 black voters were literate.(By 1941, a total of more whites than blacks had been disfranchised: 600,000 whites to 520,000 blacks.(Glenn Feldman. The Disfranchisement Myth: Poor Whites and Suffrage Restriction in Alabama. Athens: University of Georgia Press, 2004, p. 136.) Nearly all African Americans lost the ability to vote.The disfranchisement was ended  by African Americans leading the Rights Movement and gaining Federal legislation in the mid-1960s to protect their voting and civil rights.  The Rights Act of 1965 also protected the suffrage of poor whites.The rural-dominated Alabama legislature consistently underfunded schools and services for the disfranchised African Americans in the segregated state, but did not relieve them of paying taxes.() Continued racial discrimination, agricultural depression, and the failure of the cotton crops due to weevil infestation led tens of thousands of African Americans to seek opportunities in northern cities. They left Alabama in the early 20th century as part of the Great Migration to industrial jobs and better futures in northern industrial cities. The population growth rate in Alabama (see Historical Populations table below) dropped by nearly half from 1910 to 1920, reflecting the effect of emigration.At the same time, many rural whites and blacks migrated to the city of Birmingham for work in new industrial jobs. It experienced such rapid growth that it was nicknamed The Magic City.  By the 1920s, Birmingham was the 19th largest city in the U.S. and held more than 30% of the population of the state. Heavy industry and mining were the basis of the economy.()File:AlabamaWelcome.JPG|thumb|left|This structure greets drivers visiting the Alabama Welcome Center just inside the AL/GA border off of 20.Industrial development related to the demands of War II brought prosperity.( Cotton faded in importance as the state developed a manufacturing and service base. In the 1960s under Governor Wallace, many whites in the state opposed federal integration efforts in schools and public facilities.1960presentDespite massive population changes in the state from 1901 to 1961, the rural-dominated legislature refused to reapportion House and Senate seats based on population. They held on to old representation to maintain political and economic power in agricultural areas. In addition, the state legislature gerrymandered the few Birmingham legislative seats to ensure election by persons living outside Birmingham.One result was that Jefferson County, containing Birminghams industrial and economic powerhouse, contributed more than one-third of all tax revenue to the state, but did not receive a proportional amount in services.  Urban interests were consistently underrepresented in the legislature. A 1960 study noted that because of rural domination, A minority of about 25 per cent of the total state population is in majority control of the Alabama legislature.(African Americans were presumed partial to Republicans for historical reasons, but they were disfranchised. White Alabamans felt bitter towards the Republican Party in the aftermath of the Civil War and Reconstruction. These factors created a longstanding tradition that any candidate who wanted to be viable with white voters had to run as a Democrat regardless of political beliefs.During the Civil Rights Movement, African Americans achieved a protection of voting and other civil rights through the passage of the national Rights Act of 1964,() and the Rights Act of 1965. jure segregation ended in the states as Crow laws were invalidated or repealed.()Under the Voting Rights Act of 1965, cases were filed in Federal courts to force Alabama to properly redistrict by population both the House and Senate of the state legislature. In 1972, for the first time since 1901, the legislature implemented the Alabama constitutions provision for periodic redistricting based on population.  This benefited the urban areas that had developed, as well as all in the population who had been underrepresented for more than 60 years.(After 1972, the states white voters shifted much of their support to Republican candidates in presidential elections (as also occurred in neighboring southern states). Since 1990 the majority of whites in the state have voted increasingly Republican in state elections.  In 2010, Republicans won control of both houses of the legislature for the first time in 136 years.()GeographyFile:Map of Alabama terrain NA.jpg|right |thumb|Alabama terrain map: shows lakes, rivers, roads, with Cheaha (right center) east of Birmingham.Alabama is the thirtieth-largest state in the United States with  of total area: 3.19% of the area is water, making Alabama twenty-third in the amount of surface water, also giving it the second-largest inland waterway system in the United States.()  About three-fifths of the land area is a gentle plain with a general descent towards the River and the Gulf of Mexico. The Alabama region is mostly mountainous, with the River cutting a large valley creating numerous creeks, streams, rivers, mountains, and lakes.()File:Phoenix Condos view in Orange Beach Alabama.jpg|thumb|left|View of Pass from Beach The states bordering Alabama are Tennessee to the north; Georgia to the east; Florida to the south; and Mississippi to the west. Alabama has coastline at the of Mexico, in the extreme southern edge of the state.(  Alabama ranges in elevation from sea level() at Bay to over 1,800 feet (550 m) in the Mountains in the northeast. The highest point is Cheaha,( at a height of .()  Alabamas land consists of  of forest or 67% of total land area.(Alabama Forest Owners Guide to Information Resources, Introduction, Alabamaforests.org)  Suburban Baldwin County, along the Gulf Coast, is the largest county in the state in both land area and water area.()Areas in Alabama administered by the Park Service include Bend National Military Park near Alexander City; River Canyon National Preserve near Fort Payne; Cave National Monument in Bridgeport; Airmen National Historic Site in Tuskegee; and Institute National Historic Site near Tuskegee.() Additionally, Alabama has four National Forests: Conecuh, Talladega, Tuskegee, and William B. Bankhead.()  Alabama also contains the Trace Parkway, the To Montgomery National Historic Trail, and the Trail Of Tears National Historic Trail.  A notable natural wonder in Alabama is Natural Bridge rock, the longest bridge east of the Rockies, located just south of Haleyville.A -wide meteorite impact crater is located in Elmore County, just north of Montgomery. This is the crater, which is the site of Alabamas greatest natural disaster.(Wetumpka Impact Crater Wetumpka Public Library. Retrieved August 21, 2007.)  A -wide meteorite hit the area about 80 million years ago.( The hills just east of downtown Wetumpka showcase the eroded remains of the impact crater that was blasted into the bedrock, with the area labeled the Wetumpka crater or astrobleme (star-wound) because of the concentric rings of fractures and zones of shattered rock that can be found beneath the surface.(The Wetumpka Astrobleme by John C. Hall, Alabama Heritage, Fall 1996, Number 42.) In 2002, Christian Koeberl with the Institute of Geochemistry University of Vienna published evidence and established the site as an internationally recognized impact crater.(Urban areaspanorama.jpg|thumb|Birmingham, largest city and metropolitan areaHuntsville, Alabama cropped.jpg|thumb|Huntsville, second-largest metropolitan areaMobile 2008 01.jpg|thumb|Mobile, third-largest metropolitan areaAlabama panorama.jpg|thumb|Montgomery, fourth-largest metropolitan areafifth-largest metropolitan areaClimateThe state is classified as humid subtropical (Cfa) under the Koppen Climate Classification.() The average annual temperature is 64 F (18 C). Temperatures tend to be warmer in the southern part of the state with its proximity to the Gulf of Mexico, while the northern parts of the state, especially in the Appalachian Mountains in the northeast, tend to be slightly cooler.()  Generally, Alabama has very hot summers and mild winters with copious precipitation throughout the year. Alabama receives an average of  of rainfall annually and enjoys a lengthy growing season of up to 300 days in the southern part of the state.(Summers in Alabama are among the hottest in the United States, with high temperatures averaging over  throughout the summer in some parts of the state. Alabama is also prone to storms and even hurricanes. Areas of the state far away from the Gulf are not immune to the effects of the storms, which often dump tremendous amounts of rain as they move inland and weaken.File:Alabama winter 2008.jpg|thumb|right|Though winters in the state are usually mild, nightly freezing occurs frequently in the Alabama region. This is shown in this picture taken at the Old State Bank in Decatur during early January.South Alabama reports many thunderstorms. The Gulf Coast, around Mobile Bay, averages between 70 and 80 days per year with thunder reported. This activity decreases somewhat further north in the state, but even the far north of the state reports thunder on about 60 days per year. Occasionally, thunderstorms are severe with frequent lightning and large hail  the central and northern parts of the state are most vulnerable to this type of storm. Alabama ranks seventh in the number of deaths from lightning and ninth in the number of deaths from lightning strikes per capita.(Lightning Fatalities, Injuries and Damages in the United States, 19902003. NLSI. Retrieved May 8, 2007.)Alabama, along with Kansas, has the most reported EF5 tornadoes of any state  according to statistics from the Climatic Data Center for the period January 1, 1950, to October 31, 2006.(Fujita scale. Tornadoproject.com. Retrieved September 3, 2007.) Several long  tracked F5 tornadoes have contributed to Alabama reporting more tornado fatalities than any other state, even surpassing Texas which has a much larger area within Alley.  The state suffered damage in the Outbreak of April 1974, and the 2528, 2011 tornado outbreak.The peak season for tornadoes varies from the northern to southern parts of the state.  Alabama is one of the few places in the world that has a secondary tornado season in November and December, along with the spring severe weather season. The northern part of the state  along the Tennessee Valley  is one of the areas in the U.S. most vulnerable to violent tornadoes. The area of Alabama and Mississippi most affected by tornadoes is sometimes referred to as Alley, as distinct from the Alley of the Southern Plains.Winters are generally mild in Alabama, as they are throughout most of the United States, with average January low temperatures around  in Mobile and around  in Birmingham. Although snow is a rare event in much of Alabama, areas of the state north of Montgomery may receive a dusting of snow a few times every winter, with an occasional moderately heavy snowfall every few years.  Historic snowfall events include Years Eve 1963 snowstorm and the Storm of the Century.  The annual average snowfall for the Birmingham area is  per year.  In the southern Gulf coast, snowfall is less frequent, sometimes going several years without any snowfall.{| classwikitable collapsible collapsed stylewidth:90%; text-align:center; font-size:90%; line-height: 1.1em; margin:auto;|-!colspan16| Monthly normal high and low temperatures for various Alabama cities (C)|-!colspan2| Month! Jan! Feb! Mar! Apr! May! Jun! Jul! Aug! Sep! Oct! Nov! Dec!styleborder-left-width:medium |Year|rowspan11| places|-!rowspan2| Huntsville! Average high|style| 48.9(9.4)|style| 54.6(12.6)|style| 63.4(17.4)|style| 72.3(22.4)|style| 79.6(26.4)|style| 86.5(30.3)|style| 89.4(31.9)|style| 89.0(31.7)|style| 83.0(28.3)|style| 72.9(22.7)|style| 61.6(16.4)|style| 52.4(11.3)|style border-left-width:medium| 71.1(21.7)|-! Average low|style| 30.7(-0.7)|style| 34.0(1.1)|style| 41.2(5.1)|style| 48.4(9.1)|style| 57.5(14.2)|style| 65.4(18.6)|style| 69.5(20.8)|style| 68.1(20.1)|style| 61.7(16.5)|style| 49.6(9.8)|style| 40.7(4.8)|style| 33.8(1.0)|style border-left-width:medium| 50.1(10.1)|-!rowspan2| Birmingham! Average high|style| 52.8(11.6)|style| 58.3(14.6)|style| 66.5(19.2)|style| 74.1(23.4)|style| 81.0(27.2)|style| 87.5(30.8)|style| 90.6(32.6)|style| 90.2(32.3)|style| 84.6(29.2)|style| 74.9(23.8)|style| 64.5(18.1)|style| 56.0(13.3)|style border-left-width:medium| 73.4(23.0)|-! Average low|style| 32.3(0.2)|style| 35.4(1.9)|style| 42.4(5.8)|style| 48.4(9.1)|style| 57.6(14.2)|style| 65.4(18.6)|style| 69.7(20.9)|style| 68.9(20.5)|style| 63.0(17.2)|style| 50.9(10.5)|style| 41.8(5.4)|style| 35.2(1.8)|style border-left-width:medium| 50.9(10.5)|-!rowspan2| Montgomery! Average high|style| 57.6(14.2)|style| 62.4(16.9)|style| 70.5(21.4)|style| 77.5(25.3)|style| 84.6(29.2)|style| 90.6(32.6)|style| 92.7(33.7)|style| 92.2(33.4)|style| 87.7(30.9)|style| 78.7(25.9)|style| 68.7(20.4)|style| 60.3(15.7)|style border-left-width:medium| 77.0(25.0)|-! Average low|style| 35.5(1.9)|style| 38.6(3.7)|style| 45.4(7.4)|style| 52.1(11.2)|style| 60.1(15.6)|style| 67.3(19.6)|style| 70.9(21.6)|style| 70.1(21.2)|style| 64.9(18.3)|style| 52.2(11.2)|style| 43.5(6.4)|style| 37.6(3.1)|style border-left-width:medium| 53.2(11.8)|-!rowspan2| Mobile! Average high|style| 60.7(15.9)|style| 64.5(18.1)|style| 71.2(21.8)|style| 77.4(25.2)|style| 84.2(29.0)|style| 89.4(31.9)|style| 91.2(32.9)|style| 90.8(32.7)|style| 86.8(30.4)|style| 79.2(26.2)|style| 70.1(21.2)|style| 62.9(17.2)|style border-left-width:medium| 77.4(25.2)|-! Average low|style| 39.5(4.2)|style| 42.4(5.8)|style| 49.2(9.6)|style| 54.8(12.7)|style| 62.8(17.1)|style| 69.2(20.7)|style| 71.8(22.1)|style| 71.7(22.0)|style| 67.6(19.8)|style| 56.3(13.5)|style| 47.8(8.8)|style| 41.6(5.3)|style border-left-width:medium| 56.2(13.4)|-|colspan15 styletext-align:center;font-size:85%| Source: NOAA()()()()|}Demographicsfootnote  Sources: 1910-2010()The States Census Bureau, as of July 1, 2008, estimated Alabamas population at 4,661,900,() which represents an increase of 214,545, or 4.8%, since the last census in 2000.() This includes a natural increase since the last census of 121,054 people (that is 502,457 births minus 381,403 deaths) and an increase due to net migration of 104,991 people into the state.( Immigration from outside the United States resulted in a net increase of 31,180 people, and migration within the country produced a net gain of 73,811 people.(  The state had 108,000 foreign-born (2.4% of the state population), of which an estimated 22.2% were illegal immigrants (24,000).The of population of Alabama is located in Chilton County, outside of the town of Jemison.()Race and ancestryAccording to the U.S. Census, Alabama had a population of 4,779,736. In terms of race and ethnicity, the state was 68.5% White (67.0% Non-Hispanic White Alone), 26.2% Black or African American, 0.6% American Indian and Alaska Native, 1.1% Asian, 0.1% Native Hawaiian and Other Pacific Islander, 2.0% from Some Other Race, and 1.5% from Two or More Races. Hispanics or Latinos of any race made up 3.9% of the population.()The largest reported ancestry groups in Alabama are: American (26.2%), English (23.6%), Irish (7.7%), German (5.7%), and Scots-Irish (2.0%).()()()  In the 2000 Census, 621,080 people claimed to be of American ancestry, most them are of overwhelmingly English extraction, however most English Americans identify simply as having ethnicity because their roots have been in North America as long as the early 1600s. Demographers estimate that roughly 23% of people in Alabama are of predominantly English ancestry.()(Reynolds Farley, The New Census Question about Ancestry: What Did It Tell Us?, Demography, Vol. 28, No. 3 (August 1991), pp. 414, 421.)(Stanley Lieberson and Lawrence Santi, The Use of Nativity Data to Estimate Ethnic Characteristics and Patterns, Social Science Research, Vol. 14, No. 1 (1985), pp. 44-6.)(Stanley Lieberson and Mary C. Waters, Ethnic Groups in Flux: The Changing Ethnic Responses of American Whites, Annals of the American Academy of Political and Social Science, Vol. 487, No. 79 (September 1986), pp. 8286.)  There are also many more people in Alabama of Scots-Irish origins than are self-reported.(In 1984, under the DavisStrong Act, Alabama established a state Indian Commission and officially recognized seven American Indian tribes, including the Echota Cherokee Tribe of Alabama, which is a 501 (c3) group. It is made up of descendants of the Chickamauga Cherokee and others who managed to evade Removal in the 1830s. Working with University, the tribe has begun a revival of the language.ReligionAlabama is located in the middle of the Belt. A majority of people in Alabama today identify as Protestant. As of 2000, the three largest denominational groups in Alabama are Protestant, Protestant, and Catholic. The Baptist Convention has the highest number of adherents in Alabama with 1,380,121, followed by the Methodist Church with 327,734 members, and the Church with 150,647 adherents.()In a 2007 survey, nearly 70% of respondents could name all four of the Christian Gospels. Of those who indicated a religious preference, 59% said they possessed a full understanding of their faith and needed no further learning.()  In a 2007 poll, 92% of Alabamians reported having at least some confidence in churches in the state.()()  In the 2008 American Religious Identification Survey, 80% of Alabama respondents reported their religion as Christian (other than Catholic,) 6% as Catholic, and 11% as having no religion at all.()HealthA for Disease Control and Prevention study showed that Alabama was one of the worst in the country for obesity with most counties having over 29% of adults obese, except for ten which exceeded 26%.() Residents were least likely of any state in the nation to exercise.() Alabama has one of the highest incidents of adult onset diabetes in the country, exceeding 10% of adults.()()EconomyThe state has invested in aerospace, education, health care, and banking, and various heavy industries, including automobile manufacturing, mineral extraction, steel production and fabrication. According to the United States of Economic Analysis, the 2008 total state product was $170 billion, or $29,411 per capita. Alabamas 2008 GDP increased 0.7% from the previous year. The single largest increase came in the area of information.( full release with tables)  In 1999, capita income for the state was $18,189.()As of September 2010, the states unemployment rate is 8.9%.(Bls.gov; Local Area Unemployment Statistics)AgricultureAlabamas agricultural outputs include poultry and eggs, cattle, plant nursery items, peanuts, cotton, grains such as corn and sorghum, vegetables, milk, soybeans, and peaches. Although known as The Cotton State, Alabama ranks between eighth and tenth in national cotton production, according to various reports,()() with Texas, Georgia and Mississippi comprising the top three.IndustryFile:USSRC Rocket Park.JPG|thumb|left|Space & Rocket Center in Huntsville Alabamas industrial outputs include iron and steel products (including cast-iron and steel pipe); paper, lumber, and wood products; mining (mostly coal); plastic products; cars and trucks; and apparel. Also, Alabama produces aerospace and electronic products, mostly in the Huntsville area, location of NASAs C. Marshall Space Flight Center and the US Army Aviation and Missile Command, headquartered at Arsenal.Most Alabamas economic growth is due to the states expanding automotive manufacturing industry. Located in the state are Manufacturing of Alabama, Motor Manufacturing Alabama, U.S. International, and Motor Manufacturing Alabama, as well as their various suppliers.  Since 1993, the automobile industry has generated more than 67,800 new jobs in the state. Alabama currently ranks 4th in the nation in automobile output.()Steel producers Nucor, SSAB, ThyssenKrupp, and Steel have facilities in Alabama and employ over 10,000 people.  In May 2007, German steelmaker ThyssenKrupp selected Alabama for a $3.7 billion steel production plant, with the promise of 2,700 permanent jobs.() When ThyssenKrupps new facilities reach full production capacity, Alabama is expected to become the third largest steel producing state in the country behind Indiana and Pennsylvania.(http://www.alalabor.state.al.us/PDFs/SteelCouncilNewsletter.pdf) Alabamas industrial and manufacturing plants includes BFGoodrich Tire Manufacturing, Materials Corporation, Refining Company, and JVC America.TourismAn estimated 100,000 tourists annually from other countries visit the state, including from Canada, England, Germany and Japan. In 2006, 22.3 million tourists spent $8.3 billion providing an estimated 162,000 jobs in the state.(Encyclopedia of Alabama: Alabama Tourism Department (ATD))(http://www.800alabama.com/about-alabama/alabama-news-facts/frequently-asked-questions/)()HealthHospital is the only Level I trauma center in Alabama.()(https://webspace.utexas.edu/jas5349/Research_Data.htm))  UAB is the largest employer in Alabama, with a workforce of about 20,000.BankingAlabama has the headquarters of Financial Corporation, Compass and Bancorp. Birmingham-based Compass Banchshares was acquired by Spanish-based BBVA in September 2007, although the headquarters of BBVA Compass remains in Birmingham. In November 2006, Regions Financial completed its merger with Bancorporation, which was also headquartered in Birmingham. Corporation, another large bank headquartered in Birmingham, was acquired by Wachovia in 2004 for $14.3 billion. The city still has major operations for Wachovia and its now post-operating bank Fargo, which includes a regional headquarters, a operations center campus and a $400 million dollar data center. Nearly a dozen smaller banks are also headquartered in the Birmingham, such as Superior Bancorp, ServisFirst and New South Federal Savings Bank. Birmingham also serves as the headquarters for several large investment management companies, including Management Corporation.ElectronicsTelecommunications provider AT&T, formerly BellSouth, also has a major presence in Alabama with several large offices in Birmingham. The company has over 6,000 employees and more than 1,200 contract employees.Many commercial technology companies are headquartered in Huntsville, such as the network access company ADTRAN, computer graphics company Intergraph, design and manufacturer of IT infrastructure Avocent, and telecommunications provider Deltacom. Cinram manufactures and distributes 20th Century Fox DVDs and Blu-ray Discs out of their Huntsville plant.ConstructionRust International has grown to include & Gorrie, BE&K, Construction and Harbert International, which all routinely are included in the Engineering News-Record lists of top design, international construction, and engineering firms. (Rust International was acquired in 2000 by Group International, which was in turn acquired by San-Francisco based Corporation in 2007.)TransportationThe of Mobile, Alabamas only saltwater port, is a busy seaport on the of Mexico with inland waterway access to the Midwest by way of the Waterway.  The Port of Mobile is currently the 9th-largest by tonnage in the United States.()Barge transportation in and out of the Port of Tuscaloosa and other commercial navigation make the Warrior River useful in the state of Alabama.Law and governmentstate capitol, Montgomery.jpg|thumb|The State Capitol, built in 1850State governmentThe foundational document for Alabamas government is the Constitution, which was ratified in 1901. At almost 800 amendments and 310,000 words, it is the worlds longest constitution and is roughly forty times the length of the Constitution.()()  There is a significant movement to rewrite and modernize Alabamas constitution.() This movement is based upon the fact that Alabamas constitution highly centralizes power in Montgomery and leaves practically no power in local hands. Any policy changes proposed around the state must be approved by the entire Alabama legislature and, frequently, by state referendum. One criticism of the current constitution claims that its complexity and length were intentional to codify segregation and racism.Alabama is divided into three equal branches:The branch is the Legislature, a bicameral assembly composed of the House of Representatives, with 105 members, and the Senate, with 35 members. The Legislature is responsible for writing, debating, passing, or defeating state legislation.The branch is responsible for the execution and oversight of laws. It is headed by the of Alabama. Other members of executive branch include the cabinet, the General of Alabama, the Secretary of State, the Commissioner of Agriculture and Industries, the State Treasurer, and the Auditor of Alabama.The branch is responsible for interpreting the Constitution and applying the law in state criminal and civil cases. The highest court is the Court of Alabama.TaxesAlabama levies a 2, 4, or 5 percent personal income tax, depending upon the amount earned and filing status. Taxpayers are not allowed to deduct their federal income tax from their Alabama state tax, but can deduct federal Social Security and Medicare taxes.The states general sales tax rate is 4%.(Comparison of State and Local Retail Sales Taxes, July 2004 Retrieved on May 25, 2007.) The collection rate could be substantially higher, depending upon additional city and county sales taxes. For example, the total sales tax rate in Mobile is 10% and there is an additional restaurant tax of 1%, which means that a diner in Mobile would pay a 11% tax on a meal. Sales and excise taxes in Alabama account for 51% of all state and local revenue, compared with an average of about 36% nationwide. Alabama is also one of the few remaining states that levies a tax on food and medicine. Alabamas income tax on poor working families is among the nations very highest.() Alabama is the only state that levies income tax on a family of four with income as low as $4,600, which is barely one-quarter of the federal poverty line.( Alabamas threshold is the lowest among the 41 states and the District of Columbia with income taxes.(The corporate income tax rate is currently 6.5%. The overall federal, state, and local tax burden in Alabama ranks the state as the second least tax-burdened state in the country.()  taxes are the lowest in the United States. The current state constitution requires a voter referendum to raise property taxes.Since Alabamas tax structure largely depends on consumer spending, it is subject to high variable budget structure. For example, in 2003 Alabama had an annual budget deficit as high as $670 million.Local and county governmentAlabama has 67 counties. Each county has its own elected legislative branch, usually called the County Commission, which usually also has executive authority in the county. Because of the restraints placed in the Constitution, all but seven counties (Jefferson, Lee, Mobile, Madison, Montgomery, Shelby, and Tuscaloosa) in the state have little to no rule. Instead, most counties in the state must lobby the Local Legislation Committee of the state legislature to get simple local policies such as waste disposal to land use zoning.Alabama is an beverage control state; the government holds a monopoly on the sale of alcohol. However, counties can declare themselves dry; the state does not sell alcohol in those areas.*of counties in AlabamaPoliticsThe current governor of the state is Republican Robert Bentley. The lieutenant governor is Republican Ivey. The Chief Justice of the Alabama Supreme Court is Democrat Bell Cobb. The Republican Party currently holds a majority in both houses of the Legislature. The Legislature has the power to override a gubernatorial veto by a simple majority (most state Legislatures require a two-thirds majority to override a veto).During Reconstruction following the Civil War, Alabama was occupied by federal troops of the Military District under General John Pope. In 1874, the political coalition known as the Redeemers took control of the state government from the Republicans, in part by suppressing the African American vote.After 1890, a coalition of whites passed laws to segregate and disenfranchise black residents, a process completed in provisions of the 1901 constitution. Provisions which disfranchised African Americans also disfranchised poor whites, however. By 1941 more whites than blacks had been disfranchised: 600,000 to 520,000, although the impact was greater on the African-American community, as almost all of its citizens were disfranchised.From 1901 through the 1960s, the state did not redraw election districts as population grew and shifted within the state. The result was a rural minority that dominated state politics until a series of court cases required redistricting in 1972.Alabama state politics gained nationwide and international attention in the 1950s and 1960s during the American Civil Rights Movement, when majority whites bureaucratically, and at times, violently resisted protests for electoral and social reform. Wallace, the states only four-term governor, was a  controversial figure. Only with the passage of the Federal Rights Act of 1964( and Rights Act of 1965 did African Americans regain suffrage and other civil rights.In 2007, the Legislature passed, and Republican Governor Riley signed, a resolution expressing profound regret over slavery and its lingering impact. In a symbolic ceremony, the bill was signed in the State Capitol, which housed Congress of the States of America.()State electionsWith the disfranchisement of African Americans, the state became part of the South, a one-party system in which the Democratic Party became essentially the only political party in every Southern state. For nearly 100 years, local and state elections in Alabama were decided in the Democratic Party primary, with generally only token Republican challengers running in the General Election.Developments in the 1986 Democratic primary election led to the election of the first Republican Governor in more than 100 years and started Republicans on the road to political dominance in the state.  One million voters cast ballots in the 1986 Democratic primary. The then-incumbent Lieutenant Governor, Baxley, lost the Democratic nomination for Governor by approximately 8,000 votes to then fellow Democratic Attorney General Graddick. The state Democratic partys five-member election contest committee invalidated the primary election result claiming that thousands of Republicans had illegally voted in the Democratic primary for Graddick and as a result they removed Graddick from the ballot.  The Democratic Party then placed Baxleys name on the ballot as the Democratic candidate instead of Graddick. The voters of the state revolted at what they perceived as disenfranchisement of their right to vote and elected the Republican challenger Hunt as Governor.(Stovall, Cotter, & Fisher, Alabama Political Almanac, p. 260, 1995) Hunt had been nominated in a statewide Republican primary that had 28,000 participants compared to the 1,000,000 plus of the Democratic primary.  That November Hunt became the first Republican Governor elected in Alabama since Reconstruction when he won 57% of the vote statewide against Baxley.Since 1986, Republicans have won six of the seven Governors elections and become increasingly competitive in Alabama politics at many levels.   They currently control both seats in the U.S. Senate and six out of the states seven congressional seats.Republicans hold all nine seats on the Supreme Court () and all ten seats on the state appellate courts.  Until 1994, no Republicans held any of the court seats. This change also began, likely in part, due to the same perception by voters of Democratic party efforts to disenfranchise voters again in 1994.  In that general election, the then-incumbent Chief Justice of Alabama, Sonny Hornsby, refused to leave office after losing the election by approximately 3,000 votes to Republican Oliver Hooper, Sr.  Hornsby sued Alabama in court and defiantly remained in office for more than a year before finally giving up the seat after losing in court.  This ultimately would lead to a collapse of support for Democrats at the ballot box in the next three or four election cycles and ultimately losing the last of the nineteen court seats following the resignation of the last Democrat in August, 2011.Today, Republicans also hold all seven of the statewide elected executive branch offices.  Republicans also hold six of the eight elected seats on the State Board of Education.  In 2010, Republicans took large majorities of both chambers of the state legislature giving them control of that body for the first time in 136 years.  However, Democrats hold one of the three seats on the Alabama Public Service Commission.()()()Only two Republican Lieutenant Governors have been elected since Reconstruction, Windom and Ivey, the current Lieutenant Governor. Windom served as Lt. Governor under Democratic Gov. Siegelman.  Before 2011, the last time that Alabama had a governor and Lieutenant Governor of the same party was the period between 1983 and 1987 when Wallace was serving his fourth term as governor and Baxley was serving as Lieutenant Governor; both were Democrats.In Alabama, the members of the Legislature take office immediately after the November elections, but the statewide officials, such as the Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Attorney General, and other constitutional offices take office in the following January.()Local electionsMany local offices (County Commissioners, Boards of Education, Tax Assessors, Tax Collectors, etc.) in the state are still held by Democrats. Local elections in most rural counties are generally decided in the Democratic primary and local elections in metropolitan and suburban counties are generally decided in the Republican Primary, although there are exceptions.()()Alabamas 67 County Sheriffs are elected in partisan races and Democrats still retain the majority of those posts.  The current split is 42 Democrats, 24 Republicans, and 1 Independent (Choctaw).(Alabama Sheriffs Association)  However, most of the Democratic sheriffs preside over rural and less populated counties and the majority of Republican sheriffs preside over more urban/suburban and heavily populated counties.() Two Alabama counties (Montgomery and Calhoun) with a population of over 100,000 have Democratic sheriffs and five Alabama counties with a population of under 75,000 have Republican sheriffs (Autauga, Coffee, Dale, Coosa, and Blount).()  The state has one female sheriff (Morgan) and 9 African-American sheriffs.(Alabama Sheriffs Association)Federal electionsFrom 1876 through 1956, Alabama supported only Democratic presidential candidates, by large margins. In 1960, the Democrats won with F. Kennedy on the ballot, but the Democratic electors from Alabama gave 6 of their 11 electoral votes as a protest to Harry Byrd. In 1964, Republican Goldwater carried the state.In the 1968 presidential election, Alabama supported native son and Independent Party candidate Wallace over both Nixon and Humphrey. Wallace was the official Democratic candidate in Alabama, while Humphrey was listed as the National Democratic.() In 1976, Democratic candidate Carter from Georgia carried the state, the region, and the nation, but Democratic control of the region slipped after that.Since 1980, conservative Alabama voters have increasingly voted for Republican candidates at the Federal level, especially in Presidential elections. By contrast, Democratic candidates have been elected to many state-level offices and until 2010 comprised a longstanding majority in the Legislature; see Dixiecrat.In 2004, W. Bush won Alabamas nine electoral votes by a margin of 25 percentage points with 62.5% of the vote, mostly white voters. The 11 counties that voted Democratic were Black Belt counties, where African Americans are the majority racial group.The states two U.S. senators are Jefferson B. Sessions III and Richard C. Shelby, both Republicans.In the House of Representatives, the state is represented by seven members, six of whom are Republicans: (Bonner, D. Rogers, Aderholt, J. Brooks, Roby, and Bachus) and one Democrat: Sewell).EducationPrimary and secondary educationPublic primary and secondary education in Alabama is under the overview of the State Board of Education as well as local oversight by 67 county school boards and 60 city boards of education. Together, 1,541 individual schools provide education for 743,364 elementary and secondary students.()Public school funding is appropriated through the Alabama Legislature through the Education Trust Fund. In FY 20062007, Alabama appropriated $3,775,163,578 for primary and secondary education. That represented an increase of $444,736,387 over the previous fiscal year.( In 2007, over 82 percent of schools made adequate yearly progress (AYP) toward student proficiency under the National Child Left Behind law, using measures determined by the State of Alabama. In 2004, 23 percent of schools met AYP.()While Alabamas public education system has improved, it lags behind in achievement compared to other states. According to U.S. Census data, Alabamas high school graduation rate  75%  is the second lowest in the United States (after Mississippi).(http://www.census.gov/prod/2003pubs/c2kbr-24.pdf)  The largest educational gains were among people with some college education but without degrees.(Education Statistics. CensusScope.org)File:Harrison-plaza2.jpg|right|thumb|Harrison Plaza at the of North Alabama in Florence. The school was chartered as LaGrange College by the Legislature in 1830.Colleges and universitiesAlabamas programs of higher education include 14 four-year public universities, two-year community colleges, and 17 private, undergraduate and graduate universities. In the state are three medical schools (of Alabama at Birmingham, of Alabama and of South Alabama), two veterinary colleges (University and University), a dental school (of Alabama at Birmingham), an optometry college (of Alabama at Birmingham), two pharmacy schools (University and University), and five law schools (of Alabama School of Law, School of Law, School of Law, Law School, and the Goode Jones School of Law).  Public, post-secondary education in Alabama is overseen by the Alabama Commission on Higher Education. Colleges and universities in Alabama offer degree programs from two-year associate degrees to 16 doctoral level programs.( )()The largest single campus is the of Alabama, located in Tuscaloosa, with 31,747 enrolled for fall 2011.(http://www.wtvy.com/home/headlines/University_of_Alabama_Reaches_Record_Enrollment_this_Fall_129916513.html) University is the largest institution in the state, enrolling 29,689 students (as of 2010) across four Alabama campuses (Troy, Dothan, Montgomery, and Phenix City), as well as sixty learning sites in seventeen other states and eleven other countries.  The oldest institutions are the public of North Alabama in Florence and the Catholic Church-affiliated Hill College in Mobile, both founded in 1830.()()Accreditation of academic programs is through the Association of Colleges and Schools (SACS) as well as other subject-focused national and international accreditation agencies such as the for Biblical Higher Education (ABHE),() the on Occupational Education (COE),()  and the Council for Independent Colleges and Schools (ACICS).()According to the 2011 News and World Report, Alabama had three universities ranked in the top 100 Public Schools in America (University of Alabama at 31, University at 36, and of Alabama at Birmingham at 73).()SportsProfessional sports teamsFile:Hank Aaron Stadium.jpg|160px|thumb|right|Aaron Stadium in MobileFile:Von Braun Center Arena Dec10.jpg|160px|thumb|right|Braun Center in HuntsvilleAlabama has several league professional teams including four league baseball teams.TransportationFile:BHM tower and terminal.jpg|thumb|left|International Airport Air transportationMajor airports in Alabama include International Airport (BHM), International Airport (HSV), Regional Airport (DHN), Regional Airport (MOB), Regional Airport (MGM), Muscle Shoals  Northwest Alabama Regional Airport (MSL), Regional Airport (TCL), and Field Regional Airport (DCU).RailFor rail transport, Amtrak schedules the Crescent, a daily passenger train, running from New York to New Orleans with stops at Anniston, Birmingham, and Tuscaloosa.RoadsFile:I20I59Birmingham.JPG|thumb|right|59 (co-signed with 20) approaching 65 in downtown Birmingham.Alabama has five major interstate roads that cross the state: I-65 runs northsouth roughly through the middle of the state; I-59/I-20 travels from the central west border to Birmingham, where I-59 continues to the north-east corner of the state and I-20 continues east towards Atlanta; I-85 originates in Montgomery and runs east-northeast to the Georgia border, providing a main thoroughfare to Atlanta; and I-10 traverses the southernmost portion of the state, running from west to east through Mobile. Another interstate road, I-22, is currently under construction. When completed around 2012 it will connect Birmingham with Tennessee.  Several U.S.Highways also pass through the state, such as US 11, US 29, US 31, US 43, US 72, US 78, US 80, US 82, US 84, US 90, US 98, US 231, US 278, US 280, and US 431.There are four toll roads in the state: Alabama River Parkway in Montgomery; Black Warrior Parkway in Tuscaloosa; Emerald Mountain Expressway in Montgomery; Foley Beach Express in Foley; Montgomery Expressway in Montgomery and four toll bridges: Alabama River Parkway Bridge in Montgomery; Black Warrior Parkway Bridge in Tuscaloosa; Emerald Mountain Expressway Bridge in Montgomery; and Foley Beach Express Bridge in Foley.In March 2011, Alabama ranked among the top five Worst states on the American State Litter Scorecard, for overall poor effectiveness and quality of its statewide public space cleanlinessprimarily roadway and adjacent litter removalsfrom state and related efforts.(S. Spacek, 2011 American State Litter Scorecard: New Rankings for an Increasingly Environmentally Concerned Populace.)PortsAlabama has one sea port in Mobile on the of Mexico.  The states other ports are on rivers with access to the Gulf.Water Ports of Alabama, listed from north to southSee also*of people from Alabama*Register of Historic Places listings in AlabamaReferencesFurther reading:For a detailed bibliography, see the of Alabama.*Atkins, Leah Rawls, Wayne Flynt, William Warren Rogers, and David Ward. Alabama: The History of a Deep South State (1994)*Flynt, Wayne. Alabama in the Twentieth Century (2004)*Owen Thomas M. History of Alabama and Dictionary of Alabama Biography 4 vols. 1921.*Jackson, Harvey H. Inside Alabama: A Personal History of My State (2004)*Mohl, Raymond A. Latinization in the Heart of Dixie: Hispanics in Late-twentieth-century Alabama Alabama Review 2002 55(4): 243274. ISSN 0002-4341*Peirce, Neal R. The Deep South States of America: People, Politics, and Power in the Seven Deep South States (1974). Information on politics and economics 196072.*Williams, Benjamin Buford. A Literary History of Alabama: The Nineteenth Century 1979.*WPA. Guide to Alabama (1939)External links*Alabama.gov  Official website.*Alabama State Guide, from the Library of Congress*Alabama Association of Regional Councils*Energy Data & Statistics for Alabama- From the U.S. Department of Energy*TourAlabama.org  Alabama Department of Tourism and Travel*All About Alabama, at the Department of Archives and History*AlabamaMosaic, a digital repository of materials on Alabamas history, culture, places, and people*Code of Alabama 1975  at the Alabama Legislature site**USGS real-time, geographic, and other scientific resources of Alabama*Alabama QuickFacts from the U.S. Census Bureau*Alabama State Fact Sheet from the U.S. Department of Agriculture Southeast list af:Alabamaang:Alabamaar:an:Alabamaarc:frp:Alabamaast:Alabamaaz:Alabamabn:zh-min-nan:Alabamabe-x-old:bh:bcl:Alabamabi:Alabamabo:bs:Alabama(stad)bg:ca:Alabama()cs:Alabamaco:Alabamacy:Alabamada:Alabamade:AlabamaHahoodzoet:Alabamael:es:Alabamaeo:Alabamoeu:Alabamafa:hif:Alabamafo:Alabamafr:Alabamafy:Alabamaga:Alabamagv:Alabamagag:Alabamagd:Alabamagl:Alabamagu:hak:-l-p-mhaw:Alapama()hi:hr:Alabamaio:Alabamaig:Alabamabpy:id:Alabamaia:Alabamaie:Alabamaiu:/aalaapaamaaik:Alabama()is:Alabamait:Alabamahe:jv:Alabamakn:pam:Alabamaka:kw:Alabamasw:Alabamaht:Alabamaku:Alabamalad:Alabamala:Alabamalv:Alabama(Bundesstaat)lt:Alabamalij:Alabamm-ali:Alabamajbo:alybamaslmo:Alabamahu:Alabamamk:mg:Alabamaml:mi:Alabamamr:arz:ms:Alabamamwl:Alabamamn:nah:Alabama()nl:Alabama(stoat)ja:nap:Alabamafrr:Alabamano:Alabamann:Alabamaoc:Alabamauz:Alabamapnb:pap:Alabamapms:Alabamands:Alabamapl:Alabamapt:Alabamaro:Alabamarm:Alabamasuyuru:sah:sa:sq:Alabamascn:Alabamasimple:Alabamask:Alabamasl:Alabamaszl:Alabamaso:Alabamackb:sr:sh:Alabamafi:Alabamasv:Alabamatl:Alabamata:tt:te:th:tr:Alabamauk:ur:Shitativi:Alabamavo:Alabamawar:Alabamayi:Alabamadiq:Alabamabat-smg:Alabamazh:
359
List_of_Atlas_Shrugged_characters
This is a list of characters in Rands novel Shrugged.Major charactersThe following are major characters from the novel.(Characters are listed as major if they meet one of the following criteria:*they are listed as major characters in a widely available study guide, such as CliffsNotes, SparkNotes, or Gales Novels for Students;*they are listed as primary heroic or arch-villain characters in Gladsteins The New Ayn Rand Companion;*they are the focus of an essay in a scholarly book about the novel, such as Essays on Ayn Rands Atlas Shrugged or Ayn Rands Atlas Shrugged.)ProtagonistsDagny TaggartImage:Taylor-Schilling-as-Dagny-Taggart.jpg|thumb|upright0.56|right|Schilling as Dagny Taggart in the 2011 film.Dagny Taggart is the protagonist of the novel. She is Vice-President in Charge of Operations for Taggart Transcontinental, under her brother, James Taggart. However, due to James incompetence, it is Dagny who is responsible for all the workings of the railroad.Dagny has three romantic relationships, each with a man of ability: dAnconia, Rearden, and Galt. Galt marks the pinnacle of everything Dagny seeks in the world and is the kind of man alluded to in her youth when she imagines a man standing off in the distance, at the end of a great set of railroad tracks and all her struggles.The essential drama of Dagnys character is her struggle to reconcile the life she lives and the railroad which she loves with the moral code of those who wish to destroy it. She believes these destroyers simply want to heap burdens upon her for the sake of others, which she has the ability to carry. Like Hank, she believes they want to live, but are too stupid and incompetent to realize how their duties and altruistic projects impede that goal. It is not until she sees the man most important to her in the world - John Galt - strapped to a torture machine, about to be killed by the looters (who recognize, too, that he is the only man who can save them from economic collapse), that she realizes that the moral code of the looters is one of death: they recognize what is good and necessary for life, but wish to destroy it anyway.She is a typical heroine, similar to Francon (The Fountainhead) or Argounova (We the Living).Francisco dAnconiaFrancisco dAnconia is one of the central characters in Atlas Shrugged, and owner by inheritance of the worlds largest copper mining empire. He is a childhood friend, and the first love, of Dagny Taggart.A child prodigy of exceptional talents, Francisco was dubbed the climax of the dAnconia line, an already prestigious family of skilled industrialists. He attended Patrick Henry University and was a classmate of John Galt and Ragnar Danneskjld and student of both Hugh Akston and Robert Stadler. He began working at a young age, while still in school, proving that he could have made a successful career on his own merits without the aid of his familys wealth and power. Francisco is one of the strikers and is slowly destroying the dAnconia empire to put it out of the raiders reach. His actions were designed both to trap looters into relying upon his worthless ventures in order to disrupt their schemes and to try to show the inevitable consequences of looting. He adopted the persona of a worthless playboy, by which he is known to the world, as an effective cover. However, he is forced to give up Dagny, knowing that she would not be ready to join the strikers. He remains deeply in love with her throughout the book, while also being a good and loyal friend of her other two lovers, Hank Rearden and John Galt.His full name is Francisco Domingo Carlos Andres Sebastian dAnconia.John GaltThe enigmatic John Galt is the primary male hero of Atlas Shrugged. He initially appears as an unnamed menial worker for Taggart Transcontinental, who often dines with Eddie Willers in the employees cafeteria, and leads Eddie to reveal important information about Dagny Taggart and Taggart Transcontinental. Only Eddies side of their conversations is given in the novel. Eddie tells him which suppliers and contractors Dagny is most dependent on; these men are consistently the next to disappear. Later in the novel, the reader discovers this workers true identity.Henry Hank ReardenHenry (also known as Hank) is one of the central characters in Shrugged. Like many of Rands capitalist characters, he is a self-made man. He owns the most important steel company in the United States. He invents Rearden Metal, an alloy stronger than steel (with similar properties to stainless steel). He lives in Philadelphia with his wife Lillian, his brother Philip, and his elderly mother, all of whom he supports.Hank Rearden knows something is wrong with the world but he is unable to define the problem. His friend, Francisco dAnconia, helps him understand and by this mechanism the reader is also prepared to understand the secret when it is revealed explicitly in Galts Speech. Rearden also serves to illustrate Rands theory of sex. Lillian Rearden cannot appreciate Hank Reardens virtues, and she is portrayed as being disgusted by sex. Dagny Taggart clearly does appreciate Reardens virtues, and this appreciation evolves into sexual desire. Rearden is torn because he accepts the premises of the traditional view of sex as a lower instinct, but he responds sexually to Dagny, who represents his highest values. Rearden struggles to resolve this internal conflict, and in doing so, illustrates Rands sexual theory.Ragnar DanneskjldOne of the original strikers, he is now world famous as a pirate. Ragnar attended Patrick Henry University and became friends with John Galt and Francisco dAnconia while studying under Hugh Akston and Robert Stadler. Danneskjld seizes relief ships that are being sent from the States to The Peoples States of Europe. As the novel progresses, Danneskjld begins to become active in American waters. Danneskjlds action is to restore to other creative people the money, in gold, which was unjustly taken away from themspecifically, their tax payments.  He explains this is not altruism; his motivation is to ensure that once those espousing Galts philosophy are restored to their rightful place in society, they will have enough capital to rebuild the world.Kept in the background for much of the book, Danneskjld makes a personal appearance when he risks his life to meet Hank Rearden in the night and hand him a bar of gold as an advance payment to encourage Rearden to persevere in his increasingly difficult situation. Danneskjld is married to the actress Kay Ludlow; their relationship is kept hidden from the outside world, which only knows of Ludlow as a star who retired and dropped out of sight. It is mentioned that some of the strikers have strong reservations about his way of conducting the common struggle.According to Branden, who was closely associated with Rand at the time the book was written, there were sections written describing Danneskjlds adventures at sea, which were cut from the final published text.(Reedstrom, Karen. 1992 Interview with Full Context. Barbara Branden interview in Full Context, October 1992. Republished on barbarabranden.com. Retrieved 1 June 2007.) In the published book, Danneskjld is always seen through the eyes of others (Dagny Taggart or Hank Rearden), except for a brief paragraph in the very last chapter.AntagonistsJames TaggartThe President of Taggart Transcontinental and the books most important antagonist. Taggart is an expert influence peddler who is, however, incapable of making operational decisions on his own. He relies on his sister, Dagny Taggart, to actually run the railroad, but nonetheless opposes her in almost every endeavor. In a sense, he is the antithesis of Dagny.As the novel progresses, the moral philosophy of the looters is revealed: it is a code of stagnation. The goal of this code is to not exist, to not move forward, to become a zero. Taggart struggles to remain unaware that this is his goal. He maintains his pretense that he wants to live, and becomes horrified whenever his mind starts to grasp the truth about himself. This contradiction leads to the recurring absurdity of his life: the desire to destroy those on whom his life depends, and the horror that he will succeed at this. In the final chapters of the novel, he suffers a complete mental breakdown upon realizing that he can no longer deceive himself in this respect.Lillian ReardenThe unsupportive wife of Hank Rearden. They have been married eight years as the novel begins. Lillian is a frigid moocher who seeks to destroy her husband. She compares being Reardens wife with owning the worlds most powerful horse. Since she cannot comfortably ride a horse that goes too fast, she must bridle it down to her level, even if that means it will never reach its full potential and its power will be grievously wasted. Lillian tolerates sex with her husband only because she is realistic enough to know he is just a brute who requires satisfaction of his brute instincts. She indicates that she abhors Francisco dAnconia, because she believes he is a sexual adventurer.As her motives become more clear, Lillian is found to share the sentiments of many other moochers and their worship of destruction. Her actions are explained as the desire to destroy achievement in the false belief that such an act bestows a greatness to the destroyer equal to the accomplishment destroyed. She seeks, then, to ruin Rearden in an effort to prove her own value.Lillian achieves her goal to destroy Reardens business, when she passes on information to James Taggart about her husbands affair. This information is used to persuade Rearden to sign the Gift Certificate (which delivers all the property rights of Rearden Metal to the looters) and thereby destroys his business. Lillian discovers that she can accomplish her goal to destroy the business but she can neither achieve the greatness she desires nor her goal to destroy Hanks character. She uses James Taggart for sex as victory and revenge against Hank and Dagny. This does give her the satisfaction she desires and she continues to manipulate Hank until he is finally leaves her and joins Galts strikers.Dr. Floyd FerrisFerris is a biologist who works as co-ordinator at the State Science Institute. He uses his position there to deride reason and productive achievement, and publishes a book entitled Why Do You Think You Think? He clashes on several occasions with Hank Rearden, and twice attempts to blackmail Rearden into giving up Rearden Metal. He is also one of the group of looters who tries to get Rearden to agree to the Steel Unification Plan. Ferris hosts the demonstration of the Project X weapon, and is the creator of the Ferris Persuader, a torture machine. When John Galt is captured by the looters, Ferris uses the device on Galt, but it breaks down before extracting the information Ferris wants from Galt. Ferris represents the group which uses brute force on the heroes to achieve the ends of the looters.Dr. Robert StadlerA former professor at Patrick Henry University, mentor to Francisco dAnconia, John Galt and Ragnar Danneskjld. He has since become a sell-out, one who had great promise but squandered it for social approval, to the detriment of the free. He works at the State Science Institute where all his inventions are perverted for use by the military, including the instrument of his demise: Project X (Xylophone). The character was, in part, modeled on Robert Oppenheimer, whom Rand had interviewed for an earlier project, and his part in the creation of weapons.(David Harriman, of Ayn Rand, pp. 311-344, esp. 330-331.) To his former student Galt, Stadler represents the epitome of human evil, as the man who knew better but chose not to act for the good.Wesley MouchThe incompetent and treacherous lobbyist  whom Hank Rearden reluctantly employs in Washington. Later in the novel, he becomes the countrys economic dictator.Secondary charactersThe following secondary characters also appear in the novel.(Secondary characters are listed if they appear in character lists from any of the works used to establish the list of major characters above, but do not meet the criteria for major. Minor characters who are not listed in secondary works are not listed here.)*Hugh Akston is identified as One of the last great advocates of reason. He was a renowned philosopher and the head of the Department of Philosophy at Patrick Henry University, where he taught Francisco dAnconia, John Galt, and Ragnar Danneskjld. He was, along with Robert Stadler, a father figure to these three. Akstons name is so hallowed that a young lady, on hearing that Francisco had studied under him, is shocked. She thought he must have been one of those great names from an earlier century. He now works as a cook in a roadside diner, and proves extremely skillful at that. When Dagny tracks him down, and before she discovers his true identity, he rejects her enthusiastic offer to manage the dining car services for Taggart Transcontinental.*Jeff Allen is a tramp who stows away on a Taggart train during one of Dagnys cross-country trips. Instead of throwing him out, she allows him to ride as her guest. It is from Allen that she learns the full story behind the collapse of the Twentieth Century Motor Company (Rands extensive metaphor for the inherent flaws of communism), as well as a hint of John Galts true background.*Calvin Atwood is owner of Atwood Light and Power Company and joins Galts strike.*Cherryl Brooks is a dime store shopgirl who marries James Taggart after a chance encounter in her store the night the John Galt Line was falsely deemed his greatest success.  She marries him thinking he is the heroic person behind Taggart Transcontinental. Cherryl is at first harsh towards Dagny, having believed Jim Taggarts descriptions of his sister, until she questions employees of the railroad. Upon learning that her scorn had been misdirected, Cherryl puts off apologizing to Dagny out of shame until the night before she commits suicide, when she confesses to Dagny that when she married Jim, she thought he had the heroic qualities that she had looked up to - she thought she was marrying someone like Dagny. Upon realizing the nature of the moral code surrounding her, the apparent lack of escape for herself and the heroes she worships, and her unnamed desire to remove support from the machinations she abhors, Cherryl throws herself from a bridge to her death after witnessing her husband James Taggart sleeping with Lillian Rearden and after being beaten for showing James his code of death.*Mayor Bascom is the mayor of Rome, Wisconsin, who reveals part of the history of the Twentieth Century Motor Company.*Bill Brent is the chief dispatcher for the Colorado Division of Taggart Transcontinental, who tries to prevent the Taggart Tunnel disaster.*Dr. Blodgett is the scientist who pulls the lever to demonstrate Project X.*Orren Boyle is the head of Associated Steel antithesis of Hank Rearden and a friend of James Taggart. He is an investor in the San Sebastin Mines.*Laura Bradford is an actress and Kip Chalmerss mistress.*Kip Chalmers is a Washington man who has decided to run for election as Legislator from California. On the way to his campaign, the Taggart Transcontinental train that is carrying him encounters a split rail, resulting in the destruction of its diesel engine. His demands lead to a coal-burning steam engine being attached to his train in its stead and used to pull it through an eight-mile tunnel. The result is the suffocation of all passengers and the destruction of the Taggart Tunnel.*Emma Chalmers, Kip Chalmerss mother, gains some influence after his death. Known as Kips Ma, she starts a soybean-growing project in Louisiana and commandeers thousands of railcars to move the harvest. As a result, the years wheat crop from Minnesota never reaches the rest of the country, but instead rots in storage; also, the soybean crop is lost, having been reaped too early.*Dan Conway is the middle-aged president of the Phoenix-Durango railroad. Running a railroad is just about the only thing he knows. When the Anti-dog-eat-dog Rule is used to drive his business out of Colorado, he loses the will to fight, and resigns himself to a quiet life of books and fishing.*Ken Danagger owns Danagger Coal in Pennsylvania. He helps Hank Rearden illegally make Rearden Metal, then later decides to quit and join Galts strike moments before Dagny arrives to try to persuade him otherwise.*Quentin Daniels is an enterprising engineer hired by Dagny Taggart to reconstruct John Galts motor. Partway through this process, Quentin withdraws his effort for the same reasons John Galt himself had. Dagnys pursuit of Quentin leads her to Galts Gulch.*Sebastian dAnconia was the 16th (or 17th) Century founder of the dAnconia dynasty. Escaped from Spain because of expressing his opinions too freely and coming in conflict with the Inquisition, leaving behind a palace and his beloved. Started a small mine in South America, which became the beginning of a mining empire and a new fortune (and a new palace). Eventually sent for his beloved who had waited for him many years. He is the role model which Francisco dAnconia looks to, as Dagny Taggart looks to Nathaniel Taggart. Francisco remarks that their respective ancestors would have liked each other.*Balph Eubank is called the literary leader of the age, despite the fact that he has never sold more than three thousand copies of his books. He complains that it is disgraceful that artists are treated as peddlers, and that there should be a law limiting the sales of books to ten thousand copies.*The Fishwife is one of the strikers, who earns her living by providing the fish for Hammonds grocery market; she is described as having dark, disheveled hair and large eyes, and is a writer. Galt says she wouldnt be published outside. She believes that when one deals with words, one deals with the mind. According to Branden in her book Passion of Ayn Rand, The Fishwife is Ayns Hitchcock-like appearance in Atlas Shrugged.()*Lawrence Hammond runs Hammond Cars in Colorado, one of the few companies in existence that still produces top-quality vehicles. He eventually quits and joins the strike.*Richard Halley is Dagny Taggarts favorite composer, who mysteriously disappeared after the evening of his greatest triumph. Halley spent years as a struggling and unappreciated composer. At age 24, his opera Phaethon was performed for the first time, to an audience who booed and heckled it. After 19 years, Phaethon was performed again, but this time it was received to the greatest ovation the opera house had ever heard. The following day, Halley retired, sold the rights to his music, and disappeared.*Mrs. William Hastings is the widow of the chief engineer at the Twentieth Century Motor Company. Her husband quit shortly after Galt did and joined the strike some years later. Her lead allows Dagny to find Hugh Akston.*Dr. Thomas Hendricks is a famous brain surgeon who developed a new method of preventing strokes. He joined Galts strike when the American medical system was put under government control.*Tinky Holloway is one of the looters and is frequently referred to and quoted by other characters in the story, but he has only has one major appearance: during the Washington meeting with Hank Rearden.*Lee Hunsacker is in charge of a company called Amalgamated Service when takes over the Twentieth Century Motor Company. He files a lawsuit that eventually leads to Midas Mulligan and Judge Narragansett joining the strike.*Gwen Ives is Hank Reardens secretary.*Owen Kellogg is Assistant to the Manager of the Taggart Terminal in York. He catches Dagny Taggarts eye as one of the few competent men on staff. After seeing the sorry state of the Ohio Division, she decides to make him its new Superintendent. However, as soon as she returns to New York, Kellogg informs her that he is quitting his job. Owen Kellogg eventually reaches, and settles in, Galts Gulch.*Fred Kinnan is a labor leader and member of the looter cabal. Unlike the others, however, Kinnan is straightforward and honest about his purpose. Kinnan is the only one to openly state the true motivations of himself and his fellow conspirators. At the end of Galts 3 hour speech, he expresses admiration for the man, as he says what he means. Despite this, Kinnan admits that he is one of the people Galt is out to destroy.*Paul Larkin is an unsuccessful, middle-aged businessman, a friend of the Rearden family. He meets with the other Looters to work out a plan to bring Rearden down. James Taggart knows he is friends with Hank Rearden and challenges his loyalty, and Larkin assures Taggart that he will go along with them.*Eugene Lawson heads the Community Bank of Madison, then gets a job with the government when it goes bankrupt.*Mort Liddy is a hack composer who writes trite scores for movies and modern symphonies to which no one listens. He believes melody is a primitive vulgarity. He is one of Lillian Reardens friends and a member of the cultural elite.*Clifton Locey is a friend of Jim Taggart who takes the position of vice-president of operation when Dagny Taggart quits.*Pat Logan is the engineer on the first run of the John Galt Line. He later strikes.*Kay Ludlow is a beautiful actress and the wife of Ragnar Danneskjld.*Dick McNamara is a contractor who finished the San Sebastian Line. Dagny Taggart plans to hire him to lay the new Rearden Metal track for the Rio Norte Line, but before she does so, he mysteriously disappears. She later discovers that he has joined the strike and settled in Galts Gulch.*Cuffy Meigs is the Director of Unification for the railroad business. He carries a pistol and a lucky rabbits foot, and he dresses in a military uniform, and has been described as impervious to thought. Meigs seizes control of Project X and accidentally destroys it, demolishing the countrys last railroad bridge across the Mississippi River and killing himself, his men, and Dr. Stadler.*Dave Mitchum is a state-hired superintendent of the Colorado Division of Taggart Transcontinental. He is partially responsible for the Taggart Tunnel disaster.*Chick Morrison holds the position of Morale Conditioner in the government.*Horace Bussby Mowen is the president of the Amalgamated Switch and Signal Company, Inc. of Connecticut. He is a businessman who sees nothing wrong with the moral code that is destroying society and would never dream of saying he is in business for any reason other than the good of society. Dagny Taggart hires Mowen to produce switches made of Rearden Metal. He is reluctant to build anything with this unproven technology, and has to be cajoled into accepting the contract. When pressured by public opinion, he discontinues production of the switches, forcing Dagny to find an alternative source.*Midas Mulligan is a wealthy banker who mysteriously disappeared in protest after he was given a court order to lend money to an incompetent applicant. When the order came down he liquidated his entire business, paid off his depositors, and joined Galts strike. Mulligans birth name was Michael, but he had it legally changed after a news article called him Midas in a derogatory fashion, which Mulligan took as a compliment.*Judge Narragansett is an American jurist who ruled in favor of Midas Mulligan during the case brought against him by the incompetent loan applicant. When Narragansetts ruling was reversed on appeal, he retired and joined the strike. At the end of the novel, he is seen editing the States Constitution, crossing out the contradicting amendments of it and adding an amendment to prohibit Congress from passing laws that restrain freedom of trade.*Ben Nealy is a railroad contractor whom Dagny Taggart hires to replace the track on the Rio Norte Line with Rearden Metal. Nealy is incompetent, but Dagny can find no one better in all the country. Nealy believes that anything can get done with enough muscle power. He sees no role for intelligence in human achievement. He relies on Dagny and Ellis Wyatt to run things, and resents them for doing it, because it appears to him like they are just bossing people around.*Betty Pope is a wealthy socialite who is having a meaningless sexual affair with James Taggart. She is deliberately crude in a way that casts ridicule on her high social position.*Dr. Potter holds some undefined position with the State Science Institute. He is sent to try to obtain the rights to Rearden Metal.*Dr. Simon Pritchett is the prestigious head of the Department of Philosophy at Patrick Henry University and is considered the leading philosopher of the age. He believes that man is nothing but a collection of chemicals, reason is a superstition, it is futile to seek meaning in life, and the duty of a philosopher is to show that nothing can be understood.*Reardens mother, whose name is not mentioned, lives with Rearden at his home in Philadelphia. She is involved in charity work, and berates Rearden whenever she can. She dotes on her weak son Philip Rearden.*Philip Rearden is the younger brother of Hank Rearden. He lives in his brothers home in Philadelphia and is completely dependent on him. He is resentful of his brothers charity.*Dwight Sanders owns Sanders Aircraft, a producer of high-quality airplanes, and joins the strike.*Bertram Scudder is an editorial writer for the magazine The Future. He typically bashes business and businessmen, but he never says anything specific in his articles, relying on innuendo, sneers, and denunciation. He wrote a hatchet job on Hank Rearden called The Octopus. He is also vocal in support of the Equalization of Opportunity Bill.*Claude Slagenhop is president of political organization Friends of Global Progress and one of Lillian Reardens friends. He believes that ideas are just air, that this is no time for talk, but for action. Global Progress is a sponsor of the Equalization of Opportunity Bill.*Gerald and Ivy Starnes are the two surviving children of Jed Starnes; together with their since-deceased brother Eric, they instituted a communistic payment-and-benefits program at Twentieth Century Motors which drove the company into bankruptcy. Gerald, a dying alcoholic, and Ivy, a pseudo-Buddhist ascetic, continue to insist that the plan was perfect and that the failure of their fathers company was entirely due to the workers.*Andrew Stockton runs the Stockton Foundry in Stockton, Colorado. When he joins the strike, he opens a foundry in Galts Gulch.*Nathaniel Taggart was the founder of Taggart Transcontinental. He built his railroad without any government handouts, and ran the business for no other reason than to turn a profit. He began as a penniless adventurer and ended up as one of the wealthiest men in the country. He never earned money by force or fraud, and never apologized for becoming wealthy and successful. He was one of the most hated men of his time. Dagny is often inspired by looking at a statue of Nat Taggart at the railroad headquarters.*Mr. Thompson is the Head of the State for the States. He is not particularly intelligent and has a very undistinguished look. He knows politics, however, and is a master of public relations and back-room deals. Rands notes indicate that she modeled him on President S. Truman, and that she deliberately decided not to call him of the United States as this title has honorable connotations which the character does not deserve.*Lester Tuck is the press agent for Kip Chalmers.*Clem Weatherby is a government representative on the board of directors of Taggart Transcontinental. Dagny considers him the least bad of the government representatives, since he does have some real knowledge on the running of trains. She notices, however, that he is the least appreciated by his own bosses.*The Wet Nurse (Tony) is a young bureaucrat sent by the government to watch over Reardens mills. Though he starts out as a cynical follower of the looters code, his experience at the mills transforms him, and he comes to respect and admire the producers. He is shot attempting to inform Hank Rearden about a government plot, but does succeed in warning Rearden just before he dies.*Edwin Eddie Willers is the Special Assistant to the Vice-President in Charge of Operations at Taggart Transcontinental. He grew up with Dagny Taggart. His father and grandfather worked for the Taggarts, and he followed in their footsteps. He is completely loyal to Dagny and to Taggart Transcontinental. He is also secretly in love with Dagny. Willers is generally assumed to represent the common man: someone who does not possess the Promethean creative ability of The Strikers, but matches them in moral courage and is capable of appreciating and making use of their creations. He sticks it out with the railway to the bitter end, even when the old world is obviously collapsing and Dagny has shifted her attention and loyalty to saving the captive Galt. In the end, he stays with the broken-down Comet in the middle of the desert, like a captain going down with his ship. It is unclear whether or not the strikers or anyone else will return to save him.*Ellis Wyatt is the head of Wyatt Oil. He has almost single-handedly revived the economy of Colorado by discovering a new process for extracting more oil from what were thought to be exhausted oil wells. When first introduced, he is aggressive towards Dagny, whom he does not yet know and whom he blames for what are, in fact, her brothers policies which directly threaten his business. When the government passes laws and decrees which make it impossible for him to continue, he sets all his oil wells on fire, leaving a jeering note: I am leaving it as I found it. Take over. Its yours. One particular burning well that resists all efforts to extinguish it becomes known as Wyatts Torch. Later Dagny meets him in Galts Gulch.NotesReferences****des personnages de La Grve
624
Alaska
 Website                www.alaska.govAlaska  is the largest state in the United States by area. It is situated in the northwest extremity of the North American continent, with Canada to the east, the Arctic Ocean to the north, and the Pacific Ocean to the west and south, with Russia further west across the Strait. Approximately half of Alaskas 710,231 residents (as per the United States Census) live within the metropolitan area. Alaska is the least densely populated state of the U.S.()Alaska was purchased from the Empire on March 30, 1867, for $7.2 million ($ in todays dollars) at about two cents per acre ($4.74/km). The land went through several administrative changes before becoming an organized (or incorporated) territory on May 11, 1912, and the 49th state of the U.S. on January 3, 1959.The name Alaska () was already introduced in the Russian colonial period, when it was used only for the peninsula and is derived from the Aleut alaxsxaq, meaning the mainland or more literally, the object towards which the action of the sea is directed.(Ransom, J. Ellis. 1940. Derivation of the Word Alaska. American Anthropologist n.s., 42: pp. 550551) It is also known as Alyeska, the great land, an Aleut word derived from the same root.GeographyAlaska has a longer coastline than all the other U.S. states combined.() It is the only non-contiguous U.S. state on continental North America; about  of British Columbia (Canada) separate Alaska from Washington state. Alaska is thus an exclave of the United States. It is technically part of the continental U.S., but is often not included in colloquial use; Alaska is not part of the contiguous U.S., often called the Lower 48.(The other three exclaves of the United States are the Angle of Minnesota, Roberts, Washington and Vermont.)  The capital city, Juneau, is situated on the mainland of the North American continent, but is not connected by road to the rest of the North American highway system.The state is bordered by the Territory and Columbia in Canada, to the east, the of Alaska and the Pacific Ocean to the south, the Sea, Strait, and Sea to the west and the Arctic Ocean to the north. Alaskas territorial waters touch Russias territorial waters in the Bering Strait, as the Russian Diomede Island and Alaskan Diomede Island are only  apart.  With the extension of the Islands into the eastern hemisphere, it is technically both the westernmost and easternmost state in the United States, as well as also being the northernmost.area compared to conterminous US.svg|thumb|Alaskas size compared with the 48 contiguous states.Alaska is the largest state in the United States in land area at , over twice the size of Texas, the next largest state. Alaska is larger than all but 18 sovereign countries.Counting territorial waters, Alaska is larger than the combined area of the next three largest states: Texas, California, and Montana. It is also larger than the combined area of the 22 smallest U.S. states.RegionsThere are no officially defined borders demarcating the various regions of Alaska, but there are six generally accepted regions:South CentralThe most populous region of Alaska, containing Anchorage, the Valley and the Peninsula.  Rural, mostly unpopulated areas south of the Range and west of the Mountains also fall within the definition of Southcentral, as well as the William Sound area and the communities of Cordova and Valdez.SoutheastAlso known as the Panhandle, this is the region of Alaska closest to the rest of the United States, and hence was where most initial non-Native settlement occurred following the Purchase. It contains the state capital, Juneau, the former capital, Sitka, and the large town of Ketchikan.  The road systems leading from these cities are strictly local;  no roads connect these communities to each other or any other communities apart from their own suburbs.  The region is dominated by the Archipelago as well as the National Forest, the largest national forest in the United States.InteriorFile:Denali Mt McKinley.jpg|thumb|right|McKinley is both the highest peak in Alaska and in all of North America.The largest region of Alaska, much of it uninhabited wilderness.  Fairbanks is the only community of any significant size.  Small towns and Native villages are scattered throughout, mostly along the highway and river systems.  National Park and Preserve is located here, home to McKinley (also widely known by its local name of Denali), the highest point in North America.SouthwestFile:Grizzly Bear Fishing Brooks Falls.jpg|thumb|upright|bear fishing for salmon at Brooks Falls.A sparsely inhabited region stretching some  inland from the Bering Sea. Most of the population lives along the coast. Island is also located in Southwest. The massive Delta, one of the largest river deltas in the world, is here.  Portions of the Peninsula are considered part of Southwest, with the remaining portions included with the Aleutian Islands (see below).North SlopeThe North Slope is mostly tundra peppered with small villages. The area is known for its massive reserves of crude oil, and contains both the Petroleum ReserveAlaska and the Bay Oil Field.() Barrow, the northernmost city in the United States, is located here.  The Northwest Arctic area, anchored by Kotzebue and also containing the River valley, is often regarded as being part of this region.  However, the respective Inupiat of the North Slope and of the Northwest Arctic seldom think of themselves as one.Aleutian IslandsMore than 300 small, volcanic islands make up this chain, which stretches over  into the Pacific Ocean. The Date Line was drawn west of 180 to keep the whole state, and thus the entire North American continent, within the same legal day.  However, because some of these islands fall in the Eastern Hemisphere, this makes Alaska the northernmost, easternmost and westernmost state in the union, with the southernmost state being Hawaii.  Two of the islands, Attu and Kiska, were occupied by Japanese forces during World War II.Natural featuresFile:Augustine Volcano Jan 12 2006 edited-1.jpg|right|thumb|Volcano erupting on January 12, 2006.With its myriad islands, Alaska has nearly  of tidal shoreline. The Islands chain extends west from the southern tip of the Peninsula. Many active volcanoes are found in the Aleutians and in coastal regions. Island, for example, is home to Shishaldin, which is an occasionally smoldering volcano that rises to  above the North Pacific. It is the most perfect volcanic cone on Earth, even more symmetrical than Japans Fuji. The chain of volcanoes extends to Spurr, west of Anchorage on the mainland. Geologists have identified Alaska as part of Wrangellia, a large region consisting of multiple states and Canadian provinces in the Northwest which is actively undergoing continent building.One of the worlds largest tides occurs in Arm, just south of Anchorage  tidal differences can be more than . (Many sources say Turnagain has the second-greatest tides in North America, but several areas in Canada have larger tides.)()Alaska has more than three million lakes.()() Marshlands and wetland permafrost cover  (mostly in northern, western and southwest flatlands). Glacier ice covers some  of land and  of tidal zone. The Glacier complex near the southeastern border with Yukon covers  alone. With over 100,000, Alaska has half of the worlds glaciers.Land ownershipAccording to an October 1998 report by the States Bureau of Land Management, approximately 65% of Alaska is owned and managed by the U.S. federal government as public lands, including a multitude of national forests, national parks, and wildlife refuges. Of these, the of Land Management manages  , or 23.8% of the state. The National Wildlife Refuge is managed by the States Fish and Wildlife Service. It is the worlds largest wildlife refuge, comprising .Of the remaining land area, the state of Alaska owns ;  its entitlement under the Statehood Act.  A portion of that acreage is occasionally ceded to organized boroughs, under the statutory provisions pertaining to newly-formed boroughs.  Smaller portions are set aside for rural subdivisions and other homesteading-related opportunities, though these are infrequently popular due to the often remote and roadless locations.  The of Alaska, as a grant university, also owns substantial acreage which it manages independently.Another  are owned by 12 regional, and scores of local, Native corporations created under the Native Claims Settlement Act.  Regional Native corporation Limited often promotes itself as the largest private landowner in Alaska in advertisements and other communications.  Provisions of ANCSA allowing the corporations land holdings to be sold on the open market starting in 1991 were repealed before they could take effect.  Effectively, the corporations hold title (including subsurface title in many cases, a privilege denied to individual Alaskans) but cannot sell the land.  Individual Native allotments can be and are sold on the open market, however.Various private interests own the remaining land, totaling about one percent of the state.  Alaska is, by a large margin, the state with the smallest percentage of private land ownership when Native corporation holdings are excluded.ClimateThe climate in Juneau and the southeast panhandle is a mid-latitude climate (climate classification Cfb) in the southern sections and a subarctic oceanic climate (Kppen Cfc) in the northern parts. On an annual basis, the panhandle is both the wettest and warmest part of Alaska with milder temperatures in the winter and high precipitation throughout the year. Juneau averages over  of precipitation a year, while other areas receive over .(Mean Annual Precipitation in Alaska-Yukon. Oregon Climate Service at State University. Retrieved October 23, 2006. ) This is also the only region in Alaska in which the average daytime high temperature is above freezing during the winter months.The climate of Anchorage and south central Alaska is mild by Alaskan standards due to the regions proximity to the seacoast. While the area gets less rain than southeast Alaska, it gets more snow, and days tend to be clearer. On average, Anchorage receives  of precipitation a year, with around  of snow, although there are areas in the south central which receive far more snow. It is a subarctic climate (Kppen Dfc) due to its brief, cool summers.beach.jpg|thumb|Barrow, known colloquially for many years by the nickname Top of the World, is the northernmost city in the United States.The climate of Western Alaska is determined in large part by the Bering Sea and the Gulf of Alaska. It is a subarctic oceanic climate in the southwest and a continental subarctic climate farther north. The temperature is somewhat moderate considering how far north the area is. This region has a tremendous amount of variety in precipitation.  An area stretching from the northern side of the Seward Peninsula to the River valley is technically a desert, with portions receiving less than  of precipitation annually.  On the other extreme, some locations between Dillingham and Bethel average around  of precipitation.(The climate of the interior of Alaska is subarctic. Some of the highest and lowest temperatures in Alaska occur around the area near Fairbanks. The summers may have temperatures reaching into the 90sF (the low to mid 30s C), while in the winter, the temperature can fall below . Precipitation is sparse in the Interior, often less than  a year, but what precipitation falls in the winter tends to stay the entire winter.The highest and lowest recorded temperatures in Alaska are both in the Interior. The highest is  in Fort Yukon (which is just  inside the arctic circle) on June 27, 1915,()() making Alaska tied with Hawaii as the state with the lowest high temperature in the United States.()() The lowest official Alaska temperature is  in Prospect Creek on January 23, 1971,(( one degree above the lowest temperature recorded in continental North America (in Snag, Yukon, Canada).()The climate in the extreme north of Alaska is Arctic (Kppen ET) with long, very cold winters and short, cool summers. Even in July, the average low temperature in Barrow is .(History for Barrow, Alaska. Monthly Summary for July 2006. Weather Underground. Retrieved October 23, 2006.) Precipitation is light in this part of Alaska, with many places averaging less than  per year, mostly as snow which stays on the ground almost the entire year.HistoryAlaska nativesNumerous indigenous peoples occupied Alaska for thousands of years before the arrival of European peoples to the area. The Tlingit people developed a matriarchal society in what is today Southeast Alaska, along with parts of British Columbia and the Yukon. Also in Southeast were the Haida, now well known for their unique arts, and the Tsimshian people, whose population were decimated by a smallpox epidemic in the 1860s. The Aleutian Islands are still home to the Aleut peoples seafaring society, although they were among the first to be exploited by the Russians. Western and Southwestern Alaska are home to the Yupik, while their cousins the Alutiiq lived in what is now Southcentral Alaska. The Gwichin people of the northern Interior region are primarily known today for their dependence on the caribou within the much-contested National Wildlife Refuge. The North Slope and Diomede Island are occupied by the widespread Inuit people.ColonizationFile:Miners climb Chilkoot.jpg|thumb|Miners and prospectors climb the Trail during the Gold Rush.Some researchers believe that the first Russian settlement in Alaska was established in century.( . .      XVII .? . ., 1992.  4. .6769.) According to this hypothesis, in 1648 several koches of Dezhnyovs expedition were thrown to Alaska by storm and founded this settlement. This hypothesis is based on the message of Chukchi geographer Daurkin who had visited Alaska in 17641765 and reported about village on the Kheuveren river, populated by bearded men who pray to the icons. Some modern researchers associate Kheuveren with River.(http://www.fartuna.ru/go.php?ad489047)It is usually assumed that the first European boat to reach Alaska was St. Gabriel under the authority of the surveyor M. S. Gvozdev and assistant navigator I. Fyodorov on August 21, 1732 during expedition of Siberian cossak A. F. Shestakov adb Belorussian explorer D. I. Pavlutsky (17291735)( . .   . //     : - .  . 3.  2000.  .   . .-.: , 1993.)Another European contact with Alaska occurred in 1741, when Bering led an expedition for the Russian Navy aboard the St. Peter. After his crew returned to Russia with sea otter pelts judged to be the finest fur in the world, small associations of fur traders began to sail from the shores of Siberia towards the Aleutian islands. The first permanent European settlement was founded in 1784. Between 1774 and 1800 Spain sent several expeditions to Alaska in order to assert its claim over the Pacific Northwest. In 1789 a Spanish settlement and fort were built in Sound. These expeditions gave names to places such as Valdez, Sound, and Cordova. Later, the Company carried out an expanded colonization program during the early-to-mid-19th century.Sitka, renamed Archangel from 1804 to 1867, on Island in the Archipelago in what is now Alaska, became the capital of America and remained the capital after the colony was transferred to the United States. The Russians never fully colonized Alaska, and the colony was never very profitable.H. Seward, the States Secretary of State, negotiated the Purchase (also known as Sewards Folly) with the Russians in 1867 for $7.2 million. Alaska was loosely governed by the military initially, and was administered as a district starting in 1884, with a governor appointed by the president of the United States, as well as a district court headquartered in Sitka.For most of Alaskas first decade under the American flag, Sitka was the only community inhabited by American settlers.  They organized a provisional city government, which was Alaskas first city government, but not in a legal sense.  Legislation allowing Alaskan communities to legally incorporate as cities did not come about until 1900, and home rule for cities was extremely limited or unavailable until statehood took effect.U.S. TerritoryStarting in the 1890s and stretching in some places to the early 1910s, gold rushes in Alaska and the nearby Yukon Territory brought thousands of miners and settlers to Alaska.  Alaska was officially incorporated as an organized territory in 1912.  Alaskas capital, which had been in Sitka until the 1900 legislation mandated its transfer to Juneau (the actual move took place in 1906, after initial questions arose), begun to take shape with the construction of the Governors Mansion that same year.File:AttuSnow.jpg|thumb|left|upright|U.S. troops negotiate snow and ice during the of Attu in May 1943.During World War II, the Islands Campaign focused on the three outer Aleutian Islands  Attu, Agattu and Kiska(these three Aleutian outer islands are about  away from continental USSR,  from continental Alaska (U.S.),  from Japan.)  that were invaded by Japanese troops and occupied between June 1942 and August 1943. Unalaska/Dutch Harbor became a significant base for the U.S. Army Air Corps and Navy submariners.The U.S. Lend-Lease program involved the flying of American warplanes through Canada to Fairbanks and thence Nome; Soviet pilots took possession of these aircraft, ferrying them to fight the German invasion of the Soviet Union. The construction of military bases contributed to the population growth of some Alaskan cities.StatehoodStatehood for Alaska was an important cause of Wickersham early in his tenure as a congressional delegate.  Decades later, the statehood movement gained its first real momentum following a territorial referendum in 1946.  The Alaska Statehood Committee and Alaskas Constitutional Convention would soon follow.  Statehood supporters also found themselves fighting major battles against political foes, mostly in the U.S. Congress but also within Alaska.  Statehood was approved by Congress on July 7, 1958. Alaska was officially proclaimed a state on January 3, 1959.On April 27, 1964, the massive Friday Earthquake killed 133 people and destroyed several villages and portions of large coastal communities, mainly by the resultant tsunamis and landslides. It was the third most powerful earthquake in the recorded history of the world, with a moment magnitude of 9.2. It was over one thousand times more powerful than the 1989 San Francisco earthquake.  The time of day (5:36 pm), time of year and location of the epicenter were all cited as factors in potentially sparing thousands of lives, particularly in Anchorage.The 1968 discovery of oil at Bay and the 1977 completion of the Pipeline led to an oil boom.  Royalty revenues from oil have funded large state budgets from 1980 onward.  That same year, not coincidentally, Alaska repealed its state income tax.  In 1989, the Valdez hit a reef in the William Sound, spilling over  of crude oil over 1,100 miles (1,600 km) of coastline. Today, the battle between philosophies of development and conservation is seen in the contentious debate over oil drilling in the National Wildlife Refuge.Demographicsfootnote  1930 and 1940 censuses taken in preceding autumnSources: 19102010()The States Census Bureau, as of July 1, 2008, estimated Alaskas population at 686,293,( which represents an increase of 59,361, or 9.5%, since the last census in 2000.() This includes a natural increase since the last census of 60,994 people (that is 86,062 births minus 25,068 deaths) and a decrease due to net migration of 5,469 people out of the state.( Immigration from outside the U.S. resulted in a net increase of 4,418 people, and migration within the country produced a net loss of 9,887 people.(In 2000 Alaska ranked the 48th state by population, ahead of Vermont and Wyoming (and Washington D.C.).() Alaska is the least densely populated state, and one of the most sparsely populated areas in the world, at 1.0 person per square mile (0.42/km), with the next state, Wyoming, at 5.1 per square mile (1.97/km). Alaska is the largest U.S. state by area, and the sixth wealthiest (per capita income).  As of January 2010, the states unemployment rate is 8.5%.(Bls.gov; Local Area Unemployment Statistics)Race and ancestryAccording to the U.S. Census, Alaska had a population of 710,231. In terms of race and ethnicity, the state was 66.7% White (64.7% Non-Hispanic White Alone), 14.8% American Indian and Alaska Native, 5.4% Asian, 3.3% Black or African American, 1.0% Native Hawaiian and Other Pacific Islander, 1.6% from Some Other Race, and 7.3% from Two or More Races. Hispanics or Latinos of any race made up 5.5% of the population.()LanguagesAccording to the 20052007 American Community Survey, 84.7% of people over the age of five speak only English at home. About 3.5% speak Spanish at home. About 2.2% speak another Indo-European language at home and about 4.3% speak an Asian language at home. And about 5.3% speak other languages at home.()A total of 5.2% of Alaskans speak one of the states 22 indigenous languages, known locally as native languages. These languages belong to two major language families: EskimoAleut and Na-Dene. As the homeland of these two major language families of North America, Alaska has been described as the crossroads of the continent, providing evidence for the recent settlement of North America by way of the land bridge.ReligionOrthodox Church.jpg|thumb|right|St. Michaels Russian Orthodox Cathedral in Sitka.Alaska has been identified, along with Pacific Northwest states Washington and Oregon, as being the least religious in the U.S.()(Believe it or not, Alaskas one of nations least religious states Anchorage Daily News, 2008 July 13. )  According to statistics collected by the Association of Religion Data Archives, about 39% of Alaska residents were members of religious congregations. Protestants had 78,070 members, Roman Catholics had 54,359, and mainline Protestants had 37,156.()  After Catholicism, the largest single denominations are Church of Jesus Christ of Latter-day Saints with 30,169,() and Southern Baptists with 22,959.  The large Orthodox (with 49 parishes and up to 50,000 followers)() population is a result of early Russian colonization and missionary work among Alaska Natives.()In 1795, the First Orthodox Church was established in Kodiak. Intermarriage with Alaskan Natives helped the Russian immigrants integrate into society. As a result, an increasing number of Russian Orthodox churches() gradually became established within Alaska. Alaska also has the largest Quaker population (by percentage) of any state.() In 2009 there were 6,000 Jews in Alaska (for whom observance of the mitzvah may pose special problems).(http://www.census.gov/compendia/statab/2011/tables/11s0077.pdf) Estimates for the number of Alaskan Muslims range from 2,000(First Muslim cemetery opens in Alaska )(Engaging Muslim: Religion, Culture, Politics ) to 5,000.() In 2010, the local Muslim community broke ground on the first mosque in the state.() Alaskan Hindus often share venues and celebrations with members of other religious communities including Sikhs and Jains.(Shri Ganesha Mandir of Alaska )()(Holi & Baisakhi celebrated by Alaskan Hindus and Sikhs )EconomyFile:Alaska Pipeline Closeup Underneath.jpg|thumb|upright|The Pipeline transports oil, Alaskas most financially important export, from the North Slope to Valdez. Pertinent are the pipes in the column mounts, which disperses heat upwards and prevents melting of permafrost.The 2007 state product was $44.9 billion, 45th in the nation. Its per capita personal income for 2007 was $40,042, ranking 15th in the nation. The oil and gas industry dominates the Alaskan economy, with more than 80% of the states revenues derived from petroleum extraction. Alaskas main export product (excluding oil and natural gas) is seafood, primarily salmon, cod, Pollock and crab.Agriculture represents only a fraction of the Alaskan economy. Agricultural production is primarily for consumption within the state and includes nursery stock, dairy products, vegetables, and livestock. Manufacturing is limited, with most foodstuffs and general goods imported from elsewhere.Employment is primarily in government and industries such as natural resource extraction, shipping, and transportation. Military bases are a significant component of the economy in both Fairbanks and Anchorage. Federal subsidies are also an important part of the economy, allowing the state to keep taxes low. Its industrial outputs are crude petroleum, natural gas, coal, gold, precious metals, zinc and other mining, seafood processing, timber and wood products. There is also a growing service and tourism sector. Tourists have contributed to the economy by supporting local lodging.EnergyAlaska has vast energy resources. Major oil and gas reserves are found in the North Slope (ANS) and Cook Inlet basins. According to the Information Administration, Alaska ranks second in the nation in crude oil production. Prudhoe Bay on Alaskas North Slope is the highest yielding oil field in the United States and on North America, typically producing about .The Pipeline can transport and pump up to  of crude oil per day, more than any other crude oil pipeline in the United States. Additionally, substantial coal deposits are found in Alaskas bituminous, sub-bituminous, and lignite coal basins.  The United States Geological Survey estimates that there are  of undiscovered, technically recoverable gas from natural gas hydrates on the Alaskan North Slope.()  Alaska also offers some of the highest hydroelectric power potential in the country from its numerous rivers. Large swaths of the Alaskan coastline offer wind and geothermal energy potential as well.()Alaskas economy depends heavily on increasingly expensive diesel fuel for heating, transportation, electric power and light. Though wind and hydroelectric power are abundant and underdeveloped, proposals for state-wide energy systems (e.g. with special low-cost electric interties) were judged uneconomical (at the time of the report, 2001) due to low ( Arctic Ocean|Northeast  Sea|East         |Southeast    |South      Pacific Ocean  |Southwest  Sea  Pacific Ocean  |West         Strait  Chukotka|Northwest  Sea}}list af:Alaskaang:Alaskaar:an:Alaskaarc:frp:Alaskaast:Alaskagn:Alaskaaz:Alyaskabn:zh-min-nan:Alaska()bh:bcl:Alaskabi:Alaskabs:Alaskabr:Alaskabg:ca:Alaskacv:ceb:Alaskacs:Aljakaco:Alaskacy:Alaskada:Alaskade:AlaskaDine Bikyah Hahoodzodsb:Alaskaet:Alaskael:es:Alaskaeo:Alaskoeu:Alaskafa:hif:Alaskafo:Alaskafr:Alaskafy:Alaskaga:Alascagv:Alaskagag:Alaskagd:Alasca- Alaskahak:-l-s-kxal:haw:laka()hi:hr:Aljaskaio:Alaskaig:lskilo:Alaskabpy:id:Alaskaia:Alaskaiu:/alaasikaik:Alaskaos:is:Alaskait:Alaskahe:jv:Alaskakn:pam:Alaska()ks:kw:Alaskasw:Alaskaht:Alaskaku:Alaskalad:Alaskala:Alascalv:Aaskalt:Aliaskalij:Alaskali:Alaskalmo:Alaskahu:Alaszkamk:mg:Alaskaml:mi:Alaskamr:arz:ms:Alaskamn:my:nah:Alaskamrj:nl:Alaska(stoat)new:ja:frr:Alaskano:Alaskann:Alaskaoc:Alaskauz:Alaskapnb:pap:Alaskapms:Alascands:Alaskapl:Alaskapt:Alascaro:Alaskarm:Alascasuyuru:sah:se:Alaskasa:sco:Alaskastq:Alaskasq:Alaskascn:Alaskasimple:Alaskask:Aljakasl:Aljaskackb:sr:sh:Aljaskafi:Alaskasv:Alaskatl:Alaskata:tt:te:th:tg:tr:Alaskaudm:uk:ur:Shitativec:Aascavi:Alaskavo:Alaskavls:Alaskawar:Alaskawuu:yi:yo:Alaskazh-yue:diq:Alaskabat-smg:Aliaskazh:
657
Asphalt
File:Bitumen.jpg|thumb|Natural bitumen from the seaImage:University of Queensland Pitch drop experiment-6-2.jpg|thumb|100px|The University of Queensland drop experiment, demonstrating the viscosity of bitumen.Asphalt  also known as bitumen is a sticky, black and highly viscous liquid or semi-solid that is present in most crude petroleums and in some natural deposits, it is a substance classed as a pitch. Until the 20th century, the term asphaltum was also used.( Full text at Internet Archive (archive.org))The primary use of asphalt is in road construction, where it is used as the glue or binder mixed with aggregate particles to create concrete. Its other main uses are for waterproofing products, including production of felt and for sealing flat roofs.The terms asphalt and bitumen are often used interchangeably to mean both natural and manufactured forms of the substance. In English, asphalt (or asphalt cement) is the carefully refined residue from the distillation process of selected crude oils. Outside the U.S., the product is often called bitumen. Natural deposits terminology also sometimes uses the word bitumen, such as at the Brea Tar Pits.Naturally occurring asphalt is sometimes specified by the term crude Bitumen; its viscosity is similar to that of cold molasses.()() whilst the material obtained from the distillation of oil (boiling at ) is sometimes referred to as refined bitumen.EtymologyThe word asphalt is derived from the late Middle English, in turn from French asphalte, based on Latin asphalton, asphaltum, which is the latinisation of the Greek  (sphaltos, sphalton), a word meaning asphalt/bitumen/pitch which some derive from - without and , (sfall), to make fall.() Note that in French, the term asphalte is used for naturally occurring bitumen-soaked limestone deposits, and for specialised manufactured products with fewer voids or greater bitumen content than the asphaltic concrete used to pave roads.Another description has it that the term derives from the Accadian term asphaltu or sphallo, meaning to split. It was later adopted from the Homeric Greeks as a verb meaning to make firm or stable, to secure. It is a significant fact that the first use of asphalt by the ancients was in the nature of a cement for securing or joining together various objects, and it thus seems likely that the name itself was expressive of this application. From the Greek, the word passed into late Latin, and thence into French (asphalte) and English (asphaltum and asphalt).The expression bitumen originated in the Sanskrit, where we find the words jatu, meaning pitch, and jatu-krit, meaning pitch creating, pitch producing (referring to coniferous or resinous trees). The Latin equivalent is claimed by some to be originally gwitu-men (pertaining to pitch), and by others, pixtumens (exuding or bubbling pitch), which was subsequently shortened to bitumen, thence passing via French into English. From the same root is derived the Anglo Saxon word cwidu (Mastix), the German word Kitt (cement or mastic) and the old Norse word kvada.(Abraham, Herbert (1938), p.1)Neither of the terms Asphalt or Bitumen should be confused with tar or tars. Modern usage Bitumina3.jpg|thumb|A tanker with the name Bitumina.In English, the word asphalt is used to refer to a mixture of mineral aggregate and bitumen (or tarmac in common parlance). The earlier word asphaltum is now archaic and not commonly used. In English, asphalt is equivalent to the British bitumen. However, asphalt is also commonly used as a shortened form of concrete (therefore equivalent to the British asphalt or tarmac). In English, bitumen is sometimes used as the generic term for road surfaces. In English, the word bitumen is used to refer to the vast Canadian deposits of extremely heavy oil,() while asphalt is used for the refinery product used to pave roads and manufacture shingles and various waterproofing products. Diluted bitumen (diluted with naphtha to make it flow in pipelines) is known as dilbit in the Canadian petroleum industry, while bitumen upgraded to crude oil is known as syncrude and syncrude blended with bitumen as synbit.()Bitumen is still the preferred geological term for naturally occurring deposits of the solid or semi-solid form of petroleum. Bituminous rock is a form of sandstone impregnated with bitumen. The sands of Canada are a similar material.Bitumen is sometimes incorrectly called tar (tar is a black viscous material obtained from the destructive distillation of coal and is chemically distinct from bitumen).ChemistryThe substance is completely soluble in disulfide, and composed primarily of a mixture of highly condensed aromatic hydrocarbons; it is most commonly modelled as a colloid, with asphaltenes as the dispersed phase and maltenes as the continuous phase (though there is some disagreement amongst chemists regarding its structure). One writer states that although a considerable amount of work has been done on the composition of asphalt, it is exceedingly difficult to separate individual hydrocarbon in pure form,() and it is almost impossible to separate and identify all the different molecules of asphalt, because the number of molecules with different chemical structure is extremely large.(Muhammad Abdul Quddus (1992), p.99, in ch.5 pdf)Most natural bitumens contain sulfur and several heavy metals such as nickel, vanadium, lead, chromium, mercury and also arsenic, selenium, and other toxic elements. Bitumens can provide good preservation of plants and animal fossils.BackgroundAsphalt or bitumen can sometimes be confused with tar, which is a similar black thermo-plastic material produced by the distillation of coal. During the early- and mid-20th century when gas was produced, tar was a readily available product and extensively used as the binder for road aggregates. The addition of tar to macadam roads led to the word tarmac, which is now used in common parlance to refer to road making materials. However, since the 1970s, when gas succeeded town gas, asphalt (bitumen) has completely overtaken the use of tar in these applications. Other examples of this confusion include the Brea Tar Pits and the Canadian Sands. Pitch is another term mistakenly used at times to refer to asphalt/bitumen, as in Lake.Natural deposits of asphalt include lake asphalts (primarily from the Lake in and Tobago and Bermudez in Venezuela), Gilsonite, the Sea, bituminous rock and Sands. Asphalt was mined at Ritchie Mines in Macfarlan in County, West Virginia in the United States from 1852 to 1873. Bituminous rock was mined at many locations in the United States for use as a paving material, primarily during the late 1800s.Asphalt can be separated from the other components in crude oil (such as naphtha, gasoline and diesel) by the process of distillation, usually under vacuum conditions. A better separation can be achieved by further processing of the heavier fractions of the crude oil in a unit, which uses either propane or butane in a supercritical phase to dissolve the lighter molecules which are then separated. Further processing is possible by blowing the product: namely reacting it with oxygen. This makes the product harder and more viscous.Asphalt is typically stored and transported at temperatures around 150 degrees Celsius (300 F).  Sometimes oil or kerosene are mixed in before shipping to retain liquidity; upon delivery, these lighter materials are separated out of the mixture. This mixture is often called bitumen feedstock, or BFS. Some trucks route the hot engine exhaust through pipes in the dump body to keep the material warm.  The backs of tippers carrying asphalt, as well as some handling equipment, are also commonly sprayed with a releasing agent before filling to aid release. Diesel oil is sometimes used as a agent, although it can mix with and thereby reduce the quality of the asphalt.HistoryGeological originImage:Puy de Poix, gisement bitumeux.JPG|thumb|right|Bituminous outcrop of the Puy de la Poix, Clermont-Ferrand, FranceNaturally occurring deposits of bitumen are formed from the remains of ancient, microscopic algae and other once-living things.  When these organisms died, their remains were deposited in the mud on the bottom of the ocean or lake where they lived. Under the heat and pressure of burial deep in the earth, the remains were transformed into materials such as bitumen, kerogen, or petroleum. Deposits at the Brea Tar Pits are an example.There are structural similarities between bitumens and the organic matter in carbonaceous meteorites.(Hayatsu etal., Meteoritics, Vol. 18, p.310) However, detailed studies have shown these materials to be distinct.(Kim & Yang Journal of Astronomy and Space Sciences, vol. 15, no. 1, p. 163-174)Ancient timesThe use of bitumen for waterproofing and as an adhesive dates at least to the third millennium BCE in the early Indus community of Mehrgarh where it was used to line the baskets in which they gathered crops.(McIntosh, Jane. The Ancient Indus Valley. p. 57)In the ancient East, the Sumerians used natural asphalt deposits for mortar between bricks and stones, to cement parts of carvings, such as eyes, into place, for ship caulking, and for waterproofing.( In some versions of the of Genesis in the Bible, the name of the substance used to bind the bricks of the of Babel is translated as bitumen (see Gen 11:3). A one-kilometre tunnel beneath the river Euphrates at Babylon in the time of Queen Semiramis (ca. 800 B.C.) was reportedly constructed of burnt bricks covered with bitumen as a waterproofing agent.() This must be regarded as legendary but indicative that the concept was known. The Persian word for asphalt is moom, which is related to the English word mummy. Asphalt was also used by Egyptians to embalm mummies.(() The Greek historian Herodotus said hot bitumen was used as mortar in the walls of Babylon.(Herodotus, Book I, 179)In the ancient East, natural asphalt was slowly boiled to get rid of the higher fractions, leaving a material of higher molecular weight which is thermoplastic and when layered on objects, became quite hard upon cooling. This was used to cover objects that needed waterproofing,( such as scabbards and other items. Statuettes of household deities were also cast with this type of material in Japan, and probably also in China.In America, archaeological recovery has indicated that asphalt was sometimes used to adhere stone points to a wooden shaft.(C.Michael Hogan (2008) Morro Creek, ed. by A. Burnham)Approximately 40 A.D. Dioscorides described production of asphaltos (as distinguished from pissasphalt and naphtha): (1655 Goodyer translation). The Judaicum Bitumen is a famous deposit of native asphalt seeping through diapirs at the bottom of the Dead Sea, which comes occasionally to the surface through seismic activity in blocks of up to 100 tons in weight which are more than 99.99% pure.  It was the object of the first known battle for a hydrocarbon deposit, between the Seleucids and the Nabateans in 312 B.C.()The Judaicum Bitumen is better than others; that is reckoned the best, which doth shine like purple, being of a strong scent & weightie, but the black and fowle is naught for it is adulterated with Pitch mixed with it. It growes in Phoenice also, and in Sidon, & in Babylon, & in Zacynthum. It is found also moyst swimming upon wells in the countrie of the Agrigentines of Sicilie, which they use for lamps instead of oyle, and which they call falsely Sicilian oyle, for it is a kinde of moyst Bitumen.( translated by Goodyer (1655) http://www.therenaissanceman.org/images/DIOSCORIDES-Intro_Book_1.doc or (Greek/Latin) compiled by Sprengel (1829) http://books.google.com/books/download/Pedanii_Dioscoridis_____de_materia_medic.pdf?idJwAUAAAAQAAJ&outputpdf p. 100 (p. 145 in PDF))The Sidon bitumen is thought to refer to bitumen found at Hasbeya.(The organic geochemistry of the Hasbeya asphalt (Lebanon): comparison with asphalts from the Dead Sea area and Iraq Jacques Connan and Arie Nissenbaumb Organic Geochemistry Volume 35, Issue 6, June 2004, Pages 775-789 doi:10.1016/j.orggeochem.2004.01.015) Pliny refers also to bitumen being found in Epirus.Early use in EuropeAn 1838 edition of Mechanics Magazine cites an early use of asphalt in France. A pamphlet dated 1621, by a certain Monsieur dEyrinys, states that he had discovered the existence (of asphaltum) in large quantities in the vicinity of Neufchatel, and that he proposed to use it in a variety of ways - principally in the construction of air-proof granaries, and in protecting, by means of the arches, the water-courses in the city of Paris from the intrusin of dirt and filth, which at that time made the water unusable. He expatiates also on the excellence of this material for forming level and durable terraces in palaces, the notion of forming such terraces in the streets not one likely to cross the brain of a Parisian of that generation.() But it was generally  neglected in France until the revolution of 1830. Then, in the 1830s, there was a surge of interest, and asphalt became widely used for pavements, flat roofs, and the lining of cisterns, and in England, some use of it had been made of it for similar purposes. Its rise in Europe was a sudden phenomenon, after natural deposits were found in France at Osbann (BasRhin), the Parc (lAin) and the Puy-de-la-Poix (Puy-de-Dome), although it could also be made artificially.(. Note: different sections of Miles online work were written in different years, as evidenced at the top of each page (not including the heading page of each section). This particular section appears to have been written in 2000) One of the earliest uses in France was the laying of about 24,000 square yards of Seyssel asphalt at the de la Concorde in 1835.()Photography and artBitumen was also used in early photographic technology. It was most notably used by French scientist Nicphore Nipce in the first picture ever taken. The bitumen used in his experiments were smeared on pewter plates and then exposed to light, thus making a black and white image.  It was similarly used to print millions of photochrom postcards.Bitumen was the nemesis of many artists during the 19th century.  Although widely used for a time, it ultimately proved unstable for use in oil painting, especially when mixed with the most common dilutents, such as linseed oil, varnish  and turpentine.  Unless thoroughly diluted, bitumen never fully solidifies and will in time corrupt the other pigments with which it comes into contact.  The use of bitumen as a glaze to set in shadow or mixed with other colors to render a darker tone resulted in the eventual deterioration of a good many paintings, those of Delacroix being just one notable example.Early use in the United KingdomAmong the earlier uses of asphalt in the United Kingdom, was for etching. William Salmons Polygraphice (1673) provides a recipe for varnish used in etching, consisting of three ounces of virgin wax, two ounces of mastic, and one ounce of asphaltum.() By the fifth edition in 1685, he had included more asphaltum recipes from other sources.( Text at Internet Archive)The first British patent for the use of asphalt was Cassells patent asphalte or bitumen in 1834.( Then on 25 November 1837, Richard Tappin Claridge patented the use of Seyssel asphalt (patent #7849), for use in asphalte pavement,()( Writer is replying to note or query from previous publication, cited as 9th S. xi. 30) having seen it employed in France and Belgium when visiting with Walter Simms, who worked with him on the introduction of asphalt to Britain.()()  Dr T. Lamb Phipson claims that his father, Samuel Ryland Phipson, a friend of Claridge, was also instrumental in introducing the asphalte pavement (in 1836).( Full text at Internet Archive (archive.org)) Indeed, mastic pavements had been previously employed at Vauxhall by a competitor of Claridge, but without success.(In 1838, Claridge obtained patents in Scotland on 27 March, and Ireland on 23 April, and in 1851 extensions were sought for all three patents, by the trustees of a company previously formed by Claridge.(()()() This was Claridges Patent Asphalte Company, formed in 1838 for the purpose of introducing to Britain Asphalte in its natural state from the mine at Pyrimont Seysell in France,( Full text at Internet Archive (archive.org). Alternative viewing at: http://books.google.com/books?idsQ5AAAAAYAAJ&pg) and laid one of the first asphalt pavements in Whitehall.(Miles, Lewis (2000), pp.10.06.1-2) Trials were made of the pavement in 1838 on the footway in Whitehall, the stable at Knightsbridge Barracks,((Comments on asphalt patents of R.T. Claridge, Esq (1904), p.18) and subsequently on the space at the bottom of the steps leading from Waterloo Place to St. James Park.( The formation in 1838 of Claridges Patent Asphalte Company (with a distinguished list of aristocratic patrons, and Marc and Isambard Brunel as, respectively, a trustee and consulting engineer), gave an enormous impetus to the development of a British asphalt industry.( By the end of 1838, at least two other companies, Robinsons and the Bastenne company, were in production,(Miles, Lewis (2000), p.10.06.2) with asphalt being laid as paving at Brighton, Herne Bay, Canterbury, Kensington, the Strand, and a large floor area in Bunhill-row, while meantime Claridges Whitehall paving continue(d) in good order.()Indeed in 1838, there was a flurry of entrepreneurial activity over asphalt, which had uses beyond paving. For example, asphalt could also used for flooring, damp proofing in buildings, and for waterproofing of various types of pools and baths, with these latter themselves proliferating in the 19th century.((( (Enter asphalt into the search field for list of pages discussing the subject)) On the London stockmarket, there were various claims as to the exclusivity of asphalt quality from France, Germany and England. And numerous patents were granted in France, with similar numbers of patent applications being denied in England due to their similarity to each other. In England, Claridges was the type most used in the 1840s and 50s (In 1914, Claridges Company entered into a joint venture to produce tar-bound macadam,() with materials manufactured through a subsidiary company called Clarmac Roads Ltd.() Two products resulted, namely Clarmac, and Clarphalte, with the former being manufactured by Clarmac Roads and the latter by Claridges Patent Asphalte Co., although Clarmac was more widely used.() However, the First World War  impacted financially on the Clarmac Company, which entered into liquidation in 1915.(Clarmac financial difficults due to WW1 Debentures deposited The Law Reports: Chancery Division, (1921) Vol. 1 p.545. Retrieved 17 June 2010.)() The failure of Clarmac Roads Ltd had a flow-on effect to Claridges Company, which was itself compulsorily wound up,(Claridges Patent Asphalte Co. compulsorily wound up Funds invested in new company The Law Times Reports (1921) Vol.125, p.256. Retrieved 15 June 2010.) ceasing operations in 1917,()() having invested a substantial amount of funds into the new venture, both at the outset,( and in a subsequent attempt to save the Clarmac Company.( Early use in the United States The first use of asphaltum in the New World was by indigenous peoples.  On the west coast, as early as the 13th century, the Tongva, Luiseo and Chumash peoples collected the naturally occurring asphaltum that seeped to the surface above underlying petroleum deposits.  All three used the substance as an adhesive.  It is found on many different artifacts of tools and ceremonial items. For example, it was used on rattles to adhere gourds or turtle shells to rattle handles.  It was also used in decorations.  Small round shell beads were often set in asphaltum to provide decorations.  It was used as a sealant on baskets to make them water tight for carrying water.  Asphaltum was used also to seal the planks on ocean-going canoes.Roads in the US have been paved with asphalt since at least 1870, when a street in front of Newark, NJs City Hall was paved.  In 1876, asphalt was used to pave Pennsylvania Avenue in Washington, DC, in time for the celebration of the national centennial.() Asphalt was also used for flooring, paving and waterproofing of baths and swimming pools during the early 20th century, following similar trends in Europe.(Modern use Rolled asphalt concrete The largest use of asphalt is for making concrete for road surfaces and accounts for approximately 85% of the asphalt consumed in the States. Asphalt pavement material is commonly composed of 5 percent asphalt cement and 95 percent aggregates (stone, sand, and gravel). Due to its highly viscous nature, asphalt cement must be heated so that it can be mixed with the aggregates at the asphalt mixing plant. There are about 4,000 asphalt mixing plants in the U.S.Asphalt road surface is the most widely recycled material in the US, both by gross tonnage and by percentage.  According to a report issued by the Highway Administration and the States Environmental Protection Agency, 80% of the asphalt removed each year from road surfaces during widening and resurfacing projects is reused as part of new roads, roadbeds, shoulders and embankments.Roofing shingles account for most of the remaining asphalt consumption. Other uses include cattle sprays, fence post treatments, and waterproofing for fabrics.Asphalt is widely used in airports around the world. Due to the sturdiness, it is widely used for runways dedicated to aircraft landing and taking off. Mastic asphalt asphalt is a type of asphalt which differs from dense graded asphalt (concrete) in that it has a higher bitumen (binder) content, usually around 710% of the whole aggregate mix, as opposed to rolled asphalt, which has only around 5% added bitumen. This thermoplastic substance is widely used in the building industry for waterproofing flat roofs and tanking underground.  Mastic asphalt is heated to a temperature of  and is spread in layers to form an impervious barrier about  thick. Asphalt emulsion A number of technologies allow asphalt to be mixed at much lower temperatures. These involve mixing the asphalt with petroleum solvents to form cutbacks with reduced melting point or mixtures with water to turn the asphalt into an emulsion. Asphalt emulsions contain up to 70% asphalt and typically less than 1.5% chemical additives. There are two main types of emulsions with different affinity for aggregates, cationic and anionic. Asphalt emulsions are used in a wide variety of applications. Chipseal involves spraying the road surface with asphalt emulsion followed by a layer of crushed rock, gravel or crushed slag. Slurry Seal involves the creation of a mixture of asphalt emulsion and fine crushed aggregate that is spread on the surface of a road. Cold mixed asphalt can also be made from asphalt emulsion to create pavements similar to hot-mixed asphalt, several inches in depth and asphalt emulsions are also blended into recycled hot-mix asphalt to create low cost pavements.Other usesThin bitumen plates are sometimes used by computer enthusiasts for silencing computer cases or noisy computer parts such as the hard drive. Bitumen layers are baked onto the outside of high end dishwashers to provide sound insulation. Bitumen also is used in paint and marker inks by some graffiti supply companies (primarily Molotow) to increase the weather resistance and permanence of the paint and/or ink, and to make the color much darker.Petroleum production, alternatives and bioasphalt Naturally occurring crude bitumen impregnated in sedimentary rock is the prime feed stock for petroleum production from sands, currently under development in Alberta, Canada. Canada has most of the worlds supply of natural bitumen, covering 140,000 square kilometres( (an area larger than England), giving it the second largest proven reserves in the world. The oil sands is the largest bitumen deposit in Canada and the only one accessible to mining, although recent technological breakthroughs have resulted in deeper deposits becoming producible by in-situ methods. Because of price increases since 2003, upgrading bitumen to synthetic oil has become highly profitable. As of 2006 Canadian crude bitumen production averaged about  per day and was projected to rise to  per day by 2020.( The total amount of crude bitumen in Alberta which could be extracted is estimated to be about ,() which at a rate of  would last about 200 years.Certain activist groups have become increasingly concerned about the global oil and change problem in recent years due to by-products that are released into the atmosphere. Most of the emissions are derived primarily from burning fuels. This has led to the introduction of petroleum alternatives such as bioasphalt that are more environmentally friendly and less toxic.Bitumen can now be made from non-petroleum based renewable resources such as sugar, molasses and rice, corn and potato starches.  Bitumen can also be made from waste material by distillation of used motor oils, which is sometimes disposed by burning or dumping into land fills.  Non-petroleum based bitumen binders can be made light-colored. Roads made with lighter-colored pitch absorb less heat from solar radiation, and become less hot than darker surfaces, reducing their contribution to the heat island effect.(http://www.epa.gov/heatisland/ EPA)See also*Blacktop*Asphalt solar collector*Tarmac*Grooving & Grinding Association* Bioasphalt* Asphaltene* fuel* coal* rocks* sands* (resin)* Tar* SealcoatReferencesLiterature* Barth, Edwin J., Asphalt:  Science and Technology Gordon and Breach (1962).  ISBN 0-677-00040-5.**NotesExternal links**Pavement Interactive - Asphalt*U.S EPA*Asphalt Magazine*CSU Sacramento, The World Famous Asphalt Museum!*National Institute for Occupational Safety and Health - Asphalt Fumesar:ar:an:Gudrnaz:Asfaltaz:Bitumbe:be-x-old:bs:Bitumenbg:bg:ca:Asfalt(geologia)cs:iviceda:Bitumende:Bitumenet:Bituumenel:es:Betneo:Bitumo(hidrokarburo)fa:fr:Bitumegl:Asfaltohi:hr:Asfaltio:Bitumoio:Asfaltoid:Aspalis:Malbikit:Bitumehe:kk:ku:Asfaltlt:Bitumashu:Aszfaltms:Asfaltnl:Bitumenja:ja:nap:Asfardono:Bitumennn:Asfaltpl:Bitumypl:Asfaltpt:Betumero:Asfaltru:sk:Asfaltsl:Bitumensh:Asfaltsr:fi:Bitumisv:Bitumentl:Aspaltoth:tr:Asfaltuk:uk:vi:Bitumzh-yue:zh:
659
American_National_Standards_Institute
remarks             The American National Standards Institute (ANSI,  ) is a private organization that oversees the development of voluntary consensus standards for products, services, processes, systems, and personnel in the United States. The organization also coordinates U.S. standards with international standards so that American products can be used worldwide.  For example, standards ensure that people who own cameras can find the film they need for that camera anywhere around the globe. ANSI accredits standards that are developed by representatives of standards developing organizations, government agencies, consumer groups, companies, and others. These standards ensure that the characteristics and performance of products are consistent, that people use the same definitions and terms, and that products are tested the same way. ANSI also accredits organizations that carry out product or personnel certification in accordance with requirements defined in international standards.(ANSI 2009 Annual Report)The organizations headquarters are in DC. ANSIs operations office is located in York City. The ANSI annual operating budget is funded by the sale of publications, membership dues and fees, accreditation services, fee-based programs, and international standards programs. History ANSI was originally formed in 1918, when five engineering societies and three government agencies founded the American Engineering Standards Committee (AESC). In 1928, the AESC became the American Standards Association (ASA). In 1966, the ASA was reorganized and became the United States of America Standards Institute (USASI). The present name was adopted in 1969.Prior to 1918, these five founding engineering societies:*Institute of Electrical Engineers (AIEE, now IEEE)*Society of Mechanical Engineers (ASME)*Society of Civil Engineers (ASCE)*American Institute of Mining Engineers (AIME, now Institute of Mining, Metallurgical, and Petroleum Engineers)*American Society for Testing and Materials (now International)had been members of the United Engineering Society (UES).At the behest of the AIEE, they invited the U.S. government Departments of War, Navy (combined in 1947 to become the of Defense or DOD) and Commerce(ANSI history- Retrieved 2011-09-27) to join in founding a national standards organization.According to Paul G. Agnew, the first permanent secretary and head of staff in 1919, AESC started as an ambitious program and little else.  Staff for the first year consisted of one executive, Clifford B. LePage, who was on loan from a founding member, ASME.  An annual budget of $7,500 was provided by the founding bodies.In 1931, the organization (renamed ASA in 1928) became affiliated with the U.S. National Committee of the Electrotechnical Commission (IEC), which had been formed in 1904 to develop electrical and electronics standards.(http://www.iec.ch/)MembersANSIs membership comprises government agencies, organizations, corporations, academic and international bodies, and individuals. In total, the Institute represents the interests of more than 125,000 companies and 3.5 million professionals.(ANSI membership page, www.ansi.org/membership)ProcessThough ANSI itself does not develop standards, the Institute oversees the development and use of standards by accrediting the procedures of standards developing organizations. ANSI accreditation signifies that the procedures used by standards developing organizations meet the Institutes requirements for openness, balance, consensus, and due process.ANSI also designates specific standards as American National Standards, or ANS, when the Institute determines that the standards were developed in an environment that is equitable, accessible and responsive to the requirements of various stakeholders.( Value of the ANS Designation brochure)Voluntary consensus standards quicken the market acceptance of products while making clear how to improve the safety of those products for the protection of consumers. There are approximately 9,500 American National Standards that carry the ANSI designation.The American National Standards process involves:*consensus by a group that is open to representatives from all interested parties*broad-based public review and comment on draft standards*consideration of and response to comments*incorporation of submitted changes that meet the same consensus requirements into a draft standard*availability of an appeal by any participant alleging that these principles were not respected during the standards-development process.International activitiesIn addition to facilitating the formation of standards in the U.S., ANSI promotes the use of U.S. standards internationally, advocates U.S. policy and technical positions in international and regional standards organizations, and encourages the adoption of international standards as national standards where appropriate.The Institute is the official U.S. representative to the two major international standards organizations, the Organization for Standardization (ISO), as a founding member(ISO founding member- Retrieved 2011-09-27), and the Electrotechnical Commission (IEC), via the U.S. National Committee (USNC). ANSI participates in almost the entire technical program of both the ISO and the IEC, and administers many key committees and subgroups. In many instances, U.S. standards are taken forward to ISO and IEC, through ANSI or the USNC, where they are adopted in whole or in part as international standards.Standards panelsThe Institute administers five standards panels:*The ANSI Biofuels Standards Panel (ANSI-BSP)*The Information Technology Standards Panel*The ANSI Homeland Security Standards Panel*The ANSI Nanotechnology Standards Panel*The Identity Theft Prevention and Identity Management Standards PanelEach of the panels works to identify, coordinate, and harmonize voluntary standards relevant to these areas. In 2009, ANSI and the National Institute for Standards and Technology (NIST) formed the Nuclear Energy Standards Coordination Collaborative (NESCC). NESCC is a joint initiative to identify and respond to the current need for standards in the nuclear industry. American national standards*The ASA (as for American Standards Association) photographic exposure system, originally defined in ASA Z38.2.1 (since 1943) and ASA PH2.5 (since 1954), together with the DIN system (DIN 4512 since 1934), became the basis for the ISO system (since 1974), currently used worldwide (6, 2240, 5800, 12232).*A standard for the set of values used to represent characters in digital computers.  The ANSI code standard extended the previously created ASCII seven bit code standard (ASA X3.4-1963), with additional codes for European alphabets (see also Binary Coded Decimal Interchange Code or EBCDIC).  In Windows, the phrase ANSI refers to the Windows ANSI code pages (even though they are not ANSI standards).(Microsoft Glossary) Most of these are fixed width, though some characters for languages are variable width. Since these characters are based on a draft of the ISO-8859 series, some of Microsofts symbols are visually very similar to the ISO symbols, leading many to falsely assume that they are identical.*The first computer language standard was American Standard Fortran (informally known as FORTRAN 66), approved in March 1966 and published as ASA X3.9-1966.*The original standard implementation of the programming language C was standardized as ANSI X3.159-1989, becoming the well-known C.*The ANSI-NSF International standards used for commercial kitchens, such as restaurants, cafeterias, delis, etc.*The ANSI/APSP (Association of Pool & Spa Professionals) standards used for pools, spas, hot tubs, barriers, and suction entrapment avoidance.*The ANSI/HI (Institute) standards used for pumps.*The ANSI for protection is Z87.1, which gives a specific impact resistance rating to the eyewear. This standard is commonly used for shop glasses, shooting glasses, and many other examples of protective eyewear.*The ANSI paper sizes (ANSI/ASME Y14.1).Other initiatives*In 2008 ANSI, in  partnership(http://www.citationtechnologies.com/alliances/ansi) with Technologies, created the first dynamic, online web library for 14000 standards.(ANSI ISO 14000 Press Release)*On June 23, 2009 ANSI announced a product and services agreement with Technologies to deliver all ISO Standards on a web-based platform. Through the ANSI-Citation partnership, 17,765 International Standards developed by more than 3,000 ISO technical bodies will be made available on the citation platform, arming subscribers with powerful search tools and collaboration, notification, and change-management functionality.(ANSI Press Release 07.23.09)*ANSI, in partnership with Technologies, AAMI, ASTM, and DIN, created a single, centralized database for medical device standards on September 9, 2009.(Medical Device Standards Database Press Release 09/09/09)*In early 2009, ANSI launched a new Certificate Accreditation Program (ANSI-CAP) to provide neutral, third-party attestation that a given certificate program meets the American National Standard ASTM E2659-09.*In 2009, ANSI began accepting applications for certification bodies seeking accreditation according to requirements defined under the Toy Safety Certification Program (TSCP) as the official third-party accreditor of TSCPs product certification bodies.*In 2006, ANSI launched www.StandardsPortal.org, an online resource for facilitating more open and efficient trade between international markets in the areas of standards, conformity assessment, and technical regulations. The site currently features content for China, India, and Korea, with additional countries and regions planned for future content.See also*ASCII*Fortran*C*ASC X9*ASC X12*escape code*Architecture*Institute of Standards and Technology (NIST)*of Nuclear Materials Management (INMM)*of Environmental Sciences and Technology (IEST)*Crane Operator Certification*standardsReferencesExternal links*American National Standards Institute official Web site*ANSI eStandardsStore* ANSI Overview*ANSI Historical Overview**Historical Overview Brochure*ANSI iPackages Portals & WebStore - ISO14000 online portals*Documents of Interest:**ANSI Essential Requirements: Due process requirements for American National Standards**ANSI Critical Issue Paper: Current Attempts to Change Established Definition of Open Standards*ANSI code list at Piping-Designer.com  zh-min-nan:ANSIbs:ANSIbr:ANSINational Standards InstituteNational Standards InstituteNational Standards Instituteet:ANSINacional Estadounidense de Estndares  National Standards Institutega:ANSINational Standards Instituteko:ANSINational Standards Institute lv:ANSINational Standards Institutehu:ANSINational Standards InstituteNational Standards Instituteja:ANSINational Standards InstituteNational Standards InstituteNational Standards InstituteNational Standards Institute  National Standards Institutesl:ANSI   National Standards Institutesv:ANSIth:tr:ANSI  vi:ANSIzh:
666
Alkali_metal
The alkali metals are a series of elements in the table. In the modern IUPAC nomenclature, the alkali metals are called the Group 1 elements. Previously, they were called the Group IA elements, with A representing the group elements and numeral I representing the first group within the main-group series. The alkali metals include lithium (Li), sodium (Na), potassium (K), rubidium (Rb), caesium (Cs)groupnote and francium (Fr).(.) Hydrogen (H), although nominally also a member of Group 1,( very rarely exhibits behaviour comparable to the alkali metals. This group lies in the s-block of the periodic table, which means that all its elements have their outermost electron in an s-orbital. The s-block also includes earth metals, plus hydrogen and helium. The alkali metals provide one of the best examples of group trends in properties in the periodic table, with well characterized homologous behaviour down the group.All of the alkali metals discovered, are naturally occurring, although francium is the second-rarest naturally occurring element. These metals possess similar chemical properties: They are all highly reactive metals under standard conditions. Experiments have been conducted to attempt the synthesis of the next member of the group, which is probably ununennium (Uue), but these have all met with failure, but, since ununennium is the first 8 element and only the first element on the periodic table that has not been discovered, it is likely to be found in the near future. Note that ununennium may not be the next alkali metal due to effects.CharacteristicsChemistryLike other groups, the members of this family show patterns in its configuration, especially the outermost shells, resulting in trends in chemical behaviour:The alkali metals are all highly reactive and are never found in elemental forms in nature. Because of this, they are usually stored in oil or kerosene (paraffin oil). They also tarnish easily and have low melting points and densities.()The alkali metals are mostly silver-colored, except for metallic caesium, which can have a golden tint. These elements are all soft metals of low density. In chemical terms, all of the alkali metals react aggressively with the halogens to form salts. They all react with water to form strongly alkaline hydroxides. The vigor of reaction increases down the group. The alkali metals have the lowest first ionization energies in their periods of the table because of their low nuclear charge and high electropositivity. The second energy of all of the alkali metals is very high, thus they always form M+ cations. thumb|Series of alkali metals, stored in mineral oil (Natrium is sodium.)All of the alkali metals are notable for their vigorous reactions with water, and these reactions become increasingly vigorous when going down their column in the periodic table towards the heaviest alkali metals, such as caesium. Their chemical reactions with water are as follows:Alkali metal + water  Alkali metal hydroxide + hydrogen gasFor a typical example (M represents an alkali metal)::2 M (s) + 2 H2O (l)  2 MOH (aq) + H2 (g)Alkali metals form a very wide range of amalgams.()They tend to form ionically bonded salts with most electronegative elements on the periodic table, like fluoride and chloride.PhysicsPotassium and rubidium are naturally weakly radioactive as they have naturally occurring radioisotopes ( and ) and franciums only naturally occurring isotope () is also radioactive with a half-life of only 22.0 minutes. Caesium was also thought to have natural radioisotopes before the discovery of francium, which made the group strange compared to the others.The alkali metals show a number of trends when moving down the group  for instance: decreasing electronegativity, increasing reactivity, and decreasing melting and boiling point. In general, their densities increase, with the notable exception that potassium is less dense than sodium, and the possible exception of francium, whose physical properties have not been measured because it exists only in small quantities due to its high radioactivity.Below, hydrogen is included for comparison.()HydrogenThe element hydrogen, with its solitary one electron per atom, is usually placed at the top of Group 1 of the periodic table for convenience, but hydrogen is not counted as an alkali metal. Under typical conditions, pure hydrogen exists as a diatomic gas consisting of two atoms per molecule.The removal of the single electron of hydrogen requires considerably more energy than removal of the outer electron from the atoms of the alkali metals. As in the halogens, only one additional electron is required to fill in the outermost shell of the hydrogen atom, so hydrogen can in some circumstances behave like a halogen, forming the negative hydride ion. compounds of hydrogen with the alkali metals and some metals have been produced in the laboratory, but these are only laboratory curiosities without much practical use. Under extremely high pressures and low temperatures, such as those found at the cores of the planets Jupiter and Saturn, hydrogen does become metallic, and it behaves like an alkali metal. This type of hydrogen is known as hydrogen.Hydrogen is sometimes considered to be an alkali metal, as it, like the other alkali metals, has one valence electron; however, hydrogen rarely acts like an alkali metal, as can be seen from the data above. In fact, it is sometimes placed over lithium (due to its configuration),() sometimes carbon (due to its electronegativity)( and sometimes fluorine (due to its chemical properties).()Ammonium ionThe ammonium ion resembles the heavier alkali metals and is considered a close relative of the alkali metals.()HistoryLithiumPetalite (LiAlSi4O10) was discovered in 1800 by the Brazilian chemist Bonifcio de Andrada e Silva in a mine on the island of Sweden.()()() However, it was not until 1817 that August Arfwedson, then working in the laboratory of the chemist Jakob Berzelius, detected the presence of a new element while analyzing petalite ore.()()() This element formed compounds similar to those of sodium and potassium, though its carbonate and hydroxide were less soluble in water and more alkaline.() Berzelius gave the alkaline material the name lithion/lithina, from the Greek word o (transliterated as lithos, meaning stone), to reflect its discovery in a solid mineral, as opposed to potassium, which had been discovered in plant ashes, and sodium, which was known partly for its high abundance in animal blood. He named the metal inside the material as lithium.((()SodiumAlthough sodium (sometimes called soda in English) has long been recognized in compounds, it was not isolated until 1807 by Davy through the electrolysis of soda.()PotassiumPotassium metal was first isolated in 1807 in England by Sir Davy, who derived it from caustic potash (KOH), by the use of electrolysis of the molten salt with the newly discovered pile. Potassium was the first metal that was isolated by electrolysis.() Later in the same year, Davy reported extraction of the metal sodium from a mineral derivative (soda, NaOH, or lye), not a plant salt, by a similar technique, demonstrating the elements, and thus the salts, to be different.()()()()RubidiumBunsen and Kirchhoff were the first to suggest finding new elements by analysis. Rubidium was discovered in 1861 by Bunsen and Kirchhoff, in Heidelberg, Germany, in the mineral lepidolite through the use of a spectroscope. Because of the bright red lines in its spectrum, they chose a name derived from the Latin word rubidus, dark red.()()CaesiumIn 1860, Bunsen and Kirchhoff discovered caesium in the water from Drkheim, Germany. Due to the bright-blue lines in its spectrum, they chose a name derived from the Latin word caesius, meaning sky-blue.()((Bunsen quotes Gellius Noctes Atticae II, 26 by Figulus: Nostris autem veteribus caesia dicts est quae Graecis, ut Nigidus ait, de colore coeli quasi coelia.)(English Dictionary, 2nd Edition) Caesium was the first element to be discovered spectroscopically, only one year after the invention of the spectroscope by Bunsen and Kirchhoff.()FranciumFrancium (then known as eka-caesium, because it is below caesium in the table) was discovered in 1939 by Perey of the Curie Institute in France when she purified a sample of actinium-227, which had been reported to have a decay energy of 220 keV. However, Perey noticed decay particles with an energy level below 80 keV. Perey thought this decay activity might have been caused by a previously unidentified decay product, one that was separated during purification, but emerged again out of the pure actinium-227. Various tests eliminated the possibility of the unknown element being thorium, radium, lead, bismuth, or thallium. The new product exhibited chemical properties of an alkali metal (such as coprecipitating with caesium salts), which led Perey to believe that it was element 87, caused by the decay of actinium-227.(Adloff, Jean-Pierre; Kaufman, George B. (2005-09-25). Francium (Atomic Number 87), the Last Discovered Natural Element. The Chemical Educator 10 (5). Retrieved on 2007-03-26.) Perey then attempted to determine the proportion of decay to alpha decay in actinium-227. Her first test put the alpha branching at 0.6%, a figure that she later revised to 1%.()Before Pereys discovery of francium, there were at least three erroneous and incomplete discoveries.()()()()Eka-franciumThe next element below francium is expected to be ununennium (Uue), element 119, although this is not certain. The synthesis of ununennium was attempted in 1985 by bombarding a target of einsteinium-254 with calcium-48 ions at the superHILAC accelerator at Berkeley, California. No atoms were identified, leading to a limiting yield of 300 nb.()()\,^{254}_{99}\mathrm{Es} + \,^{48}_{20}\mathrm{Ca} \to \,^{302}_{119}\mathrm{Uue} ^{*} \to \  \ no\ atomsIt is highly unlikely that this reaction will be useful, given the extremely difficult task of making sufficient amounts of 254Es to make a large enough target to increase the sensitivity of the experiment to the required level, due to the rarity of the element, and extreme rarity of the isotope. However, given that ununennium is only the first 8 element on the periodic table, it may well be discovered in the near future. Currently, none of the period 8 elements have been discovered yet. It is also possible that, due to drip instabilities, only the lower period 8 elements are physically possible.Regardless of what the next element below francium actually is, it will still be known as eka-francium, as it is below francium in the table.ProductionLithiumSince the end of War II, lithium production has greatly increased. The metal is separated from other elements in igneous minerals such as those above. Lithium salts are extracted from the water of springs, brine pools, and brine deposits. The metal is produced electrolytically from a mixture of fused chloride and chloride.()SodiumSodium was first produced commercially in 1855 by thermal reduction of carbonate with carbon at 1100 C, in what is known as the process.(Eggeman, Tim. Sodium and Sodium Alloys. Kirk-Othmer Encyclopedia of Chemical Technology. John Wiley & Sons, Inc. Published online 2007. ): Na2CO3 (l) + 2 C (s)  2 Na (g) + 3 CO (g)A process based on the reduction of sodium hydroxide was developed in 1886.( Sodium is now produced commercially through the electrolysis of liquid chloride, based on a process patented in 1924.(Pauling, Linus, General Chemistry, 1970 ed., Dover Publications)() This is done in a Cell in which the NaCl is mixed with chloride to lower the point below 700 C. As calcium is less electropositive than sodium, no calcium will be formed at the anode. This method is less expensive than the previous process of electrolyzing hydroxide. Very pure sodium can be isolated by the thermal decomposition of azide.(Merck Index, 9th ed., monograph 8325)PotassiumPure potassium metal may be isolated by electrolysis of its hydroxide in a process that has changed little since Davy.() Thermal methods also are employed in potassium production, using chloride.Potassium salts such as carnallite, langbeinite, polyhalite, and sylvite form extensive deposits in ancient lake and seabeds,() making extraction of potassium salts in these environments commercially viable. The principal source of potassium  potash  is mined in Canada, Russia, Belarus, Germany, Israel, States, Jordan, and other places around the world.()()()RubidiumAlthough rubidium is more abundant in Earths crust than caesium the limited applications and the lack of a mineral rich in rubidium limits the production of rubidium compounds to 2 to 4 tonnes per year.() There are several methods to separate potassium, rubidium and caesium. The crystallization of a rubidium and caesium alum (Cs,Rb)Al(SO4)212H2O yields after 30 subsequent steps pure rubidium alum. Reports of two other methods are given in the literature the chlorostannate process and the ferrocyanide process.(()For several years in the 1950s and 1960s, a by-product of the potassium production called Alkarb was a main source for rubidium. Alkarb contained 21% rubidium while the rest was potassium and a small fraction of caesium.() Today the largest producers of caesium, for example the  Mine, Manitoba, Canada, produce rubidium as by-product from pollucite.(CaesiumThe mining of pollucite ore is a selective process and is conducted on a small scale in comparison with most metal mining operations. The ore is crushed, hand-sorted, but not usually concentrated, and then ground. Caesium is then extracted from pollucite mainly by three methods: acid digestion, alkaline decomposition, and direct reduction.(()FranciumFile:Pichblende.jpg|thumb|This sample of uraninite contains about 100,000 atoms (3.3 g) of francium-223 at any given time.(|altA shiny gray 5-centimeter piece of matter with a rough surface.Francium-223 is the result of the alpha decay of actinium-227 and can be found in trace amounts in uranium and thorium minerals.( In a given sample of uranium, there is estimated to be only one francium atom for every 11018 uranium atoms.( It is also calculated that there is at most 30 g of francium in the earths crust at any time.() This makes it the second rarest element in the crust after astatine.((Francium can also be synthesized in the nuclear reaction::197Au + 18O  210Fr + 5 nThis process, developed by Stony Brook Physics, yields francium isotopes with masses of 209, 210, and 211,() which are then isolated by the magneto-optical trap (MOT).()Eka-franciumUnunennium has not been produced yet as of .((OccurrenceLithiumAlthough lithium is widely distributed on Earth, it does not naturally occur in elemental form due to its high reactivity.( The total lithium content of seawater is very large and is estimated as 230 billion tonnes, where the element exists at a relatively constant concentration of 0.14 to 0.25 parts per million (ppm),()() or 25 micromolar;()higher concentrations approaching 7 ppm are found near vents.(SodiumOwing to its high reactivity, sodium is found in nature only as a compound and never as the free element. Sodium makes up about 2.6% by weight of the Earths crust, making it the sixth most abundant element overall() and the most abundant alkali metal. Sodium is found in many different minerals, of which the most common is ordinary salt (sodium chloride), which occurs in vast quantities dissolved in seawater, as well as in solid deposits (halite). Others include amphibole, cryolite, niter, and zeolite.PotassiumPotassium does not occur as the free element in nature due to its reactivity but, in compounds, makes up 1.5% of the weight of crust and is the seventh-most-abundant chemical element.RubidiumRubidium is roughly as abundant as zinc and rather more common than copper. It occurs naturally in the minerals leucite, pollucite, carnallite, zinnwaldite, and lepidolite.CaesiumCaesium is more abundant than antimony, cadmium, tin, and tungsten, and much more abundant than mercury or silver, but 30 times less abundant than rubidium  with which it is so closely chemically associated.()FranciumFrancium-223, the only naturally occurring isotope of francium,() is the result of the alpha decay of actinium-227 and can be found in trace amounts in uranium and thorium minerals() In a given sample of uranium, there is estimated to be only one francium atom for every 11018 uranium atoms.()() It is also calculated that there is at most 30 g of francium in the earths crust at any time.( This makes it the second-rarest element in the crust after astatine.(()Eka-franciumUnunennium has not been discovered as of .((ApplicationsAll of the alkali metals have very many applications, some of which are mentioned in the links below:*Lithium applications*Sodium applications*Potassium applications*Rubidium uses and applications*Caesium applications*Francium applicationsBiological occurrences*Lithium has several biological effects. carbonate is used to treat disorder (manic-depression) disorders as it works as a mood stabiliser, although there are side-effects, e.g. excessive ingestion of lithium poisons the nervous system, which is even more dangerous, as the lethal dose is only just above the therapeutic dose. Lithium is present in the human body at about 30 ppb.(accessdate15 February 2011)*Sodium is an essential element for survival as its cation, Na+, is important for nerve function. Sodium is present in the human body at about 0.14%.(accessdate15 February 2011)*Potassium is also an essential element for survival as its cation, K+, is essential for nerve and heart function. Potassium is present in the human body at about 0.2%.(accessdate15 February 2011)*Rubidium has no biological role but may help stimulate metabolism, and can accumulate ahead of potassium in muscle. Rubidium is present in the body at about 4.6 ppm.(accessdate15 February 2011)*Caesium has no biological role, but can replace potassium to some extent in the body due to having similar chemical properties. Thus, caesium compounds should be avoided when possible, especially those containing radioisotopes of caesium, such as 134Cs and 137Cs. Rats fed caesium instead of potassium die. Caesium chloride (non-radioactive) has also promoted as an alternative cancer therapy,() but has been linked to the deaths of over 50 patients, when it was used as part of a scientifically unvalidated cancer treatment.(Wood, Leonie. ) Caesium is present in the body at about 20 ppb.(accessdate15 February 2011)*Francium has no biological role(accessdate15 February 2011) and would most likely be extremely toxic due to its extreme radioactivity. If francium was not radioactive, based on trends it would most likely behave like caesium and would, it is presumed, be similarly toxic.PrecautionsThe alkali metals all react with water ever more violently and thus should all be handled with great care. Of note is the toxicity of caesium because it replaces potassium. Also, franciums extreme radioactivity is a great hazard, although the greatest quantity of francium ever assembled to date is a sphere of radius 1 mm (over 300,000 neutral atoms).()See also*Hydrogen (not an alkali metal)*Lithium*Potassium*Rubidium*Caesium*Francium*Ununennium (possibly an alkali metal)*periodic table (discusses what may happen to periodic table groups at high number)*(periodic table)NotesReferencesBibliography#######External links##Science aid: Alkali metals A simple look at alkali metals#Atomic and Physical Properties of the Group 1 Elements An in-depth look at alkali metalsExplanation of above periodic table sliceLinks to related articlesalcalnast:Alcalnmetali1   alcalkovyalcalaiddda:Alkalimetalde:Alkalimetalleet:Leelismetallidel:es:Alcalinometaloalkalinodhaatualcalingl:Alcalinometalialkaliis:Alkalmlmuralcalinialkalialikalialkalenalcalicametlilb:Alkalimetallmetalaialcalitthu:Alklifmekml:alkalinl:Alkalimetaalja:1no:Alkalimetallnn:Alkalimetallnds:Alkalimetallpl:Litowcealcalinoksh:Alkalimetallalcalinqillayalkalinemetalkovkovinametalialkalifi:Alkalimetallisv:Alkalimetallth:metalloi kimzh-yue:zh:
690
Aruba
calling_code        297Aruba ( , ) is a 33 km-long island of the Antilles in the southern Sea, located 27 km north of the coast of Venezuela and 130 km (aprox.) east of Peninsula (Colombia). Together with Bonaire and Curaao, it forms a group referred to as the ABC islands of the Antilles, the southern island chain of the Antilles.Aruba, which has no administrative subdivisions, is one of the four constituent countries that form the of the Netherlands, together with the Netherlands, Curaao, and Maarten whose citizens share a single nationality: Dutch citizen. Its capital is Oranjestad. Unlike much of the Caribbean region, Aruba has a dry climate and an arid, cactus-strewn landscape. This climate has helped tourism as visitors to the island can reliably expect warm, sunny weather. It has a land area of  and is densely populated with its estimated 103,000 people. It lies outside the belt.HistoryArubas first inhabitants are thought to have been Caquetos Amerinds from the Arawak tribe, who migrated there from Venezuela to escape attacks by the Caribs. Fragments of the earliest known Indian settlements date back to 1000 AD. Sea currents made canoe travel to other islands difficult, thus Caquetio culture remained closer to that of mainland America.capital OranjestadEuropeans first learned of Aruba following the explorations of Vespucci and de Ojeda in the summer of 1499. Though Vespucci boasted of discovering the island, he and Ojeda were likely guided there by natives of nearby islands. Both described Aruba as an island of giants, remarking on the comparatively large stature of the native Caquetos compared to Europeans. Ojeda also referred to the island as Oro Hubo, Spanish for It Had Gold. Gold was not discovered on Aruba, however, for another 300 years. Vespucci returned to Spain with stocks of cotton and brazilwood from the island and described houses built into the ocean. Vespucci and Ojedas tales spurred interest in Aruba and Spaniards soon colonized the island.()()Aruba was colonized by Spain for over a century. The Cacique or Indian Chief in Aruba, Simas, welcomed the first priests in Aruba and received from them a wooden cross as a gift.  In 1508, Alonso de Ojeda was appointed as Spains first Governor of Aruba, as part of Nueva Andaluca.Another governor appointed by Spain was Juan Martinez de Ampes. A cdula real decreed in November 1525 gave Ampes, factor of Espaola, the right to repopulate the depopulated islands of Aruba, Curaao and Bonaire.In 1528, Ampes was replaced by a representative of the House of Welser.  Aruba has been under Dutch administration since 1636, initially under Stuyvesant. Stuyvesant was on a special mission in Aruba in November and December 1642. Under the Dutch W.I.C. administration, as New Netherland and Curaao from 1648 to 1664 and the Dutch government regulations of 1629, also applied in Aruba. The Dutch administration appointed an Irishman as Commandeur in Aruba in 1667.In August 1806, General de Miranda and a group of 200 freedom fighters on their voyage to liberate Venezuela from Spain stayed in Aruba for several weeks.In 1933 Aruba sent its first petition for Arubas separate status and autonomy to the Queen.During War II, together with Curaao, the then world-class exporting oil refineries were the main suppliers of refined products to the Allies. Aruba became a British protectorate from 1940 to 1942 and a US protectorate from 1942 to 1945.  On February 16, 1942, its oil processing refinery was attacked by a German submarine (U-156) under the command of Werner Hartenstein, but the mission failed. U-156 was later (8 March 1943) destroyed by a US plane as the crew was sunbathing.(http://www.uboat.net/boats/u156.htm) In March 1944, Roosevelt briefly visited American troops stationed in Aruba. In attendance were: His Excellency, Dr. P. Kasteel, the Governor of Curaao, and his aide, Lieutenant Ivan Lansberg; Rear Admiral T. E. Chandler and his Aide, Lieutenant W. L. Edgington; Captain Jhr. W. Boreel and his aide, Lieutenant E. O. Holmberg; and the Netherlands aide to Mrs. Roosevelt, Lieutenant Commander v.d. Schatte Olivier.The islands economy has been dominated by five main industries: mining, phosphate mining (The Aruba Phosphaat Maatschappij), aloe export, petroleum refineries (The Lago Oil & Transport Company and the Arend Petroleum Maatschappij Shell Co.), and tourism.PoliticsFile:Koningin Beatrix in Vries.jpg|thumb|Queen Beatrix is the of state of Arubadi Aruba (front).jpg|thumb|Parliament of Aruba in Oranjestad.As a country of the of the Netherlands, Arubas politics take place within a framework of a 21-member Parliament and an eight-member Cabinet. The of Aruba is appointed for a six-year term by the monarch, and the prime minister and deputy prime minister are elected by the Staten (or Parlamento) for four-year terms. The Staten is made up of 21 members elected by direct, popular vote to serve a four-year term.()Together with the Netherlands, the countries of Aruba, Curaao and Maarten form the of the Netherlands. As they share the same Dutch citizenship, these four countries still also share the Dutch passport as the Kingdom of the Netherlands passport. As Aruba, Curaao and Sint Maarten have small populations, the three countries had to limit immigration. To protect their population, they have the right to control the admission of people from the Netherlands. There is the supervision of the admission and expulsion of people from the Netherlands and the setting of general conditions for the admission and expulsion of aliens.Aruba is designated as a member of the Overseas Countries and Territories (OCT) and is thus officially not a part of the Union, though Aruba can and does receive support from the European Development Fund.()()Moves towards independenceIn August 1947, Aruba presented its first Staatsreglement (constitution), for Arubas status aparte as the status of an autonomous state within the of the Netherlands. By 1954, the Charter of the Kingdom of the Netherlands was established, providing a framework for relations between Aruba and the rest of the Kingdom.()In 1972, at a conference in Suriname, Croes (MEP) proposed a sui-generis Dutch Commonwealth of four states: Aruba, the Netherlands, Suriname and the Antilles, each with its own nationality. Mr. C. Yarzagaray, a parliamentary member representing the AVP political party, proposed a referendum for the people of Aruba to determine Arubas separate status or Status Aparte as a full autonomous state under the crown. He proclaimed: Aruba shall never accept a federation and a second class nationality.Betico Croes worked in Aruba to inform and prepare the people of Aruba for independence. In 1976, a committee appointed by Croes introduced the national flag and anthem as the symbols of Arubas sovereignty and independence, and he also set 1981 as a target for Arubas independence. In March 1977, the first Referendum for Self Determination was held with the support of the Nations and 82% of the participants voted for independence.The Island Government of Aruba assigned the Institute of Social Studies in The Hague to prepare a study of Arubas independence, which was published in 1978, titled Aruba en Onafhankelijkheid, achtergronden, modaliteiten en mogelijkheden; een rapport in eerste aanleg. At the conference in The Hague in 1981, Arubas independence was set for the year 1991.In March 1983 Aruba finally reached an official agreement within the Kingdom for Arubas Independence, which would occur in a series of steps granting increasing autonomy. in August 1985 Aruba drafted a constitution that was unanimously approved. On 1 January 1986, after elections were held for Arubas first parliament,  Aruba seceded from the Netherlands Antilles and officially became a country of the Kingdom of the Netherlands. Full independence was set for 1996.This achievement is largely due to Betico Croes and the political support of other nations like the USA, Panama, Venezuela and various European countries. Croes was later proclaimed Libertador di Aruba after his death in 1986. In 1990, movement toward independence was postponed upon the request of Arubas Prime Minister, Nelson O. Oduber. The article scheduling Arubas complete independence was rescinded in 1995, although the process can begin again after a referendum.LawThe Aruban legal system is based on the Dutch model.  Instead of juries or grand juries, in Aruba, legal jurisdiction lies with a Gerecht in Eerste Aanleg (of First Instance) on Aruba, a Gemeenschappelijk Hof van Justitie voor de Nederlandse Antillen en Aruba (Court of Justice of the Netherlands Antilles and Aruba) and the Raad der Nederlanden (Supreme Court of Justice of the Netherlands).(Aruba.com) The Korps Politie Aruba (Police Force) is the islands law enforcement agency and operates district precincts in Oranjestad, Noord, San Nicolaas, and Santa Cruz, where it is headquartered.()EducationArubas educational system is patterned after the Dutch system of education. There are 68 schools for primary education, 12 schools for secondary education, and 5 universities in Aruba. In 2007, there were 22,930 registered full-time students.The Government of Aruba finances the national education system, except for private schools, such as the International School of Aruba (ISA), which finance their own activities. The percentage of money earmarked for education is higher than the average for the Caribbean/Latin American region.Arubans benefit from a strong primary school education. A segmented secondary school program includes vocational training, basic education, college preparation and advanced placement.Higher education goals can be pursued through the Professional Education program (EPI), the teachers college (IPA) as well as through the University of Aruba (UA) which offers bachelors and masters programs in law, finance and economics and hospitality and tourism management. Since the choice for higher education on the island itself is limited, many students choose study in the Netherlands, or abroad in countries in North America, South America as well as the rest of Europe.Aruba is also home to two schools: University School of Medicine and University School of Medicine.GeographyAruba is a generally flat, riverless island in the Antilles island arc of the Antilles. Aruba is widely known for its white, sandy beaches on the western and southern coasts of the island, relatively sheltered from fierce ocean currents, and this is where most tourist development has taken place. The northern and eastern coasts, lacking this protection, are considerably more battered by the sea and have been left largely untouched by humans. The hinterland of the island features some rolling hills, the best known of which are called Hooiberg at  and Jamanota, the highest on the island at  above level. Oranjestad, the capital, is located at .To the east of Aruba are Bonaire and Curaao, two island territories which once formed the southwest part of the Antilles; this group of islands is sometimes called the ABC islands. Climate The isothermal temperature of Arubas marine climate attracts tourists to the island all year round. Under Koppens climate classification, Aruba features a climate (BSh). However Aruba does not get quite as hot as other locations with a BSh climate. Temperature varies little from , moderated by constant winds from the Ocean. Yearly precipitation barely exceeds .dateFebruary 2011EconomyFile:Iguanas Aruba.JPG|200px|thumb|Iguanas on a rooftop in Aruba.Aruba enjoys one of the highest standards of living in the Caribbean region including a low unemployment rate. About three quarters of the Aruban national product is earned through tourism or related activities. Most tourists are from Venezuela and the States (predominantly from eastern and southern states). Before the Status Aparte (a separate completely autonomous country/state within the Kingdom), oil processing was the dominant industry in Aruba despite expansion of the tourism sector. Today, the influence of the oil processing business is minimal. The size of the agriculture and manufacturing sectors also remains minimal.The GDP per capita for Aruba was estimated to be $21,800 in 2004; among the highest in the Caribbean and the Americas.() Its main trading partners are Venezuela, the States and the Netherlands.spending has been a staple in Arubas history, and modestly high inflation has been present as well. As of 2006, the governments debt had grown to 1.883 billion Aruban florins.() Aruba received some aid from the Dutch government each year through 2009, as part of a deal (signed as Arubas Financial Independence) in which the Netherlands gradually reduced its financial help to the island each successive year. The exchange rate of the Aruban florin has remained steady in recent years at 1.79 florins to 1 dollar.(In 2006 the Aruban government has also changed several tax laws to further reduce the deficit. taxes have been converted to indirect taxes as proposed by the IMF. A 3% tax has been introduced on sales and services, while income taxes have been lowered and revenue taxes for business reduced by 20%. The government compensated workers with 3.1% for the effect that the B.B.O. would have on the inflation for 2007. The inflation on Aruba in 2007 was 8.7%.Demographicsof Aruba according to the FAO in 2005; number of inhabitants given in thousands.Aruba is situated in the deep southern part of the Caribbean.  Because it has almost no rainfall, Aruba was saved from the plantation system and the economics of the trade.Arubas population is estimated to be 80% mestizo and 20% other ethnicities. Arawaks spoke the broken Spanish which their ancestors had learned on Hispaniola.  The Dutch took control 135 years after the Spanish, left the Arawaks to farm and graze livestock, and used the island as a source of meat for other Dutch possessions in the Caribbean, leading to a depletion of the Arawak population. The Arawak heritage is stronger on Aruba than on most Caribbean islands. Although no full-blooded Aboriginals remain, the features of the islanders clearly indicate their genetic Arawak heritage. Most of the population is descended mostly from Arawak, and to a lesser extent Spanish, Italian, Dutch, and a few French, Portuguese, British, and African ancestors.Recently there has been substantial immigration to the island from neighboring American and Caribbean nations, possibly attracted by the higher paid jobs. In 2007, new immigration laws were introduced to help control the growth of the population by restricting workers to a maximum of 3 years residency on the island.Demographically, Aruba has felt the impact of its proximity to Venezuela, far more so than neighboring Curaao and Bonaire. Much of Arubas families are present by way of Venezuela and there is a seasonal increase of Venezuelans living in second homes.Jewish communityToday, approximately 85 Jewish people live in Aruba.(JewishVirtualLibrary.org The Virtual Jewish History Tour: Aruba) The community officially dates back to 1754, when Moses Solomon Halevi Maduro, his wife and six children received special permission to reside on the island by the Dutch royalty. Maduro founded the main shipping company, Maduro & Sons. The Jewish cemetery, which began to be used for burials by the Jewish community beginning in 1837, contains eight tombstones dating back to 1563, the only indication of a Jewish presence on the island before the 18th century.(Marks, Yehudah. Jewish Prime Minister of Aruba Orders Pair of Tefillin. Hamodia, World News, 2 September 2010, p. B42.)The current prime minister of the island nation, Eman, is of Jewish descent.(Cities and townsThe island, with a population of just over 100,000 inhabitants, does not have major cities.* Oranjestad (33,000 in 2006)* Paradera* San Nicolas* Noord* Santa Cruz* SavanetaCultureOranjestad.jpg|thumb|right|300px|Ornate buildings in Oranjestad, Aruba.On March 18 Aruba celebrates its National Day. In 1976, Aruba presented its National Anthem (Aruba Dushi Tera) and Flag.The origins of the population and location of the island give Aruba a mixed culture. According to the Bureau Burgelijke Stand en Bevolkingsregister (BBSB), as of 2005 there are ninety-two different nationalities living on the island. Dutch influence can still be seen, as in the celebration of Sinterklaas on December 5 and 6 and other national holidays like April 30, when in Aruba and the rest of the Kingdom of the Netherlands the Queens birthday or Dia di La Reina (Koninginnedag) is celebrated. Christmas and New Year are celebrated with the typical music and songs of gaitas for Christmas and the Dande for New Year, and the ayaca, the ponche crema and ham, and other typical foods and drinks. Millions of dollars worth of fireworks are burnt at midnight on New Years. On January 25, Croes birthday is celebrated. In June there is the celebration of the Dia di San Juan, with the song of Dera Gai. Religion also has its influences; the days of Ascension and Good Friday are also two holidays on the island.The holiday of Carnival is also an important one in Aruba, as it is in many Caribbean and Latin American countries, and, like Gras, that goes on for weeks. Its celebration in Aruba started, around the 1950s, influenced by the inhabitants from the nearby islands (Venezuela, St Vincent, Trinidad, Barbados, St. Maarten and Anguilla) who came to work for the Oil refinery. Over the years the Carnival Celebration has changed and now starts from the beginning of January till the Tuesday before Ash Wednesday with a large parade on the last Sunday of the festivities (Sunday before Ash Wednesday).Tourism from the United States has recently increased the visibility of American culture on the island, with such celebrations as Halloween and Thanksgiving Day in November.LanguageLanguage can be seen as an important part of island culture in Aruba. The official languages are Dutch and  since 2003  Papiamento. Papiamento is the predominant language on Aruba. A language spoken on Aruba, Bonaire, and Curaao, it incorporates words from other languages including Portuguese, West African languages, Dutch, and Spanish. Like many islands in the region, Spanish is also often spoken. English has historical connections (with the Empire) and is known by many; English usage has also grown due to tourism. Other common languages spoken based on the size of their community are Portuguese, Chinese, German and French. The latter is offered in high school and college, since a high percentage of Aruban students continue their studies in Europe.In recent years, the government of Aruba has shown an increased interest in acknowledging the cultural and historical importance of its native language. Although spoken Papiamento is fairly similar among the several Papiamento-speaking islands, there is a big difference in written Papiamento. The orthography differs per island and even per group of people. Some are more oriented towards the Portuguese roots and use the equivalent spelling (e.g. y instead of j), where others are more oriented towards the Dutch roots.In a book The Buccaneers of America, first published in 1678, it is stated by eyewitness account that the Indians on Aruba spoke Spanish. The oldest government official statement written in Papiamento dates from 1803.Aruba has four newspapers published in Papiamento: Diario, Bon Dia, Solo di Pueblo and Awe Mainta and two in English : Aruba Today and The News. Amigoe is the newspaper published in Dutch.Aruba also has 18 radio stations (2 AM and 16 FM) and three local television stations (Tele-Aruba, Aruba Broadcast Company and Channel 22).InfrastructureArubas Beatrix International Airport is located near Oranjestad. This airport has daily flights to various cities across the United States, to San Juan, Puerto Rico; Miami, Florida; Chicago, Illinois; Philadelphia and Pittsburgh Pennsylvania; Houston, Texas; Atlanta, Georgia; Charlotte, North Carolina; Washington DC; New York City; and Boston, Massachusetts. It also connects Aruba with Toronto, Ontario, and South America, with daily flights to the international airports of Venezuela, Colombia, Peru, Brazil, Germany, France, Spain, U.K and most of Europe through the Airport in the Netherlands. Direct flights from Italy started in November 2008.According to the Aruba Airport Authority, almost 1.7 million travelers used the airport in 2005, of which 61% were Americans.In cooperation with the United States government, and for the facilitation for the passengers that arrive into the United States, the States Department of Homeland Security (DHS), Customs and Border Protection (CBP) full pre-clearance facility in Aruba has been in effect since February 1, 2001 with the expansion in the Queen Beatrix Airport, United States and Aruba have the agreement since 1986 that begins as a USDA and Customs post, and since 2008, the only island to have this service for private flights. In 1999, the Department of Defense established a Forward Operating Location (FOL) at the airport.Aruba has two ports, Barcadera and Playa, which are located in Oranjestad. The Port of Playa welcomes all the cruise-ship lines, including Royal Caribbean, Cruise Lines, NCL, America Line, Cruise Line and many more; an estimated almost one million tourists enter in this port per year, Aruba Ports Authority, owned and operated by the Aruban government is the authority in these seaports.Arubas public buses transportation services is in charge of Arubus, a government based company which operates from 3:30am until 12:30am 365 days a year. Small private vans also provide the transportation services in certain areas such Hotel Area, San Nicolaas, Santa Cruz and Noord.Aruba also counts two telecommunications providers, Setar the government based company and Digicel Irish ownership company based in Jamaica. Setar is the provider of services such as Internet, video conference, GSM wireless tech and land lines and offer the latest in telecom services, Digicel is the Setar competitor in wireless technology using the GSM platform.Utilities on the islandWater-en Energiebedrijf (W.E.B.) Aruba NV produces potable industrial water, at the worlds third largest desalination plant.(Aruba Hosts International Desalination Conference 2007 | Official Travel News from Aruba)  Average daily consumption in is about 37,000 metric tons.()Places of interest* Collapsed September 2, 2005 ()Notable Arubans*Benton, musician who won the Eurovision Song Contest representing Estonia*Chabaya Lampe, Composer of Arubas national anthem*Eman, politician*(Shon A) Eman, politician   *Enrique Yrausquin, politician*Croes, politician*Eman, current Prime-Minister Cabinet Mike Eman 1*Farrell, musician (group M.)*Irausquin, fashion designer*Jim Jones, American hip-hop artist*Kingsale, former MLB player*Maduro, former MLB player*Roger Peterson, musician*Philly, Dutch hip-hop artist*Ponson, former MLB player currently a free agentSee also*Sea*of the Netherlands*Antilles*of Arubans*ReferencesExternal links* Government of Aruba* Aruba.com  Official Tourism site of Aruba* * * list  list  af:Arubaals:Arubaar:an:Arubaaz:Arubabn:zh-min-nan:Arubabe:be-x-old:bs:Arubabr:Arubabg:ca:Arubacv:cs:Arubacy:Arubada:Arubade:Arubadv:dsb:Arubadz:et:Arubael:es:Arubaeo:Aruboeu:Arubafa:hif:Arubafo:Arubafr:Arubafy:Arbagl:Arubako:hy:hi:hr:Arubaio:Arubabpy:id:Arubaia:Arubaos:is:Arbait:Aruba()jv:Arubakn:ka:kk:kw:Arubarw:Arubasw:Arubalad:Arubala:Arubalv:Arubalb:Arubalt:Arubalij:Arubali:Arubaln:Arubalmo:Arubahu:Arubamk:mr:arz:ms:Arubamn:nl:Arubane:ja:no:Arubann:Arubanov:Arubaoc:Arubapnb:pap:Arubaps:pms:Arubands:Arubapl:Arubapt:Arubaro:Arubaru:rue:sah:sq:Arubasimple:Arubask:Arubasl:Arubaso:Arubackb:srn:Arubasr:sh:Arubasu:Arubafi:Arubasv:Arubatl:Arubata:te:th:tr:Arubauk:ur:ug:vec:Arubavi:Arubawar:Arubawo:Arubawuu:yo:rbzh-yue:bat-smg:Arubazh:
701
Angola
footnote7                   Angola, officially the Republic of Angola (, ;(This is the pronunciation in Portugal; in Angola it is pronounced as it is written) Kikongo, Kimbundu, Umbundu: Repubilika ya Ngola), is a country in south-central Africa bordered by Namibia on the south, the Republic of the Congo on the north, and Zambia on the east; its west coast is on the Ocean with Luanda as its capital city. The exclave province of Cabinda has borders with the of the Congo and the Republic of the Congo.The Portuguese were present in somemostly coastalpoints of the territory of what is now Angola, from the 16th to the 19th century, interacting in diverse ways with the peoples that lived there. In the 19th century they slowly and hesitantly began to establish themselves in the interior. Angola as a Portuguese colony was not established before the end of the 19th century, and effective occupation, as required by the Conference (1884) was achieved in the 1920s as with most African colonies. After independence, Angola was the scene of an intense civil war from 1975 to 2002. The country has vast mineral and petroleum reserves; however, its expectancy and mortality rates are both among the worst-ranked in the world.(  Life expectancy at birth www.cia.gov (2009))EtymologyThe name Angola comes from the Portuguese colonial name Reino de Angola, appearing as early as de Novaiss 1571 charter.(Heywood, Linda M. & Thornton, John K. Central Africans, Atlantic Creoles, and the foundation of the Americas, 1585-1660, p. 82. Cambridge University Press, 2007.) The toponym was erroneously derived by the Portuguese from the Mbundu title ngola held by the king or warrior-chief kia Ndambi of the Ndongo. Ndongo was a state in the highlands between the Kwanza and Rivers nominally tributary to the king of Kongo but which was seeking greater independence during the 16th century. History  Early migrations and political units Khoisan hunter-gatherers are the earliest known modern human inhabitants of the area. They were largely replaced by Bantu tribes during the Bantu migrations, though small numbers remain in parts of southern Angola to the present day. The Bantu came from the north, probably from somewhere near the present-day Republic of Cameroon. When they reached what is now Angola, they encountered the Khoisan, Bushmen and other groups considerably less technologically advanced than themselves, whom they easily dominated with their superior knowledge of metal-working, ceramics and agriculture. The establishment of the Bantu took many centuries and gave rise to various groups who took on different ethnic characteristics.During this period of time, the Bantu established a number of political units (kingdoms, empires) in most parts of what today is Angola. The best known of these is the of the Kongo that had its centre in the northwest of contemporary Angola, but included important regions in the west of present day Republic of the Congo and of Congo as well as in southern Gabon.  It established trade routes with other trading cities and civilizations up and down the coast of southwestern and West Africa and even with the Zimbabwe Empire, but engaged in little or no transoceanic trade.() Portuguese presence on the coast File:Bay_of_Luanda.jpg|thumb|left|280px|View from de Luanda to the bay of Luanda, Angolas capital city and economic and commercial hub, 2008.The geographical areas now designated as Angola entered into contact with the Portuguese in the late 15th century, concretely in 1483, when Portugal established relations with the Kongo State, which stretched from modern Gabon in the north to the River in the south. In this context, they established a small trade post at the port of Mpinda, in Soyo. The Portuguese explorer Dias de Novais founded Luanda in 1575 as So Paulo de Loanda, with a hundred families of settlers and four hundred soldiers. Benguela, a Portuguese fort from 1587 which became a town in 1617, was another important early settlement they founded and ruled. The Portuguese would establish several settlements, forts and trading posts along the coastal strip of current-day Angola, which relied on slave trade, commerce in raw materials, and exchange of goods for survival. The slave trade provided a large number of black slaves to Europeans and their African agents. For example, in what is now Angola, the Imbangala economy was heavily focused on the slave trade.()()File:Queen Nzinga 1657.png|thumb|Nzinga in peace negotiations with the Portuguese governor in Luanda, 1657.European traders would export manufactured goods to the coast of Africa where they would be exchanged for slaves. Within the Empire, most black African slaves were traded to Portuguese merchants who bought them to sell as cheap labour for use on Brazilian agricultural plantations. This trade would last until the first half of the 19th century. According to John Iliffe, Portuguese records of Angola from the 16th century show that a great famine occurred on average every seventy years; accompanied by epidemic disease, it might kill one-third or one-half of the population, destroying the demographic growth of a generation and forcing colonists back into the river valleys.(John Iliffe (2007) Africans: the history of a continent. Cambridge University Press. p.68. ISBN 0521682975)The Portuguese gradually took control of the coastal strip during the 16th century by a series of treaties and wars forming the Portuguese colony of Angola. Taking advantage of the Restoration War, the Dutch occupied Luanda from 1641 to 1648, where they allied with local peoples, consolidating their colonial rule against the remaining Portuguese resistance. In 1648, a fleet under the command of de S retook Luanda for Portugal and initiated a conquest of the lost territories, which restored Portugal to its former possessions by 1650. Treaties regulated relations with Kongo in 1649 and Njingas Kingdom of Matamba and Ndongo in 1656. The conquest of Andongo in 1671 was the last major Portuguese expansion from Luanda outwards, as attempts to invade Kongo in 1670 and Matamba in 1681 failed. Portugal also expanded its territory behind the colony of Benguela to some extent, but until the 19th century the inroads from Luanda and Benguela were very limited, and Portugal had neither the intention nor the means to carry out a large scale territorial occupation and colonization. Delimitation and occupation of Angola The process resulted in few gains until the 1880s. Development of the hinterland began after the Conference in 1885 fixed the colonys borders, and British and Portuguese investment fostered mining, railways, and agriculture based on various forced labour systems. Full Portuguese administrative control of the hinterland did not occur until the beginning of the 20th century. In 1951, the colony was designated as an overseas province, called Province of Angola. Portugal had a presence in Angola for nearly five hundred years, and the populations initial reaction to calls for independence was scarce. More overtly political organisations first appeared in the 1950s, instigated by the USSR, and began to make organised demands for self determination, especially in international forums such as the Movement.The Portuguese regime, meanwhile, refused to accede to the demands for independence, provoking an armed conflict that started in 1961 when black guerrillas attacked both white and black civilians in cross-border operations in northeastern Angola. The war came to be known as the Colonial War. In this struggle, the principal protagonists were the MPLA (Movement for the Liberation of Angola), founded in 1956, the FNLA (Front for the Liberation of Angola), which appeared in 1961, and UNITA (Union for the Total Independence of Angola), founded in 1966. After many years of conflict that lead to the weakening of all the insurgent parties, Angola gained its independence on 11 November 1975, after the 1974 coup dtat in Lisbon, Portugal, which overthrew the Portuguese regime headed by Caetano.Portugals new revolutionary leaders began in 1974 a process of political change at home and accepted its former colonies independence abroad. In Angola, a fight for the conquest of power broke out immediately between the three nationalist movements. The events prompted a mass exodus of Portuguese citizens, creating up to 300 000 destitute Portuguese refugeesthe retornados.(Dismantling the Portuguese Empire, Magazine (Monday, July 07, 1975))The new Portuguese government tried to mediate an understanding between the three competing movements, and succeeded in agreeing, on paper, to form a common government, but in the end non of them respected the commitments made, and the issue was resolved by military force. Independence and civil war After independence in November 1975, Angola faced a devastating civil war which lasted several decades and claimed millions of lives and refugees.(The Decolonization of Portuguese Africa: Metropolitan Revolution and the Dissolution of Empire by Norrie MacQueen  Mozambique since Independence: Confronting Leviathan by Margaret Hall, Tom Young  Author of Review: Stuart A. Notholt African Affairs, Vol. 97, No. 387 (Apr., 1998), pp. 276278, JSTOR) Following negotiations held in Portugal, itself under severe social and political turmoil and uncertainty due to the April 1974 revolution, Angolas three main guerrilla groups agreed to establish a transitional government in January 1975.Within two months, however, the FNLA, MPLA and UNITA were fighting each other and the country was well on its way to being divided into zones controlled by rival armed political groups. The superpowers were quickly drawn into the conflict, which became a flash point for the War. The States, Republic of Congo (DRC) and Africa supported the FNLA and UNITA.()() The Union and Cuba supported the MPLA.During most of this period, 19751990, the MPLA organised and maintained a socialist regime. Despite the ongoing civil war, the model functioned to a certain degree, although it was foreseeable that it would eventually fail in face of UNITA opposition.(M.R. Bhagavan, Angolas Political Economy 19751985, Uppsala: Nordiska Afrikainstitutet, 1986.) Ceasefire with UNITA On February 22, 2002, after the MPLA regime come to terms with the USA, Savimbi, the leader of UNITA, was killed in combat with government troops. A cease-fire was reached by the two factions shortly afterwards. UNITA gave up its armed wing and assumed the role of major opposition party, although in the knowledge that in the present regime a legitimate democratic election is impossible. Although the political situation of the country began to stabilize, President Dos Santos has so far refused to institute regular democratic processes, UNITA head officials being given senior positions in top level companies. Among Angolas major problems are a serious humanitarian crisis (a result of the prolonged war), the abundance of minefields, the continuation of the political, and to a much lesser degree, military activities in favour of the independence of the northern exclave of Cabinda, carried out in the context of the protracted Conflict by the  para a Libertao do Enclave de Cabinda, but most of all, the dilapidation of the countrys rich mineral resources by the regime. While most of the internally displaced have now settled around the capital, in the so called Musseques, the general situation for Angolans remains desperate.(Lari (2004), Human Rights Watch (2005)) Politics File:Embassy of Angola (Washington, D.C.).JPG|thumb|Embassy of Angola in D.C.Angolas motto is Virtus Unita Fortior, a Latin phrase meaning Virtue is stronger when united. The executive branch of the government is composed of the President, the Vice-Presidents and the Council of Ministers. For decades, political power has been concentrated in the Presidency.Governors of the 18 provinces are appointed by and serve at the pleasure of the president. The Constitutional Law of 1992 establishes the broad outlines of government structure and delineates the rights and duties of citizens. The legal system is based on Portuguese and customary law but is weak and fragmented, and courts operate in only 12 of more than 140 municipalities. A Supreme Court serves as the appellate tribunal; a Constitutional Court with powers of judicial review has not been constituted until 2010, despite statutory authorization.After the end of the Civil War the regime came under pressure from within as well as from the international environment, to become more democratic and less authoritarian. Its reaction was to operate a number of changes without substantially changing its character.(See Didier Pclard (ed.), LAngola dans la paix: Autoritarisme et reconversions, special issue of Politique africains (Paris), 110, 2008.)Parliamentary elections held on 5 September 2008, announced MPLA as the winning party with 81% of votes. The closest opposition party was UNITA with 10%. These elections were the first since 1992 and were described as only partly free but certainly not as fair.() A White Book on the elections in 2008 lists  all irregularities surrounding the Parliamentary elections of 2008.()Angola scored poorly on the 2008 Index of African Governance. It was ranked 44 from 48 African countries, scoring particularly badly in the areas of Participation and Human Rights, Sustainable Economic Opportunity and Human Development. The Ibrahim Index uses a number of different variables to compile its list which reflects the state of governance in Africa.()The new constitution, adopted in 2010, further sharpened the authoritarian character of the regime. In the future, there will be no presidential elections: the president and the vice-president of the political party which comes out strongest in the parliamentary elections become automatically president and vice-president of Angola.(In this manner, Eduardo dos Santos is now finally in a legal situation. As he had obtained a relative, but not the absolute majority of votes in the 1992 presidential election, a second roundopposing him to Savimbiwas constitutionally necessary to make his election effective, but he preferred never to hold this second round.) Through a variety of mechanisms, the state president controls all the other organs of the state, so that the principle of the division of power is not maintained. As a consequence, Angola has no longer a presidential system, in the sense of the systems existing e.g. in the USA or in France. In terms of the classifications used in constitutional law, its regime falls now in the same category as the caesarist monarchy of Bonaparte in France, de Oliveira Salazars corporatist system established by the Portuguese constitution of 1933, the Brazilian military dictatorship based on the constitution of 1967/69, or several authoritarian regimes in contemporary Africa.(See Jorge Miranda, A Constituio de Angola de 2010, published in the academic journal O Direito (Lisbon), vol. 142, 2010 - 1 (June).) Military File:Tazua.jpg|thumb|250px|Tazua Falls, Rio Cuango. One of Angolas richest sources of gem diamonds.The Angolan Armed Forces (AAF) is headed by a Chief of Staff who reports to the Minister of Defense. There are three divisionsthe Army (Exrcito), Navy (Marinha de Guerra, MGA), and National Air Force (Fora Area Nacional, FAN). Total manpower is about 110,000. Its equipment includes Russian-manufactured fighters, bombers, and transport planes. There are also Brazilian-made EMB-312 Tucano for training role, Czech-made L-39 for training and bombing role, Czech Zlin for training role and a variety of western made aircraft such as C-212\Aviocar, Sud Aviation Alouette III, etc. A small number of AAF personnel are stationed in the Republic of the Congo (Kinshasa) and the of the Congo (Brazzaville). Police The National Police departments are: Public Order, Criminal Investigation, Traffic and Transport, Investigation and Inspection of Economic Activities, Taxation and Frontier Supervision, Riot Police and the Rapid Intervention Police. The National Police are in the process of standing up an air wing, which will provide helicopter support for police operations. The National Police are also developing their criminal investigation and forensic capabilities. The National Police has an estimated 6,000 patrol officers, 2,500 Taxation and Frontier Supervision officers, 182 criminal investigators and 100 financial crimes detectives and around 90 Economic Activity Inspectors.The National Police have implemented a modernization and development plan to increase the capabilities and efficiency of the total force. In addition to administrative reorganization; modernization projects include procurement of new vehicles, aircraft and equipment, construction of new police stations and forensic laboratories, restructured training programs and the replacement of AKM rifles with 9 mm UZIs for police officers in urban areas. Administrative divisions Angola is divided into eighteen provinces (provncias) and 163 municipalities.() The provinces are:BengoBenguelaBiCabindaCubangoNorteSulCuneneHuamboHuilaLuandaNorteSulMalanjeMoxicoNamibeUgeZaire Exclave of Cabinda With an area of approximately , the Northern Angolan province of Cabinda is unique in being separated from the rest of the country by a strip, some  wide, of the Republic of Congo (DRC) along the lower river. Cabinda borders the Republic to the north and north-northeast and the DRC to the east and south. The town of Cabinda is the chief population center.According to a 1995 census, Cabinda had an estimated population of 600,000, approximately 400,000 of whom live in neighboring countries. Population estimates are, however, highly unreliable. Consisting largely of tropical forest, Cabinda produces hardwoods, coffee, cocoa, crude rubber and palm oil. The product for which it is best known, however, is its oil, which has given it the nickname, the Kuwait of Africa. Cabindas petroleum production from its considerable offshore reserves now accounts for more than half of Angolas output. Most of the oil along its coast was discovered under Portuguese rule by the Cabinda Gulf Oil Company (CABGOC) from 1968 onwards.Ever since Portugal handed over sovereignty of its former overseas province of Angola to the local independence groups (MPLA, UNITA, and FNLA), the territory of Cabinda has been a focus of separatist guerrilla actions opposing the of Angola (which has employed its military forces, the FAAForas Armadas Angolanas) and Cabindan separatists. The Cabindan separatists, FLEC-FAC, announced a virtual Federal Republic of Cabinda under the Presidency of NZita Henriques Tiago. One of the characteristics of the Cabindan independence movement is its constant fragmentation, into smaller and smaller factions, in a process which although not totally fomented by the Angolan government, is undoubtedly encouraged and duly exploited by it. Transport Transport in Angola consists of:* Three separate railway systems totalling 2,761 km (1,715 mi)*  of highway of which  is paved* 1,295 navigable inland waterways* Eight major ports* 243 airports, of which 32 are paved.Travel on highways outside of towns and cities in Angola (and in some cases within) is often not best advised for those without four-by-four vehicles. Whilst a reasonable road infrastructure has existed within Angola, time and the war have taken their toll on the road surfaces, leaving many severely potholed, littered with broken asphalt. In many areas drivers have established alternate tracks to avoid the worst parts of the surface, although careful attention must be paid to the presence or absence of landmine warning markers by the side of the road. The Angolan government has contracted the restoration of many of the countrys roads. The road between Lubango and Namibe, for example, was completed recently with funding from the European Union, and is comparable to many European main routes. Progress to complete the road infrastructure is likely to take some decades, but substantial efforts are already being made in the right directions. Geography File:Beach of Coatinha in Benguela, Angola.jpg|thumb|220px|left|Coatinha beach in Benguela, AngolaAt ,(CIA - The World Factbook - Country Comparison :: Area) Angola is the worlds twenty-third largest country (after Niger). It is comparable in size to Mali and is nearly twice the size of the US state of Texas, or five times the area of the Kingdom. It lies mostly between latitudes 4 and 18S, and longitudes 12 and 24E.Angola is bordered by Namibia to the south, Zambia to the east, the Republic of the Congo to the north-east, and the Atlantic Ocean to the west. The exclave of Cabinda also borders the of the Congo to the north. Angolas capital, Luanda, lies on the Atlantic coast in the northwest of the country. Climate Angolas average temperature on the coast is  in the winter and  in the summer. It has two seasons; dry season (May to October) and hot rainy season (November to April). Economy Angola has a rich subsoil heritage, from diamonds, oil, gold, copper, as well as a rich wildlife (dramatically impoverished during the civil war), forest, and fossils. Since independence, oil and diamonds have been the most important economic resource. Smallholder and plantation agriculture have dramatically dropped because of the Civil War, but have begun to recover after 2002. The transformation industry that had come into existence in the late colonial period collapsed at independence, because of the exodus of most of the ethnic Portuguese population, but has begun to reemerge (with updated technologies), partly because of the influx of new Portuguese entrepreneurs. Similar developments can be verified in the service sector.Overall, Angolas economy has undergone a period of transformation in recent years, moving from the disarray caused by a quarter century of civil war to being the fastest growing economy in Africa and one of the fastest in the world, with an average GDP growth of 20 percent between 2005 and 2007.(http://www.mfw4a.org/angola/angola-financial-sector-profile.html) During 20012010 Angola has the worlds biggest average GDP growth with 11.1 percent. In 2004, Chinas Eximbank approved a $2 billion line of credit to Angola. The loan is being used to rebuild Angolas infrastructure, and has also limited the influence of the Monetary Fund in the country.()The Economist reported in 2008 that diamonds and oil make up 60 percent of Angolas economy, almost all of the countrys revenue and are its dominant exports.(Economist. August 30, 2008 edition. U.S. Edition. Page 46. Article on Angola, marches toward riches and democracy?.) Growth is almost entirely driven by rising oil production which surpassed  in late 2005 and was expected to grow to  by 2007. Control of the oil industry is consolidated in Group, a conglomerate which is owned by the Angolan government. In December 2006, Angola was admitted as a member of OPEC.() The economy grew 18% in 2005, 26% in 2006 and 17.6% in 2007. However, due to the global recession the economy contracted an estimated -0.3% in 2009.(https://www.cia.gov/library/publications/the-world-factbook/geos/ao.html retrieved 2010-10-24) The security brought about by the 2002 peace settlement has led to the resettlement of 4 million displaced persons, thus resulting in large-scale increases in agriculture production.Although the countrys economy has developed very significantly since achieving political stability in 2002, mainly thanks to the fast-rising earnings of the oil sector, Angola faces huge social and economic problems. These are in part a result of the almost continual state of conflict from 1961 onwards, although the highest level of destruction and socio-economic damage took place after the 1975 independence, during the long years of civil war. However, high poverty rates and blatant social inequality are chiefly the outcome of a combination of a persistent political authoritarianism, of neo-patrimonial practices at all levels of the political, administrative, military, and economic apparatuses, and of a pervasive corruption.(Anti-corruption watchdog International rates Angola one of the 10 most corrupt countries in the world.) The main beneficiary of this situation is a social segment constituted since 1975, but mainly during the last decades, around the political, administrative, economic, and military power holders, which has accumulated (and continues accumulating) enormous wealth.(This process is well analyzed by authors like Christine Messiant, Tony Hodges and others. For an eloquent illustrating, see now the Angolan magazine Infra-Estruturas frica 7/2010.) Secondary beneficiaries are the middle strata which are about to become social classes. However, overall almost half the population has to be considered as poor, but in this respect there are dramatic differences between the countryside and the cities (where by now slightly more than 50% of the people live). An inquiry carried out in 2008 by the Angolan Instituto Nacional de Estatstica has it that in the rural areas roughly 58% must be classified as poor, according to UN norms, but in the urban areas only 19%, while the overall rate is 37%.(See Angola Exame of 12/11/2010, online http://www.exameangola.com/pt/?det16943&id2000&mid.) In the cities, a majority of families, well beyond those officially classified as poor, have to adopt a variety of survival strategies.(See Cristina Udelsmann Rodrigues, O Trabalho Dignifica o Homem: Estratgias de Sobrevivncia em Luanda, Lisbon: Colibri: 2006.) At the same time, in urban areas social inequality is most evident, and assumes extreme forms in the capital, Luanda.(As an excellent illustration see Luanda: A vida na cidade dos extremos, in: Viso, 11/11/2010.) In the Development Index Angola constantly ranks in the bottom group.(The HDI 2010 lists Angola in the 146th position among 169 countriesone position below that of Haiti. See Human Development Index and its components.)According to Heritage Foundation, a conservative American tank, oil production from Angola has increased so significantly that Angola now is Chinas biggest supplier of oil.()Before independence in 1975, Angola was a breadbasket of southern Africa and a major exporter of bananas, coffee and sisal, but three decades of civil war (19752002) destroyed the fertile countryside, leaving it littered with landmines and driving millions into the cities. The country now depends on expensive food imports, mainly from Africa and Portugal, while more than 90 percent of farming is done at family and subsistence level. Thousands of Angolan small-scale farmers are trapped in poverty.(Louise Redvers, POVERTY-ANGOLA: Inter Press Service News Agency - NGOs Sceptical of Govts Rural Development Plans retrieved June 6, 2009)A serious structural problem of the Angolan economy are the enormous differences between the regions. This is best illustrated by the fact that about one third of the economic activities is concentrated in Luanda and the neighbouring Bengo province, while several areas of the interior are characterized by stagnation and even regression.(See Manuel Alves da Rocha, Desigualdades e assimetrias regionais em Angola: Os factores da competitividade territorial, Luanda: Centro de Estudos e Investigao Cientfica da Universidade Catlica de Angola, 2010.) Demographics Image:Angola population pyramid 2005.svg|thumb|375px|pyramid for AngolaAngolas population is estimated  to be 18,498,000 (2009).() It is composed of Ovimbundu (language Umbundu) 37%, Ambundu (language Kimbundu) 25%, Bakongo 13%, and 32% other ethnic groups (including the Ovambo, the Ganguela and the Xindonga) as well as about 2% mestios (mixed European and African) and 1% European (See ethnic map and CIA  The World Factbook  Angola) The  Ambundu and Ovimbundu nations combined form a majority of the population, at 62%.(As no reliable census data exist at this stage (2011), all these numbers are rough estimates only, subject to adjustments and updates.)  The population is forecast to grow to over 47 million people to 2060, nearly tripling (Forecast provided by Futures and hosted by Googles Data Explorer)It is estimated that Angola was host to 12,100 refugees and 2,900 asylum seekers by the end of 2007. 11,400 of those refugees were originally from the Democratic Republic of Congo (Congo-Kinshasa) who arrived in the 1970s.(Committee for Refugees and Immigrants. World Refugee Survey 2008. Available Online at: http://www.refugees.org/countryreports.aspx?id2117. pp.37) As of 2008 there were an estimated 400,000 DRC migrant workers,(World Refugee Survey 2008  Angola, UNHCR. NB: This figure is highly doubtful, as it makes no clear distinction between migrant workers, refugees, and immigrants.) at least 30,000 Portuguese,(Angola, U.S. Department of State. NB: Estimations in 2011 put that number at 100,000, and add about 150,000 to 200,000 other Europeans and Latin Americans.) and more than 20,000 Chinese living in Angola.(ANGOLA and reconstructing the country: Prevention made in China, PlusNews, November 12, 2008) Prior to independence in 1975, Angola had a community of approximately 350,000 Portuguese.(See the carefully researched article by Gerald Bender & Stanley Yoder, Whites in Angola on the Eve of Independence. The Poitics of Numbers, in: Africa Today, 21 (4), 1974, pp. 2327. Flight from Angola, The Economist , August 16, 1975 puts the number at 500,000, but this is an estimate lacking appropriate sources.) Languages The languages in Angola are those originally spoken by the different ethnic groups plus Portuguese due to its being a former Portuguese colony. The indigenous languages with the largest usage are Umbundu, Kimbundu, and Kikongo, in that order. Portuguese is the official language of the country.However, in Angola the mastery of the official language is probably more extended than elsewhere in Africa, and this certainly applies to its use in everyday life. Moreover, and above all, the proportion of native (or near native) speakers of the official language is no doubt considerably higher than in any other African country.There are three intertwined historical reasons for this situation.#In the Portuguese bridgeheads Luanda and Benguela, which existed on the coast of what today is Angola since the 15th and 16th century, respectively, Portuguese was spoken not only by the Portuguese and their mestio descendents, butespecially in and around Luandaby a significant number of Africans, although these always remained native speakers of their local African language.#Since the Portuguese conquest of the present territory of Angola, and especially since its effective occupation in the mid-1920s, schooling in Portuguese was slowly developed by the colonial state as well as by Catholic and Protestant missions. The rhythm of this expansion was considerably accelerated during the late colonial period, 19611974, so that by the end of the colonial period children all over the territory (with relatively few exceptions) had at least some access to the Portuguese language.(An illustration is Franz-Wilhelm Heimer, Educao e sociedade nas reas rurais de Angola: Resultados de um inqurito, vol. 2, Anlise do universo agrcola (survey report), Servios de Planeamento e Integrao Econmica de Angola, Luanda, 1974)#In the same late colonial period, the legal discrimination of the black population was abolished, and the state apparatus in fields like health, education, social work, and rural development was enlarged. This entailed a significant increase in jobs for Africans, under the condition that they spoke Portuguese.As a consequence of all this, the African lower middle class which at that stage formed in Luanda and other cities began to often prevent their children from learning the local African language, in order to guarantee that they learned Portuguese as their native language. At the same time, the white and mestio population, where some knowledge of African languages could previously often been found, neglected this aspect more and more, to the point of frequently ignoring it totally.After independence, these tendencies continued, and were even strengthened, under the rule of the MPLA which has its main social roots exactly in those social segments where the mastery of Portuguese as well as the proportion of native Portuguese speakers was highest. This became a political side issue, as FNLA as well as UNITA, given their regional constituencies, came out in favour of a greater attention to the African languages, and as the FNLA favoured French over Portuguese.The dynamics of the language situation, as described above, were additionally fostered by the massive migrations triggered by the Civil War.  Ovimbundu, the most populous ethnic group and the most affected by the war, appeared in great numbers in urban areas outside their areas, especially in Luanda and surroundings. At the same time, a majority of the Bakongo who had fled to the Republic of Congo in the early 1960s, or of their children and grandchildren, returned to Angola, but mostly did not settle in their original habitat, but in the citiesand again above all in Luanda. As a consequence, more than half the population is now living in the cities which, from the linguistic point of view, have become highly heterogeneous. This means, of course, that Portuguese as the overall language of communication is by now of paramount importance, and that the role of the African languages is steadily decreasing among the urban populationa trend which is beginning to spread into rural areas as well.The exact numbers of those fluent in Portuguese or who speak Portuguese as a first language are unknown, although a census is expected to be carried out in 2013. Quite a number of voices demand the recognition of Angolan Portuguese as a specific variant, comparable to those spoken in Portugal or in Brazil. However, while there exists a certain number of idiomatic particularities in everyday Portuguese, as spoken by Angolans, it remains to be seen whether or not the Angolan government comes to the conclusion that these particularities constitute a configuration that justifies the claim to be a new language variant. Religion There are about 1000 mostly Christian religious communities in Angola.(See Ftima Viegas, Panorama das Religies em Angola Independente (19752008), Ministrio da Cultura/Instituto Nacional para os Assuntos Religiosos, Luanda 2008) While reliable statistics are entirely nonexistent, estimates have it that more than half of the population are Catholics, while about a quarter adhere to the protestant churches introduced during the colonial period: the Congregationalists mainly among the Ovimbundu of the Central Highlands and the coastal region to its West, the Methodists concentrating on the Kimbundu speaking strip from Luanda to Malanje, the Baptists almost exclusively among the Bakongo of the Northwest (now massively present in Luanda as well) and dispersed Adventists, Reformed and Lutherans.(Benedict Schubert: Der Krieg und die Kirchen: Angola 19611991. Exodus, Luzern/Switzerland, 1997; Lawrence W. Henderson, The Church in Angola: A river of many currents, Cleveland: Pilgrim Press, 1989) In Luanda and region there subsists a nucleus of the syncretic Tocoists and in the Northwest a sprinkling of  Kimbanguism can be found, spreading from the Congo/Zaire. Since independence, hundreds of Pentecostal and similar communities have sprung up in the cities, where by now about 50% of the population is living; several of these communities/churches are of Brazilian origin. The  Muslims, practically all of them immigrants from West African and other countries and belonging to the Sunnite branch, represent only about 1%; because of their diversity, they do not form a community.  In 2011, according to the Islamic Community of Angola (Comunidade Islmica de Angola, COIA) there were more than 80 mosques serving about 500,000 muslims in Angola, and the number was growing.(O Pais, Surgimento do Islo em Angola, 2 Sep 2011, Pg 18) Arabia is at present developing an effort to enlarge their numbers, and intends to build an Islamic university in Luanda. The proportion of non-believers is significant, but impossible to be estimated. Traditional African religions exist only residually, in the main confined to some remote rural areas.In a study assessing nations levels of religious regulation and persecution with scores ranging from 010 where 0 represented low levels of regulation or persecution, Angola was scored 0.8 on Government Regulation of Religion, 4.0 on Social Regulation of Religion, 0 on Government Favoritism of Religion and 0 on Religious Persecution.(Angola: Religious Freedom Profile at the Association of Religion Data Archives Brian J Grim and Roger Finke. International Religion Indexes: Government Regulation, Government Favoritism, and Social Regulation of Religion. Interdisciplinary Journal of Research on Religion. 2 (2006) Article 1: www.religjournal.com.)Foreign missionaries were very active prior to independence in 1975, although since the beginning of the anti-colonial fight in 1961 the Portuguese colonial authorities expelled a series of Protestant missionaries and closed mission stations based on the belief that the missionaries were inciting pro-independence sentiments. Missionaries have been able to return to the country since the early 1990s, although security conditions due to the civil war have prevented them until 2002 from restoring many of their former inland mission stations.()The Roman Catholic and some major Protestant denominations mostly keep to themselves in contrast to the New Churches which actively proselytize. The Roman Catholic as well as some major Protestant denominations provide help for the poor in the form of crop seeds, farm animals, medical care and education.()(http://foodsresourcebank.org/uploadedfiles/Designations%2520Public%2520View%252009-07-07lo.pdf)() Health A 2007 survey concluded that low and deficient niacin status was common in Angola.() Epidemics of cholera, malaria, rabies and African hemorrhagic fevers like Marburg hemorrhagic fever, are common diseases in several parts of the country. Many regions in this country have high incidence rates of tuberculosis and high HIV prevalence rates. Dengue, filariasis, leishmaniasis, and onchocerciasis (river blindness) are other diseases carried by insects that also occur in the region. Angola has one of the highest mortality rate in the world and one of the worlds lowest expectancy. and Health Surveys is currently conducting several surveys in Angola on Malaria, Violence and more.(Angola Surveys,) Education class.jpg|thumb|right|Children in an outdoor classroom in Bi, AngolaFile:Lwena Moxico-Angola.jpg|thumb|right|Training center in Luena, ProvinceAlthough by law, education in Angola is compulsory and free for eight years, the government reports that a certain percentage of students are not attending school due to a lack of school buildings and teachers.(Botswana. 2005 Findings on the Worst Forms of Child Labor. of International Labor Affairs, Department of Labor (2006). This article incorporates text from this source, which is in the domain. ) Students are often responsible for paying additional school-related expenses, including fees for books and supplies.(In 1999, the gross primary enrollment rate was 74 percent and in 1998, the most recent year for which data are available, the net primary enrollment rate was 61 percent.( Gross and net enrollment ratios are based on the number of students formally registered in primary school and therefore do not necessarily reflect actual school attendance.( There continue to be significant disparities in enrollment between rural and urban areas. In 1995, 71.2 percent of children ages 7 to 14 years were attending school.( It is reported that higher percentages of boys attend school than girls.( During the Civil War (19752002), nearly half of all schools were reportedly looted and destroyed, leading to current problems with overcrowding.(The Ministry of Education hired 20,000 new teachers in 2005, and continued to implement teacher trainings.( Teachers tend to be underpaid, inadequately trained, and overworked (sometimes teaching two or three shifts a day).( Some teachers may also reportedly demand payment or bribes directly from their students.( Other factors, such as the presence of landmines, lack of resources and identity papers, and poor health also prevent children from regularly attending school.( Although budgetary allocations for education were increased in 2004, the education system in Angola continues to be extremely under-funded.(Literacy is quite low, with 67.4% of the population over the age of 15 able to read and write in Portuguese.(CIA world factbook 2010) 82.9% of males and 54.2% of women are literate as of 2001.() Since independence from Portugal in 1975, a number of Angolan students continued to be admitted every year at high schools, polytechnical institutes, and universities in Portugal, Brazil and Cuba through bilateral agreements; in general, these students belong to the Angolan elites. Culture Portugal has been present in Angola for 400 years, occupied the territory in the 19th and early 20th century, and ruled over it for about 50 years. As a consequence, both countries share cultural aspects: language (Portuguese) and main religion (Roman Catholic Christianity). Of course, the substrate of Angolan culture is African,  mostly Bantu, while Portuguese culture has been imported. The diverse ethnic communities  - the Ovimbundu, Ambundu, Bakongo, Chokwe, and other peoples - maintain to varying degrees their own cultural traits, traditions and languages, but in the cities, where slightly more than half of the population now lives, a mixed culture has been emerging since colonial times - in Luanda since its foundation in the XVIth century. In this urban culture, the Portuguese heritage has become more and more dominant. An African influence is evident in music and dance, and is moulding the way in which Portuguese is spoken, but is almost disappearing from the vocabulary. This process is well reflected in contemporary Angolan literature, especially in the works of Pepetela ans Paula Ribeiro Tavares.Leila Lopes, Angola 2011, was crowned Universe 2011 in Brazil on September 12th, 2011 making her the first Angolan to win the pageant. Gallery File:Church in Tombua, Namibe, Angola.JPG|Church in Tombua, Namibe province, January 2010File:ChokweWoman.jpg|Sculpture representing a female figure. Chokwe peoples, Angola, early 20th century. Wood, brass tacks, glass beads, plant fiber, oil patina.File:Black Stones Pungo Adongo.JPG|Black Stones of Pungo Adongo in AngolaImage:Luanda4.jpg|A view of LuandaFile:Kalandula waterfalls of the Lucala-River in Malange, Angola (2).JPG|Kalendula waterfalls of the Lucala river in Malange, 2009See also References *Much of the material in this article comes from the World Factbook 2000 and the 2003 U.S. Department of State website. Further reading * ANGOLA LIVRO BRANCO SOBRE AS ELEIES DE 2008. http://www.kas.de/proj/home/pub/8/2/year-2009/dokument_id-17396/index.html* Le Billon, Philippe (2005). Aid in the Midst of Plenty: Oil Wealth, Misery and Advocacy in Angola. Disasters 29(1): 125.* Birmingham, David (2006) Empire in Africa: Angola and its Neighbors, Athens/Ohio: Ohio University Press* Bsl, Anton (2008). Angolas Parliamentary Elections in 2008. A Country on its Way to One-Party-Democracy, KAS Auslandsinformationen 10/2008. http://www.kas.de/wf/de/33.15186/* Cilliers, Jackie and Christian Dietrich, Eds. (2000). Angolas War Economy: The Role of Oil and Diamonds. Pretoria, South Africa, Institute for Security Studies.* Global Witness (1999). A Crude Awakening, The Role of Oil and Banking Industries in Angolas Civil War and the Plundering of State Assets. London, UK, Global Witness. http://www.globalwitness.org/media_library_detail.php/93/en/a_crude_awakening* Heimer, Franz-Wilhelm, The Decolonization Conflict in Angola, Geneva: Institut dtudes Internationales et du Dveloppement, 1979* Hodges, Tony (2001). Angola from Afro-Stalinism to Petro-Diamond Capitalism. Oxford: James Currey.* Hodges, Tony (2004). Angola: The Anatomy of an Oil State. Oxford, UK and Indianapolis, US, The Fridtjol Nansen Institute & The International African Institute in association with James Currey and Indiana University Press.* Holness, Marga. Apartheids War Against Angola http://www.scribd.com/doc/29244604/Apartheid-s-War-Against-Angola-Marga-Holness* Human Rights Watch (2004). Some Transparency, No Accountability: The Use of Oil Revenues in Angola and Its Impact on Human Rights. New York, Human Rights Watch. http://www.hrw.org/reports/2004/angola0104/* Human Rights Watch (2005). Coming Home, Return and Reintegration in Angola. New York, Human Rights Watch. http://hrw.org/reports/2005/angola0305/* James, Walter (1992). A political history of the civil war in Angola, 19641990. New Brunswick, Transaction Publishers.* Kapuciski, Ryszard. Another Day of Life, Penguin, 1975. ISBN 978-0-14-118678-8. A Polish journalists account of Portuguese withdrawal from Angola and the beginning of the civil war. Kapuciski* Kevlihan, R. (2003). Sanctions and humanitarian concerns: Ireland and Angola, 2001-2. Irish Studies in International Affairs 14: 95106.* Lari, A. (2004). Returning home to a normal life? The plight of displaced Angolans. Pretoria, South Africa, Institute for Security Studies. http://www.iss.co.za/pubs/papers/85/Paper85.pdf* Lari, A. and R. Kevlihan (2004). International Human Rights Protection in Situations of Conflict and Post-Conflict, A Case Study of Angola. African Security Review 13(4): 2941. http://www.iss.co.za/pubs/ASR/13No4/FLari.pdf* Le Billon, Philippe (2001). Angolas Political Economy of War: The Role of Oil and Diamonds. African Affairs (100): 5580.* MacQueen, Norrie An Ill Wind? Rethinking the Angolan Crisis and the Portuguese Revolution, 19741976, Itinerario: European Journal of Overseas History, 26/2, 2000, pp. 2244* Mdecins Sans Frontires (2002). Angola: Sacrifice of a People. Luanda, Angola, MSF. http://www.doctorswithoutborders.org/publications/reports/2002/angola1_10-2002.pdf* Mwakikagile, Godfrey Nyerere and Africa: End of an Era, Third Edition, Pretoria, South Africa, 2006, on Angola in Chapter 11, American Involvement in Angola and Southern Africa: Nyereres Response, pp. 324346, ISBN 978-0-9802534-1-2.* Pinto Escoval (2004): Staatszerfall im sdlichen Afrika. Das Beispiel Angola. Wissenschaftlicher Verlag Berlin* Much of the material in these articles comes from the World Factbook 2000 and the 2003 U.S. Department of State website.* * Pearce, J. (2004). War, Peace and Diamonds in Angola: Popular perceptions of the diamond industry in the Lundas. 2005.African Security Review 13 (2), 2004, pp 5164. http://www.iss.co.za/pubs/ASR/13No2/AW.pdf* Porto, Joo Gomes (2003). Cabinda: Notes on a soon to be forgotten war. Pretoria, South Africa, Institute for Security Studies. http://www.iss.co.za/pubs/papers/77/Paper77.html* Tvedten, Inge (1997). Angola, Struggle for Peace and Reconstruction. Boulder, Colorado, Westview Press.* Vines, Alex (1999). Angola Unravels: The Rise and Fall of the Lusaka Peace Process. New York and London, UK, Human Rights Watch. External links * *****Key Development Forecasts for Angolalistaf:Angolaals:Angolaam:ang:Angolaar:an:Angolaroa-rup:Angolafrp:Angolaast:Angolaaz:Anqolabm:Angolabn:bjn:Angolazh-min-nan:Angolabe:be-x-old:bcl:Angolabo:bs:Angolabr:Angolabg:ca:Angolacv:ceb:Angolacs:Angolatum:Angolaco:Angolacy:Angolada:Angolapdc:Angolade:Angoladv:nv:Angoladsb:Angolaet:Angolael:es:Angolaeo:Angoloext:Angolaeu:Angolaee:Angolafa:hif:Angolafo:Angolafr:Angolafy:Angoalaga:Anglagv:Angoleygag:Angolagd:Angolagl:Angolahak:n-k-lko:ha:Angolahy:hi:hsb:Angolahr:Angolaio:Angolaig:Angolailo:Angolabpy:id:Angolaia:Angolaie:Angolaos:zu:IAngolais:Anglait:Angolahe:jv:Angolakn:pam:Angolaka:kk:kw:Angolarw:Angolasw:Angolakg:Ngolaht:Angolaku:Angolamrj:ltg:Angolala:Angolialv:Angolalb:Angolalt:Angolalij:Anglali:Angolaln:Angolajbo:angollmo:Angolahu:Angolamk:mg:Angolaml:mt:Angolamr:arz:mzn:ms:Angolamwl:Angolamn:my:na:Angoranl:Angolands-nl:Angolane:new:ja:ce:pih:Angolano:Angolann:Angolanov:Angolaoc:Anglauz:Angolapnb:pap:Angolaps:pms:Anglands:Angolapl:Angolapt:Angolakaa:Angolacrh:Angolaksh:Angolaro:Angolarm:Angolaqu:Angularue:ru:sah:se:Angolasa:sg:Angolasc:Angolasco:Angolaestq:Angolast:Angolasq:Angolascn:Angolasimple:Angolass:I-Angolask:Angolasl:Angolaszl:Angolaso:Angolackb:sr:sh:Angolafi:Angolasv:Angolatl:Angolata:tt:te:tet:Angolath:ti:tg:tr:Angolaudm:uk:ur:ug:vec:Angoavi:Angolavo:Langolnfiu-vro:Angolazh-classical:war:Angolawo:Angolaawuu:ts:Angolayi:yo:nglzh-yue:diq:Angolazea:Anholabat-smg:Anguolazh:
706
Economy_of_Angola
spelling              The Economy of Angola is one of the fastest-growing economies in the world,(Birgitte Refslund Srensen and Marc Vincent. Caught Between Borders: Response Strategies of the Internally Displaced, 2001. Page 17.) with the Economist asserting that for 2001 to 2010, Angolas Annual average GDP growth was 11.1 percent.(http://www.economist.com/blogs/dailychart/2011/01/daily_chart Retrieved on January 6, 2011) It is still recovering from the Civil War that plagued Angola from independence in 1975 until 2002. Despite extensive oil and gas resources, diamonds, hydroelectric potential, and rich agricultural land, Angola remains poor, and a third of the population relies on subsistence agriculture. Since 2002, when the 27-year civil war ended, the country has worked to repair and improve ravaged infrastructure and weakened political and social institutions. High international oil prices and rising oil production have led to a very strong economic growth in recent years, but corruption and public-sector mismanagement remain, particularly in the oil sector, which accounts for over 50 percent of GDP, over 90 percent of export revenue, and over 80 percent of government revenue.Historyof Portugals explorers and settlers, founded trading posts and forts along the coast of Africa since the 15th century, and reached the Angolan coast in the 16th century. Portuguese explorer Dias de Novais founded Luanda in 1575 as So Paulo de Loanda, and the region developed as a slave trade market with the help of local Imbangala and Mbundu peoples who were notable slave hunters. Trade was mostly with the Portuguese of Brazil; Brazilian ships were the most numerous in the ports of Luanda and Benguela. By this time, Angola, a Portuguese colony, was in fact like a colony of Brazil, paradoxically another Portuguese colony. A strong Brazilian influence was also exercised by the Jesuits in religion and education. War gradually gave way to the philosophy of trade. The great trade routes and the agreements that made them possible were the driving force for activities between the different areas; warlike states become states ready to produce and to sell. In the Planalto (the high plains), the most important states were those of Bi and Bailundo, the latter being noted for its production of foodstuffs and rubber. The colonial power, Portugal, becoming ever richer and more powerful, would not tolerate the growth of these neighbouring states and subjugated them one by one, so that by the beginning of this century the Portuguese had complete control over the entire area. During the period of the Union (15801640), Portugal lost influence and power and made new enemies. The Dutch, a major enemy of Castile, invaded many Portuguese overseas possessions, including Luanda. The Dutch ruled Luanda from 1640 to 1648 as Fort Aardenburgh. They were seeking black slaves for use in sugarcane plantations of Northeastern Brazil (Pernambuco, Olinda, Recife) which they had also seized from Portugal. Maurice, Prince of Nassau-Siegen, conquered the Portuguese possessions of Saint George del Mina, Saint Thomas, and Luanda, Angola, on the west coast of Africa. After the dissolution of the Iberian Union in 1640, Portugal would reestablish its authority over the lost territories of the Empire.The Portuguese started to develop townships, trading posts, logging camps and small processing factories. From 1764 onwards, there was a gradual change from a slave-based society to one based on production for domestic consumption and export. Meanwhile, with the of Brazil in 1822, the slave trade was abolished in 1836, and in 1844 Angolas ports were opened to foreign shipping. By 1850, Luanda was one of the greatest and most developed Portuguese cities in the vast Empire outside Portugal, full of trading companies, exporting (together with Benguela) palm and peanut oil, wax, copal, timber, ivory, cotton, coffee, and cocoa, among many other products. Maize, tobacco, dried meat and cassava flour also began to be produced locally. The Angolan bourgeoisie was born. From the 1920s to the 1960s, strong economic growth, abundant natural resources and development of infrastruture, led to the arrival of even more Portuguese settlers.The Portuguese discovered petroleum in Angola in 1955. Production began in the basin in the 1950s, in the basin in the 1960s, and in the exclave of Cabinda in 1968. The government granted operating rights for Block Zero to the Cabinda Gulf Oil Company, a subsidiary of ChevronTexaco, in 1955.( Oil production surpassed the exportation of coffee as Angolas largest export in 1973.A leftist military-led coup dtat, started on April 25, 1974, in Lisbon, overthrew the Caetano government in Portugal, and promised to hand over power to an independent Angolan government. Sese Seko, the of Zaire, met with de Spnola, the transitional of Portugal, on September 15, 1974 on island in Verde, crafting a plan to empower Roberto of the Liberation Front of Angola, Savimbi of UNITA, and Chipenda of the MPLAs eastern faction at the expense of MPLA leader Neto while retaining the faade of national unity. Mobutu and Spnola wanted to present Chipenda as the MPLA head, Mobutu particularly preferring Chipenda over Neto because Chipenda supported autonomy for Cabinda. The Angolan exclave has immense petroleum reserves estimated at around 300 million tons (~300 kg) which Zaire, and thus the Mobutu government, depended on for economic survival.(Erik P. Hoffmann and Frederic J. Fleron. The Conduct of Soviet Foreign Policy, 1980. Page 524.) After independence thousands of white Portuguese left, most of them to Portugal and many travelling overland to Africa. There was an immediate crisis because the indigenous African population lacked the skills and knowledge needed to run the country and maintain its well-developed infrastructure.The Angolan government created Sonangol, a state-run oil company, in 1976. Two years later Sonangol received the rights to oil exploration and production in all of Angola.(Angola Energy Information Administration) After independence from Portugal in 1975, Angola was ravaged by a horrific civil war between 1975 and 2002.1990sNations Angola Verification Mission III and MONUA spent USD1.5 billion overseeing implementation of the Protocol, a 1994 peace accord that ultimately failed to end the civil war. The protocol prohibited UNITA from buying foreign arms, a provision the Nations largely did not enforce, so both sides continued to build up their stockpile. UNITA purchased weapons in 1996 and 1997 from private sources in Albania and Bulgaria, and from Zaire, Africa, of the Congo, Zambia, Togo, and Faso. In October 1997 the UN imposed travel sanctions on UNITA leaders, but the UN waited until July 1998 to limit UNITAs exportation of diamonds and freeze UNITA bank accounts. While the U.S. government gave USD250 million to UNITA between 1986 to 1991, UNITA made USD1.72 billion between 1994 and 1999 exporting diamonds, primarily through Zaire to Europe. At the same time the Angolan government received large amounts of weapons from the governments of Belarus, Brazil, Bulgaria, the Republic of China, and Africa. While no arms shipment to the government violated the protocol, no country informed the U.N. Register on Conventional Weapons as required.(Vines, Alex. Angola Unravels: The Rise and Fall of the Lusaka Peace Process, 1999. Human Rights Watch.)Despite the increase in civil warfare in late 1998, the economy grew by an estimated 4% in 1999. The government introduced new currency denominations in 1999, including a 1 and 5 kwanza note.2000sAn economic reform effort was launched in 1998. The Angolan economy ranked 160 out of 174 nations in the Nations Human Development Index of 2000.( In April 2000 Angola started an International Monetary Fund (IMF) Staff-Monitored Program (SMP). The program formally lapsed in June 2001, but the IMF remains engaged. In this context the Government of Angola has succeeded in unifying exchange rates and has raised fuel, electricity, and water rates. The Commercial Code, telecommunications law, and Foreign Investment Code are being modernized. A privatization effort, prepared with Bank assistance, has begun with the BCI bank. Nevertheless, a legacy of fiscal mismanagement and corruption persists. The civil war internally displaced 3.8 million people, 32% of the population, by 2001.( The security brought about by the 2002 peace settlement has led to the resettlement of 4 million displaced persons, thus resulting in large-scale increases in agriculture production.Angola produced over 3 million carats of diamonds per year in 2003,(Africa: Mining - Diamond Mining Mbendi) with its production expected to grow to 10 million carats per year by 2007.  In 2004 Chinas Eximbank approved a $2 billion line of credit to Angola to rebuild infrastructure.(China grants additional USD 2 billion loan National Private Investment Agency) The economy grew 18% in 2005 and growth was expected to reach 26% in 2006 and stay above 10% for the rest of the decade.ChevronTexaco started pumping  from Block 14 in January 2000, but production has decreased to  in 2007 due to the poor quality of the oil.( Angola joined the of the Petroleum Exporting Countries on January 1, 2007.(Cabinda Gulf Oil Company found Malange-1, an oil reservoir in Block 14, on August 9, 2007.(Chevrons Block 14 Offshore Angola Finds Success Again RigZone)Overviewright|frame|National GDP per capita ranges from wealthier states in the north and south to poorer states in the east. These figures from the 2002 World Bank are converted to US dollars.Despite its abundant natural resources, output per capita is among the worlds lowest. Subsistence agriculture provides the main livelihood for 85% of the population. Oil production and the supporting activities are vital to the economy, contributing about 45% to GDP and 90% of exports. Growth is almost entirely driven by rising oil production which surpassed  in late-2005 and which is expected to grow to  by 2007. Control of the oil industry is consolidated in Sonangol Group, a conglomerate which is owned by the Angolan government. With revenues booming from oil exports, the government has started to implement ambitious development programs in building roads and other basic infrastructure for the nation.In the last decade of the colonial period, Angola was a major African food exporter but now imports almost all its food. Because of severe wartime conditions, including extensive planting of landmines throughout the countryside, agricultural activities have been brought to a near standstill. Some efforts to recover have gone forward, however, notably in fisheries. Coffee production, though a fraction of its pre-1975 level, is sufficient for domestic needs and some exports. In sharp contrast to a bleak picture of devastation and bare subsistence is expanding oil production, now almost half of GDP and 90% of exports, at . Diamonds provided much of the revenue for Savimbis UNITA rebellion through illicit trade. Other rich resources await development: gold, forest products, fisheries, iron ore, coffee, and fruits.This is a chart of trend of nominal domestic product of Angola at market prices using International Monetary Fund data;(Report for Selected Countries and Subjects, April 2006. International Monetary Fund) figures are in millions of units.Foreign traderight|400pxExports in 2004 reached US$10,530,764,911. The vast majority of Angolas exports, 92% in 2004, are petroleum products. US$785 million worth of diamonds, 7.5% of exports, were sold abroad that year.(99.4% of Angolas exports are oil, diamonds Afrol News) Nearly all of Angolas oil goes to the United States,  in 2006, making it the eighth largest supplier of oil to the United States, and to the Republic of China,  in 2006. In the first quarter of 2008, Angola became the main exporter of oil to China.(Angola Overtakes Saudi Arabia as Biggest Oil Supplier to China Bloomberg) The rest of its petroleum exports go to Europe and America.( U.S. companies account for more than half the investment in Angola, with Chevron-Texaco leading the way. The U.S. exports industrial goods and services, primarily oilfield equipment, mining equipment, chemicals, aircraft, and food, to Angola, while principally importing petroleum. Trade between Angola and Africa exceeded USD 300 million in 2007.(Angola-South Africa trade worth over US$ 300 million per year MacauHub) From the 2000s many Chinese have settled and started up businesses.(Chinese karaoke fans sing Angolas praises)ResourcesPetroleumAngola produces and exports more petroleum than any other nation in Africa, surpassing Nigeria in the 2000s. In January 2007 Angola became a member of OPEC. By 2010 production is expected to double the 2006 output level with development of deep-water offshore oil fields. Oil sales generated USD 1.71 billion in tax revenue in 2004 and now makes up 80% of the governments budget, a 5% increase from 2003, and 45% of GDP.((OECD (2006). Page 30.)Corporation produces and receives , 27% of Angolan oil. Elf Oil, Texaco, ExxonMobil, Agip, Petrobras, and Petroleum also operate in the country.(Block Zero provides the majority of Angolas crude oil production(OECD (2006). Page 132.) with  produced annually. The largest fields in Block Zero are Takula (Area A), Numbi (Area A), and Kokongo (Area B). ChevronTexaco operates in Block Zero with a 39.2% share. SONANGOL, the state oil company, Total, and ENI-Agip own the rest of the block. ChevronTexaco also operates Angolas first producing deepwater section, Block 14, with .(The Nations has criticized the Angolan government for using torture, rape, summary executions, arbitrary detention, and disappearances, actions which Angolan government has justified on the need to maintain oil output.(Omeje, Kenneth C. High Stakes And Stakeholders: Oil Conflict And Security in Nigeria, 2006. Page 157.)Angola is the third-largest trading partner of the United States in Sub-Saharan Africa, largely because of its petroleum exports.(United States Congress. Foreign Operations, Export Financing, and Related Programs Appropriations for 1998: Hearings, 1997. Page 269.) The U.S. imports 7% of its oil from Angola, about three times as much as it imported from Kuwait just prior to the War in 1991. The U.S. Government has invested USD $4 billion in Angolas petroleum sector.(Vines, Alex. Angola Unravels: The Rise and Fall of the Lusaka Peace Process, 1999. Human Rights Watch. Page 189.)DiamondsAngola is the third largest producer of diamonds in Africa and has only explored 40% of the diamond-rich territory within the country, but has had difficulty in attracting foreign investment because of corruption, human rights violations, and diamond smuggling.(Angola: U.S. Must Strengthen Ties to Protect Strategic Energy and Security Interests Council on Foreign Relations via AllAfrica) Production rose by 30% in 2006 and Endiama, the national diamond company of Angola, expects production to increase by 8% in 2007 to 10 million carats annually. The government is trying to attract foreign companies to the provinces of Bi, Malanje and Uge.(Angola wants foreign investors for diamond sector, July 26, 2007. Reuters)The Angolan government loses $375 million annually from diamond smuggling. In 2003 the government began Operation Brilliant, an anti-smuggling investigation that arrested and deported 250,000 smugglers between 2003 and 2006. Rafael Marques, a journalist and human rights activist, described the diamond industry in his 2006 Angolas Deadly Diamonds report as plagued by murders, beatings, arbitrary detentions and other human rights violations. Marques called on foreign countries to boycott Angolas diamonds.(Angola to double diamond production in 2006 Afrol News)IronUnder Portuguese rule, Angola began mining iron in 1957, producing 1.2 million tons in 1967 and 6.2 million tons by 1971. In the early 1970s, 70% of Portuguese Angolas iron exports went to Europe and Japan.( After independence in 1975, the Civil War (19752002) destroyed most of the territorys mining infrastructure. The redevelopment of the Angolan mining industry started in the late 2000s.Further reading*McCormick, Shawn H. The Angolan Economy: Prospects for Growth in a Postwar Environment, 1994.*OECD, International Energy Agency. Angola: Towards an Energy Strategy, 2006.*Making Finance Work for Africa (MFW4A): Angola Financial Sector Profile,(http://www.mfw4a.org/angola/angola-financial-sector-profile.html)ReferencesExternal links**MBendi overview of Angola*Angola latest trade data on ITC Trade MapdAngolade Angolade lAngolade Angoladi AngoladAnglade AngolaAngoleit Angolazh:
